Have Dark Forces Been Messing With the Cosmos?
['Have Dark Forces Been Messing With the Cosmos?', 'Have Dark Forces Been Messing With the Cosmos?', 'Axions? Phantom energy? Astrophysicists scramble to patch a hole in the universe, rewriting cosmic history in the process.', 'There was, you might say, a disturbance in the Force.', 'Long, long ago, when the universe was only about 100,000 years old — a buzzing, expanding mass of particles and radiation — a strange new energy field switched on. That energy suffused space with a kind of cosmic antigravity, delivering a not-so-gentle boost to the expansion of the universe.', 'Then, after another 100,000 years or so, the new field simply winked off, leaving no trace other than a speeded-up universe.', 'The cosmos is expanding only about 9 percent more quickly than theory prescribes. But this slight-sounding discrepancy has intrigued astronomers, who think it might be revealing something new about the universe.', 'And so, for the last couple of years, they have been gathering in workshops and conferences to search for a mistake or loophole in their previous measurements and calculations, so far to no avail.', 'Now ideas are popping up. Some researchers say the problem could be solved by inferring the existence of previously unknown subatomic particles. Others, such as the Johns Hopkins group, are invoking new kinds of energy fields.', 'Thus far, there is no evidence for most of these ideas. If any turn out to be right, scientists may have to rewrite the story of the origin, history and, perhaps, fate of the universe.', 'Or it could all be a mistake. Astronomers have rigorous methods to estimate the effects of statistical noise and other random errors on their results; not so for the unexamined biases called systematic errors.', 'Edwin Hubble in 1949, two decades after he discovered that the universe is expanding.', 'Generations of great astronomers have come to grief trying to measure the universe. At issue is a number called the Hubble constant, named after Edwin Hubble, the Mount Wilson astronomer who in 1929 discovered that the universe is expanding.', 'As space expands, it carries galaxies away from each other like the raisins in a rising cake. The farther apart two galaxies are, the faster they will fly away from each other. The Hubble constant simply says by how much.', 'But to calibrate the Hubble constant, astronomers depend on so-called standard candles: objects, such as supernova explosions and certain variable stars, whose distances can be estimated by luminosity or some other feature. This is where the arguing begins.', 'The discrepancy — 9 percent — sounds fatal but may not be, astronomers contend, because Planck and human astronomers do very different kinds of observations.', 'Planck is considered the gold standard of cosmology. It spent four years studying the cosmic bath of microwaves left over from the end of the Big Bang, when the universe was just 380,000 years old. But it did not measure the Hubble constant directly. Rather, the Planck group derived the value of the constant, and other cosmic parameters, from a mathematical model largely based on those microwaves.', 'In short, Planck’s Hubble constant is based on a cosmic baby picture. In contrast, the classical astronomical value is derived from what cosmologists modestly call “local measurements,” a few billion light-years deep into a middle-aged universe.', 'What if that baby picture left out or obscured some important feature of the universe?', 'And so cosmologists are off to the game that Lloyd Knox, an astrophysicist from the University of California, Davis, called “cosmological Whac-a-Mole” at the recent Chicago meeting: attempting to fix the model of the early universe, to make it expand a little faster without breaking what the model already does well.', 'A more drastic approach, from the Johns Hopkins group, invokes fields of exotic anti-gravitational energy. The idea exploits an aspect of string theory, the putative but unproven “theory of everything” that posits that the elementary constituents of reality are very tiny, wriggling strings.', "Never miss an eclipse, a meteor shower, a rocket launch or any other astronomical and space event that's out of this world.", 'String theory suggests that space could be laced with exotic energy fields associated with lightweight particles or forces yet undiscovered. Those fields, collectively called quintessence, could act in opposition to gravity, and could change over time — popping up, decaying or altering their effect, switching from repulsive to attractive.', 'The jury is still out. Dr. Riess said that the idea seems to work, which is not to say that he agrees with it, or that it is right. Nature, manifest in future observations, will have the final say.', 'Dr. Knox called the Johns Hopkins paper “an existence proof” that the Hubble problem could be solved. “I think that’s new,” he said.', 'Dr. Randall, however, has taken issue with aspects of the Johns Hopkins calculations. She and a trio of Harvard postdocs are working on a similar idea that she says works as well and is mathematically consistent. “It’s novel and very cool,” Dr. Randall said.', 'The first episode occurred when the universe was less than a trillionth of a trillionth of a second old. At that moment, cosmologists surmise, a violent ballooning propelled the Big Bang; in a fraction of a trillionth of a second, this event — named “inflation” by the cosmologist Alan Guth, of M.I.T. — smoothed and flattened the initial chaos into the more orderly universe observed today. Nobody knows what drove inflation.', 'The second episode is unfolding today: cosmic expansion is speeding up. But why? The issue came to light in 1998, when two competing teams of astronomers asked whether the collective gravity of the galaxies might be slowing the expansion enough to one day drag everything together into a Big Crunch.', 'Nobel Prize.', 'Under the influence of dark energy, the cosmos is now doubling in size every 10 billion years — to what end, nobody knows.', 'Workers with the European Planck spacecraft at the European Space Agency spaceport in Kourou, French Guiana, in 2009.', 'But if dark energy is temporary — if one day it switches off — cosmologists and metaphysicians can all go back to contemplating a sensible tomorrow.', 'But the future is still up for grabs.', 'This dire scenario emerges from the work of Guido Risaliti, of the University of Florence in Italy, and Elisabeta Lusso, of Durham University in England. For the last four years, they have plumbed the deep history of the universe, using violent, faraway cataclysms called quasars as distance markers.', 'Quasars arise from supermassive black holes at the centers of galaxies; they are the brightest objects in nature, and can be seen clear across the universe. As standard candles, quasars aren’t ideal because their masses vary widely. Nevertheless, the researchers identified some regularities in the emissions from quasars, allowing the history of the cosmos to be traced back nearly 12 billion years. The team found that the rate of cosmic expansion deviated from expectations over that time span.', 'One interpretation of the results is that dark energy is not constant after all, but is changing, growing denser and thus stronger over cosmic time. It so happens that this increase in dark energy also would be just enough to resolve the discrepancy in measurements of the Hubble constant.', 'As the universe expands, the push from phantom energy would grow without bounds, eventually overcoming gravity and tearing apart first Earth, then atoms.', 'The Hubble-constant community responded to the new report with caution. “If it holds up, this is a very interesting result,” said Dr. Freedman.', 'Astronomers have been trying to take the measure of this dark energy for two decades. Two space missions — the European Space Agency’s Euclid and NASA’s Wfirst — have been designed to study dark energy and hopefully deliver definitive answers in the coming decade. The fate of the universe is at stake.', 'In the meantime, everything, including phantom energy, is up for consideration, according to Dr. Riess.', 'Does the Universe Still Need Einstein?', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Split-Sex Animals Are Unusual, Yes, but Not as Rare as You’d Think
['From butterflies to chickens to lobsters, mixed male-female bodies offer clues as to why certain diseases strike one gender more often than the other.', 'Top left, a male blue morpho butterfly; top middle, a female. The remainder are gynandromorphic, with both male and female characteristics.', 'All serious butterfly collectors remember their first gynandromorph: a butterfly with a color and pattern that are distinctly male on one wing and female on the other.', 'He was sure that the delicate black outlines between male and female regions appearing on one wing — but not the other — identified a key facet of animal development.', 'Gynandromorph butterflies and other half-male, half-female creatures, particularly birds, have fascinated both scientists and amateurs for centuries. The latest sensation was a half-red, half-taupe cardinal that became a regular visitor in the backyard of Shirley and Jeffrey Caldwell in Erie, Pa. Although the bird would have to be tested to confirm that it is a gynandromorph, its color division strongly suggests that it is, scientists say.', 'Mammals have X and Y chromosomes, birds and insects have Z and W, and some reptiles can change their sex depending on temperature, or a combination of temperature and sex chromosomes, she said.', 'A chicken with bilateral gynandromorphism.', 'How gynandromorphs are born at all still remains a mystery. For birds, the most likely explanation is that a female makes an unusual double-nucleus egg cell, one with a Z chromosome and one with a W chromosome, and each is fertilized by a Z sperm, making some cells ZZ and others ZW in the same individual, Dr. Arnold said.', 'It’s impossible to track an entire population to understand what percentage have unusual sex chromosomes, Dr. Patel said. In the lab, scientists have used radiation to create gynandromorph flies, he said, but it is difficult to sort out the potential causes — including environmental harm — in a wild population.', 'Why cells of opposite sex end up on opposite sides of these gynandromorphs remains unclear, Dr. Arnold said. “I don’t have a good explanation,” he said.', 'Animals can also develop as mosaics, with some cells genetically different from others. Some of Dr. Patel’s butterflies, for instance, show male coloration and patterns on parts of a wing, rather than the entire side.', 'From left, a male Pamela butterfly, a mosaic gynandromorph and a female.', 'Obesity, metabolic syndrome, autoimmune disease, Alzheimer’s, even aging differs by sex, Dr. Arnold noted. Twenty years ago, he said, scientists didn’t think that sex chromosomes played any role at all in causing sex differences in these diseases. “But now we know it makes a difference in mice, so we can say: Where does it make a difference in humans?” he said.', 'Like the Science Times page on Facebook.', 'Science Times newsletter.', 'Most people have 46 chromosomes, with 23 inherited from each parent. A few chromosomes can come with an extra copy, including chromosomes 13, 18 and 21 — which is commonly called Down syndrome. Losing any chromosome other than a second sex chromosome is always lethal to a fetus.', 'But the sex chromosome is the only one that people can survive with just one copy, Dr. Graves said. “Girls with a single X and no Y suffer few anomalies because the second X is largely inactive anyway. After all, males have only one X,” she said.', 'It is not clear what mechanisms the body has to ensure that most men get only one Y and most women get two X chromosomes, said Karissa Sanbonmatsu, a structural biologist and principal investigator at Los Alamos National Laboratory in New Mexico. In typical females, one X is usually — but not always — turned off, she said, and some research suggests that there is a mechanism that counts how many X chromosomes are present and generally turns off all but one of them.', 'People with androgen insensitivity syndrome, for instance, are born with XY chromosomes, but develop as female, because their cells cannot process male hormones. “So, it’s as if the testosterone doesn’t exist,” she said. They are infertile.', 'The more science learns about sex, “the more we find anomalies,” said Alice Dreger, a historian of sexuality.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Matter: DNA Gets a New — and Bigger — Genetic Alphabet
['In 1985, the chemist Steven A. Benner sat down with some colleagues and a notebook and sketched out a way to expand the alphabet of DNA. He has been trying to make those sketches real ever since.', "Crafting the four new bases that don't exist in nature was a chemical tour-de-force. They fit neatly into DNA’s double helix, and enzymes can read them as easily as natural bases, in order to make molecules.", 'Hachimoji DNA could have many applications, including a far more durable way to store digital data that could last for centuries. “This could be huge that way,” said Dr. Nicholas V. Hud, a biochemist at Georgia Institute of Technology who was not involved in research.', 'It also raises a profound question about the nature of life elsewhere in the universe, offering the possibility that the four-base DNA we are familiar with may not be the only chemistry that could support life.', 'Like the Science Times page on Facebook.', 'Science Times newsletter.', 'The four natural bases of DNA are all anchored to molecular backbones. A pair of backbones can join into a double helix because their bases are attracted to each other. The bases form a bond with their hydrogen atoms.', 'But bases don’t stick together at random. C can only bond to G, and A can only bond to T. These strict rules help ensure that DNA strands don’t clump together into a jumble. No matter what sequence of bases are contained in natural DNA, it still keeps its shape.', 'But those four bases are not the only compounds that can attach to DNA’s backbone and link to another base — at least on paper. Dr. Benner and his colleagues thought up a dozen alternatives.', 'Working at the Swiss university ETH Zurich at the time, Dr. Benner tried to make some of those imaginary bases real.', 'Once Dr. Benner and his colleagues combined real atoms, according to his designs, the artificial bases didn’t work as he had hoped.', 'Reading about Dr. Benner’s early experiments, Dr. Romesberg decided to try to create his own bases.', 'In the years that followed, Dr. Romesberg and his colleagues fashioned enzymes that could copy DNA made from both natural bases and unnatural, oily ones.', 'In recent years, Dr. Romesberg’s team has begun making unnatural proteins from these unnatural genes. He founded a company, Synthorx, to develop some of these proteins as cancer drugs.', 'They then went on to create a second pair of new bases. Now with eight bases to play with, the researchers started building DNA molecules with a variety of different sequences. The researchers found that no matter which sequence they created, the molecules still formed the standard double helix.', 'Because Hachimoji DNA held onto this shape, it could act like regular DNA: it could store information, and that information could be read to make a molecule.', 'For a cell, the first step in making a molecule is to read a gene using special enzymes. They make a copy of the gene in a single-stranded version of DNA, called RNA.', 'Depending on the gene, the cell will then do one of two things with that RNA. In some cases, it will use the RNA as a guide to build a protein. But in other cases, the RNA molecule floats off to do a job of its own.', 'Dr. Benner and his colleagues created a Hachimoji gene for an RNA molecule. They predicted that the RNA molecule would be able to grab a molecule called a fluorophore. Cradled by the RNA molecule, the fluorophore would absorb light and release it as a green flash.', 'Andrew Ellington, an evolutionary engineer at the University of Texas, led the effort to find an enzyme that could read Hachimoji DNA. He and his colleagues found a promising one made by a virus, and they tinkered with it until the enzyme could easily read all eight bases.', 'They mixed the enzyme in test tubes with the Hachimoji gene. As they had hoped, their test tubes began glowing green.', 'In the future, Hachimoji DNA may store information of a radically different sort. It might someday encode a movie or a spreadsheet.', 'Today, movies, spreadsheets and other digital files are typically stored on silicon chips or magnetic tapes. But those kinds of storage have serious shortcomings. For one thing, they can deteriorate in just years.', 'DNA, by contrast, can remain intact for centuries.', 'With eight bases instead of four, Hachimoji DNA could potentially encode far more information. “DNA capable of twice as much storage? That’s pretty amazing in my view,” said Dr. Ellington.', 'Beyond our current need for storage, Hachimoji DNA also offers some clues about life itself. Scientists have long wondered if our DNA evolved only four bases because they’re the only ones that can work in genes. Could life have taken a different path?', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Oscars Red Carpet 2019: Stars Arriving at the 91st Academy Awards
['Lady Gaga, nominated for best actress in a leading role for “A Star Is Born.” She is wearing Alexander McQueen.', 'All the looks from Hollywood’s biggest night.']


Scene City: Rami Malek, Lady Gaga, Mahershala Ali and Regina King Celebrate Their Oscars at the Governors Ball
['After the Oscars ceremony, the stars took escalators up to the Governors Ball for the official after-party. Rami Malek, who won best actor for his role in “Bohemian Rhapsody,” sprayed champagne in the engraving room. “You’re all going to get wet,” he yelled.', 'Newly minted Oscar winners get their trophies engraved at the official Oscars after-party.']


The Story of Best Actress Oscar Winner Olivia Colman’s Gown
['That Mary would be Mary Fellowes, a fellow Brit and a stylist who has worked for 11 Vogue titles and has dressed the actresses Tracee Ellis Ross, Liv Tyler and Amy Adams, among others, over the course of almost two decades.', 'When Prada agreed to make her Oscars gown, Ms. Colman knew she wanted a giant bow on the back.', 'The embroidery on the Prada gown took a dozen artisans more than 300 hours to complete.', 'Mary Fellowes, a creative director and stylist, at her home in London.', 'But initial calls to big-name luxury brands for ready-to-wear outfits in the early stages of their partnership “did not get what I felt to be a satisfying response,” Ms. Fellowes said as she sat at her kitchen table in London, immaculate in polished black leather and oversize cat’s-eye spectacles.', 'New friends are made.', 'Suddenly, the balance of power had shifted, and the two women found themselves able to pick and choose. So they raised the stakes. They decided that if Ms. Colman was going to endorse a brand by wearing it on the red carpet, it should have associations that mattered to her. It should ideally be, for example, family-owned; make efforts toward sustainability; and maybe involve another working mother (Ms. Colman has three children).', 'Emilia Wickstead gown worn by Ms. Colman when she won the best actress Bafta this month, and the caped black Stella McCartney dress (made with recycled bamboo) that Ms. Colman wore to scoop up the Golden Globe in the same category in January.', 'Mary Fellowes inspects the gown.', 'When it came to the Oscars ceremony dress, Ms. Fellowes said, there was one house in particular that she believed would check all their boxes: strong, intelligent voice; distinctive visual codes; and shared values. So what did she do when that brand called to say yes, it would make a bespoke gown for Ms. Colman for the Academy Awards?', 'The two women then drew pictures of dream dresses in the car on the way to the Palm Springs International Film Festival. Ms. Fellowes had brought along a file of Prada dresses, fabrics and embroidery from years gone by. Ms. Colman said she knew she wanted simple, with a big bow on the back. The Prada atelier set about making their shared vision a reality.', 'Many years ago — early in Ms. Colman’s career, during her bachelorette party in Paris — she and her friends stumbled into a Prada boutique. At the time, she remembered, she declared: “One day, when I have finally made it, I will wear a Prada dress.” By any measure, that day has come.', 'Elizabeth Paton is a reporter for the Styles section, covering the fashion and luxury sectors in Europe. Before joining The Times in 2015, she was a reporter at the Financial Times both in London and New York.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Lady Gaga’s Long Road to That Giant Diamond Necklace
['I miss the meat dress — but what a diamond on the Oscars red carpet!', 'When was it decided that to be taken seriously as an actress you need to dress in serious couture? I’m asking because I never got the memo, but clearly, Lady Gaga and her styling team did.', 'Plus, rumor has it that her Tiffany deal is the biggest red carpet jewelry deal ever signed.', 'At the 2010 MTV Video Music Awards, in her infamous meat dress.', 'At The Brit Awards in 2010.', 'Lady Gaga arriving inside an egg at the Grammy Awards in 2011.', 'It is, of course, entirely Gaga’s right to mutate every few years into a new persona, both artistically and stylistically. In fact, such mutation is part of her identity. This is, after all, the woman who once emerged from a giant egg, above, at the Grammys. She claimed to have been marinating inside it for approximately three days.', 'And to be fair, her fashionization has probably been coming for awhile. We should have seen it coming when she accepted the 2016 Golden Globe for best actress in a limited series for her role in “American Horror Story,” wearing Marilyn Monroe-esque black velvet Versace.', 'Tom Eerebout.', 'Lady Gaga attends the 2013 American Music Awards.', 'Maybe we should chalk it up to growing up. It’s not fair to demand our superstars remain rebels forever. It’s probably not even possible.', 'And yet. And yet. I find myself waxing nostalgic about those weird horn implants she had for awhile under her skin. I miss the crazy hoof-like shoes. I never thought I would say that, but there you go.', 'Once upon an Oscars we, the watching public, thought Bjork and her famous swan dress were as wild as it was going to get, but just imagine what early Gaga could have done with current Gaga’s red carpet moments.', 'The mind boggles.', 'Also, just imagine what Ryan Seacrest would have done with any of those particular fashion moments. They might actually have rendered him speechless. Which would have been a small step for one woman, and a big step for womankind.', 'Lady Gaga on the Oscars red carpet in 2015.', 'And on the Oscars red carpet in 2016.', 'Kate Hudson and Lady Gaga at the Met Gala in 2016.', 'At the 2017 Grammy Awards.', 'At an event in Los Angeles in October 2018.', 'At an event in Los Angeles in November 2018.', 'At the Venice Film Festival in August 2018.', 'At the Toronto International Film Festival in 2018.', 'At the premiere of “A Star Is Born” in Los Angeles in 2018.', 'At the Golden Globe Awards in 2019.', 'Gaga could have helped them break the yoke, which everyone says lies so heavy on their shoulders, of red carpet conformity. Forced us all to wrestle with our own preconceptions about what beauty and stardom really means. Helped fashion expand its own thinking. Challenged the status quo instead of pandering to it. Proved with a wink that her most recent incarnation was simply a character she had played to perfection (give her an award for that!).', 'Because the thing is, if she is to be believed, she wasn’t born this way.', 'At an event in New York in January 2019.', 'At the Critics’ Choice Awards in January.', 'At the Screen Actors Guild Awards in 2019.', 'At the 2019 Grammy Awards in February.', "Vanessa Friedman is The Times's fashion director and chief fashion critic. She was previously the fashion editor of the Financial Times.", 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Spike Lee’s Tribute to Prince at the Oscars
['Spike Lee’s Prince-symbol necklace is gold, framed in diamonds with an opal, and his gold Jordans were commissioned by Michael Jordan.', 'Mr. Lee won his first Academy Award, as his film "BlacKkKlansman" received the Oscar for best adapted screenplay.', 'The day that Prince died in April 2016, Spike Lee threw a celebration of his friend’s life. On a brick townhouse-lined street in Fort Greene, Brooklyn, hundreds of people gathered in the street, as Mr. Lee blasted song after song from the steps of his building. He played deep cuts and greatest hits, as neighbors wept and sang along into the night.', 'Mr. Lee on the red carpet.', 'Mr. Scognamiglio first met Mr. Lee about a year ago and the two have become friends; the director can often be seen sporting the artisan’s oversized jewelry.', 'The last time he saw his friend was after a performance of the musical “Hamilton,” Mr. Lee’s seventh time seeing it.', 'After the show, Mr. Lee said he went backstage and cast members told him that they were going to an after-party hosted by Prince.', 'The song was recovered by Troy Carter, a friend of Mr. Lee’s who is an adviser to the Prince estate (and who also used to manage Lady Gaga). Mr. Carter called Mr. Lee and told him that among the thousands of disorganized cassettes that the musician had left behind, one had been found that featured just Prince and a piano.', 'He does not think that finding the tape was a coincidence.', 'Jonah Bromwich is based in New York. He writes for the Style section.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


New Ultima Thule Photos Were Made in a Flash
['The images were recorded while the New Horizons spacecraft was moving at more than 32,000 miles per hour.', 'An animation made with 14 images of the object nicknamed Ultima Thule taken by the New Horizons spacecraft during its New Year’s Eve flyby.', 'When NASA’s New Horizons spacecraft flew by a small distant world on New Year’s Eve, it tried to use one of its cameras to capture the highest-resolution images that were possible. Pulling this off presented risks.', 'On Friday, mission scientists announced success.', 'A new, higher-resolution image of Ultima Thule captured by the New Horizons spacecraft.', 'Ultima Thule is a pristine leftover from the earliest days of the solar system.', 'The images have a resolution of about 33 meters, or 110 feet, per pixel. However, because of the rolling of the spacecraft needed to make proper use of the spacecraft’s lower resolution panoramic camera, in addition to the long exposures required by the dim light that far from sun, the images were blurred.', 'Still, even the subtle improvements will give better understanding of the pits and bright patterns on Ultima Thule’s surface. A clearer look at the rims of the pits might help tell whether they are small impact craters or they formed from erosion, for example. Counting craters could reveal the rate of collisions in this distant part of the solar system, while erosion would hold clues to what Ultima Thule is made of.', 'An earlier version of this article misstated the reason that images taken by the New Horizons spacecraft were somewhat blurred. It was the motion of the spacecraft needed for a lower resolution camera and the longer exposure times because of low light that caused blurring, not the speed of the spacecraft.', 'Kenneth Chang has been at The Times since 2000, writing about physics, geology, chemistry, and the planets. Before becoming a science writer, he was a graduate student whose research involved the control of chaos.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Virgin Galactic Sends a Rocket Plane to Space Again, in Its Highest Flight Yet
['This was Virgin Galactic’s fifth supersonic-powered test flight. The venture marked another step forward in a new kind of space race.', 'After its first spaceflight in December, Virgin Galactic sent the same vessel past the edge of the atmosphere for a second time on Friday. This time, the rocket plane went higher and faster than before — and it had three crew members on board instead of two.', 'The flight marked another step forward in a new kind of space race — one that aims to allow private citizens (who can afford the ticket) an opportunity to exit our atmosphere.', 'It was the company’s fifth supersonic-powered test flight, and it reached an altitude of nearly 56 miles before returning safely to the Mojave Desert runway in California where it took off. Beth Moses, an astronaut trainer and microgravity research expert, was in the cabin as the company’s first test passenger in space.', 'Unity reached Mach 3 — three times the speed of sound — before the rocket motor was switched off shortly before 9 a.m. Then the vessel coasted to its highest altitude of 55.87 miles above sea level. Two tail booms rotated into a “feathered” position to create drag, allowing the vessel to fall gently back into the atmosphere and, ultimately, glide toward the runway.', 'The Virgin Galactic spaceship VSS Unity, with the chief pilot Dave Mackay, the co-pilot Michael Masucci and Beth Moses, an astronaut trainer and microgravity research expert, as it flew to space on Friday.', 'George T. Whitesides, the chief executive of Virgin Galactic, said the research conducted on the flight focused not only on the vessel’s trajectory, but also on the passenger experience.', 'Ms. Moses’ job was to evaluate how passengers might experience a trip in the cabin. She observed the light, the temperature and the feeling of moving around in zero gravity. In an interview after the flight, she said it felt comfortable, and the view was beautiful.', 'According to Virgin Galactic, the vehicle made its second successful space flight, with three crew members aboard. Powered by a hybrid rocket motor, VSS Unity reached Mach 3 and a high altitude of nearly 56 miles above Earth.', 'Ventures like these are more useful for testing the limits of tourism than for advancing scientific research, said Jonathan McDowell, an astrophysicist at the Harvard-Smithsonian Center for Astrophysics. He said the Virgin flights could be used to conduct microgravity tests or equipment checks.', 'And the three people on board — two pilots, David Mackay and Michael Masucci, and Ms. Moses — got the vantage point of a lifetime.', "Never miss an eclipse, a meteor shower, a rocket launch or any other astronomical and space event that's out of this world.", 'In an interview after the flight, Mr. Mackay commented on how quickly the sky turned black once the atmosphere faded, and Mr. Masucci said he was astonished by the sight of a very bright moon. They said the flight was amazing, but not frightening.', 'Virgin Galactic is expected to keep doing test flights and making improvements in terms of safety, altitude and weight capacity. It is still unclear when private citizens — including the more than 600 who have already bought tickets — will be allowed to take a ride.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Japan’s Hayabusa2 Spacecraft Lands on Ryugu Asteroid
['The probe ascended from the space rock after firing a bullet to help with the gathering of samples that will eventually be returned to Earth.', 'The shadow of Japan’s Hayabusa2 spacecraft cast over the asteroid Ryugu last year.', 'Tonight, a Japanese spacecraft completed a touchdown on the surface of an asteroid, where it fired a projectile at the rock’s surface rock. A successful mission could help advance understanding of how our planet formed in the early solar system.', 'What did Hayabusa2 do when it landed?', 'Hayabusa2 tried to collect material from the rugged surface of the asteroid with a device called a sampler horn.', 'Scientists fired a metal projectile into a gravel to simulate conditions on the asteroid Ryugu.', 'The spacecraft is carrying multiple projectiles so it can make more than one attempt at a touchdown. In March or April, Hayabusa2 is also expected to send an explosive package called a Small Carry-on Impactor to Ryugu’s surface to make an artificial crater. Hayabusa2 might collect another sample of the material exposed in the crater.', 'Why are they studying this asteroid?', 'Asteroids are bits and pieces leftover from the disc of gas and dust that formed around the young sun and never quite coalesced into a planet. They contain some almost pristine compounds that help tell what the early solar system was like 4.5 billion years ago.', 'Ryugu, as dark as coal, is a C-type, or carbonaceous, asteroid, meaning it is full of carbon molecules known as organics including possibly amino acids, the building blocks of proteins. Such molecules are not always associated with biology and can form from chemical reactions in deep space, but asteroids could have seeded Earth with the organic matter that led to life.', 'About three-quarters of asteroids in the solar system fall into the C-type.', 'Japan’s Hayabusa2 spacecraft is exploring Ryugu, an asteroid thought to contain material from the early solar system.', 'This space rock was discovered in 1999 and not given a name until 2015. Ryugu is named after Ryugu-jo, or dragon’s palace — a magical undersea palace in a Japanese folk tale.', 'Isn’t NASA doing something like this too?', 'Yes. The Osiris-Rex spacecraft is currently surveying another carbon-rich asteroid known as Bennu, and it too will collect samples and return them to Earth. Bennu is even smaller than Ryugu, about 500 yards wide. Osiris-rex will not return with its samples until 2023.', 'NASA and Japanese scientists plan to exchange samples of the two asteroids to compare the similarities and differences.', 'Has Japan done this before?', 'As the 2 in Hayabusa2 indicates, this is the second time that JAXA, the Japanese space agency, has sent a spacecraft to an asteroid.', 'Hayabusa2 is an improved version of Hayabusa, which visited a stony asteroid, Itokawa, in 2005. Despite several technical problems at Itokawa, Hayabusa returned a capsule to Earth in 2010 containing 1,500 particles from the asteroid.', 'Michael Roston is the senior staff editor for science. He was previously a social media editor for The Times and a home page producer.', 'Kenneth Chang has been at The Times since 2000, writing about physics, geology, chemistry, and the planets. Before becoming a science writer, he was a graduate student whose research involved the control of chaos.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


How Israel’s Moon Lander Got to the Launchpad
["SpaceIL's Beresheet spacecraft, with technicians and the company's C.E.O., Ido Anteby, second left, in December.", 'The privately built spacecraft will take a long trip to the moon, landing on its surface in April.', 'The challenge turned out to be much harder and much more expensive.', 'Yariv Bash, a co-founder of SpaceIL, which from its outset had an educational mission to inspire Israeli students to take an interest in space and engineering.', 'SpaceIL had given itself a mission, to inspire students in Israel to take an interest in science and engineering.', 'Beresheet will not take the quick, direct path to the moon. That would require a fuel-guzzling firing of a large engine to break out of Earth orbit and then another to slow down at the moon. Instead, with several engine firings, the spacecraft will slowly adjust its orbit, stretching to the outermost point until the moon’s gravity pulls it into lunar orbit.', 'That is a long and winding, four million mile-long journey to reach a destination that is a quarter million miles away.', 'In April, it is to land at a lava plain named Mare Serenitatis, or the Sea of Serenity. An instrument built by the Weizmann Institute of Science will measure the moon’s magnetic fields as it approaches, and that data could help give clear hints about the moon’s iron core.', 'Within a few days of its landing, Beresheet is expected to succumb to the heat of lunar noon. Then, its mission will end.', 'The price tag to build and launch Beresheet ended up at $100 million, not $10 million, and the spacecraft bulked up to 1,300 pounds including fuel. The SpaceIL founders point out that this is still much cheaper and smaller than what a space agency like NASA would build.', "Opher Doron, right, Israel Aerospace Industries's space division general manager, during a final drill in the control room in Yehud before the launch.", 'Kfir Damari, a SpaceIL co-founder. “We didn’t imagine, I think, how much time and effort it would take,” he said.', 'Yonatan Winetraub, who, with Mr. Bash and Mr. Damari, scrounged for the $50,000 entry fee and entered the paperwork within two hours of the Lunar X Prize deadline.', 'Back in November 2010, it was a rush for the SpaceIL founders just to get to the starting line. The Google competition had been announced three years earlier. About 30 teams had already entered, and the deadline for submissions was the end of the year. From friends and family, Mr. Bash, Mr. Damari and Mr. Winetraub scrounged $50,000 for the entry fee, and on Dec. 31, they sent in the money and the paperwork with less than two hours to spare.', 'From the beginning, their pitch was geared to philanthropists, not venture capitalists.', 'As full-fledged development started, Mr. Kahn brought in Eran Privman, who had been an executive at his companies, to run the organization.', 'A few months later, Mr. Kahn returned, replacing Mr. Privman with Ido Anteby, a longtime manager at the Israel Atomic Energy Commission, to shepherd the final construction and testing of Beresheet.', 'Mr. Kahn agreed to provide any remaining money needed.', "Morris Kahn, the company's president.", 'And now SpaceIL is approaching its end in a few months. “A day after, all of us will need to look for a job,” said Eran Shmidt, deputy manager of SpaceIL.', 'Israel Aerospace Industries has signed an agreement with OHB System, a German satellite manufacturer, to compete for the European work, and Mr. Doron said the company is in discussion about collaborating with some of the NASA-selected companies.', 'The SpaceIL founders have largely moved on. Mr. Winetraub is now a graduate student at Stanford, pursuing a doctorate in cancer research. Mr. Bash is chief executive of Flytrex, a company developing drones to deliver consumer goods. Mr. Damari is chief product and strategy officer for Tabookey, a cybersecurity start-up.', 'When they started SpaceIL at the bar, they were all single. “We were in a really different place back then,” Mr. Damari said.', 'On Thursday, he was in Florida to watch the launch with his wife and two children. “I never imagined my big boy is five years old and actually the age he will remember,” Mr. Damari said.', "The mission control room in Yehud during a last drill before Thursday's launch.", 'If No One Owns the Moon, Can Anyone Make Money Up There?', "An earlier version of this article misstated the English name of Mare Serenitatis, the part of the moon where SpaceIL's Beresheet spacecraft will land. It is the Sea of Serenity, not the Sea of Tranquility.", 'Kenneth Chang has been at The Times since 2000, writing about physics, geology, chemistry, and the planets. Before becoming a science writer, he was a graduate student whose research involved the control of chaos.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Trilobites: Tiny Tyrannosaur Hints at How T. Rex Became King
['The deer-sized dinosaur preceded one of Earth’s most fearsome predators.', 'A new species of dinosaur, a tiny relative of the Tyrannosaurus rex, called Moros intrepidus, lived 96 million years ago and its fossils were found in central Utah.', 'Tyrannosaurs weren’t always tyrants. For millions of years, the ancestors of the regal T. rex were relegated to second-class predator status while a different dinosaur dynasty ruled over what is now North America: towering allosaurs.', 'To better understand how and when tyrannosaurs became giants, paleontologists have sought examples of their lineage from when they were small. Their latest discovery is a tiny tyrannosaur that lived in the shadow of larger predators some 96 million years ago.', 'Like the Science Times page on Facebook.', 'Science Times newsletter.', 'In 2012 while Dr. Zanno was fossil hunting in central Utah, she noticed a dinosaur leg bone sticking out from a rocky hillside. The next year she and her team excavated the fossilized remains. Although the bones were poorly preserved, she could tell by how thin they were that they belonged to a theropod, which is the major group of carnivorous dinosaurs that include allosaurs and tyrannosaurs.', 'The upper leg bones of Moros intrepidus.', 'The next steps were to find whether the tiny tyrannosaur belonged to a new species or was a juvenile of a known species.', 'The fossilized leg bone was sticking out from a hillside in central Utah.', 'Nicholas St. Fleur is a science reporter who writes about archaeology, paleontology, space and other topics. He joined The Times in 2015. Before that, he was an assistant editor at The Atlantic.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Neptune Has a Newly Discovered Moon. What Else Is It Hiding?
['Neptune Has a Newly Discovered Moon. What Else Is It Hiding?', 'Neptune Has a Newly Discovered Moon. What Else Is It Hiding?', 'There is much more to learn about the solar system’s eighth planet, which hasn’t been visited by a spacecraft for 30 years.', 'A recent image taken by the Hubble Space Telescope of the planet Neptune, whose tally of moons has been upped to 14 in a new paper.', 'It’s time to add one more tiny moon to Neptune’s icy family tree. Astronomers using the Hubble Space Telescope have spied a previously undetected satellite around the solar system’s eighth planet, bringing its total number to 14.', 'That’s especially true for Uranus and Neptune, which are known as the ice giants. While every other planet in our solar system has been poked and prodded by multiple spacecraft, these two remain largely unexplored.', 'Mark Showalter, a researcher at the SETI Institute in Mountain View, Calif., did not set out to make this discovery. He was analyzing Neptune’s rings with a new technique to process old images that essentially twisted them while adding them together. That allowed him to better see the rings, which are both faint and quick-moving.', 'On a whim, he decided to apply that same technique to other parts of the image he produced. To his surprise, a tiny white dot appeared.', 'Further analyses have confirmed that it is a moon, and a rather odd one.', 'An image made by the Hubble Space Telescope in 2004, showing Neptune and some of its moons — including Hippocamp — at right. Hippocamp is also shown enlarged in the inset image top right.', 'When Voyager 2 zipped past Neptune in 1989, it revealed a dynamic world with winds that whip and churn through its atmosphere at speeds as high as 1,500 miles per hour. Its blue atmosphere was also marked by a dark blemish nicknamed the Great Dark Spot. And while it was reminiscent of Jupiter’s Red Spot, which has remained intact for hundreds of years, Neptune’s spot vanished roughly five years later. In the years since, other blemishes have come and gone — each a mystery.', 'As are Neptune’s rings and moons. From Earth, the rings appear to clump together into partial rings, or arcs, unseen elsewhere in the solar system and previously thought impossible (any such material in orbit around the planet should stretch into a continuous ring). But Neptune’s arcs persist and astronomers can’t say why.', 'Only a closer look could explain these mysteries.', 'Studying Neptune and Uranus could also have implications for our understanding of thousands of worlds detected in orbit around distant stars.', 'Astronomers, however, think the tide is turning. In a survey produced every 10 years by an expert committee that ranks funding priorities for NASA, a mission to the ice giants was ranked third after missions that would return samples from Mars and visit Jupiter’s moon Europa. Given that scientists have made headway on the first two, a mission to these blue orbs might have good prospects in the near future.', 'It’s the Solar System’s Most Distant Object. Astronomers Named It Farout.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


All the Pink Dresses on the Oscars Red Carpet in One Handy Place
['Julia Roberts, Gemma Chan and Helen Mirren were among many at the Academy Awards clad in pink. Let’s look!', 'Pink, a color famously associated with a generation of people who are no longer young, had a star turn at the Academy Awards tonight!', 'What follows are pictures of people (actors) wearing pink on the red carpet, along with some commentary from people (writers) on Twitter about the #trend.', 'Julia Roberts didn’t show up until the end — when she presented the award for Best Picture — but she wore the color of the night, with heels to match.', 'Helen Mirren, wearing a long-sleeve layered number with accordion pleats, gave us grown-up princess vibes.', "Helen Mirren, you're a dream!", 'We loved the mix of modern prairie-style and toxic Pepto-Bismol pink worn by the illustrious Gemma Chan.', 'Linda Cardellini, another person who heard the call of the fashion gods (who, thus, spake and said: “Wear pink”).', 'Linda Cardellini, wrapped up like a package.', 'Was it all a statement?', 'Marie Kondo, looking sparkly and tidy.', 'Here is more pink, courtesy of Angela Bassett. Bow down.', 'Angela Bassett, a queen in all shades, but especially fuschia.', 'Sarah Paulson’s hot pink cutout dress might ... have ... had ... pockets?', 'Sarah Paulson, glam.', 'Hey, even this couple wore pink!', 'Jason Momoa and Lisa Bonet in dusty pink tones.', 'And here’s Awkwafina with a sparkly pink suit. We love it!', 'Awkwafina, hiiii!', 'But wait there’s more.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


When Will the End of Gender Arrive on the Red Carpet?
['When Will the End of Gender Arrive on the Red Carpet?', 'When Will the End of Gender Arrive on the Red Carpet?', 'With Billy Porter, Elsie Fisher and a few others at the Oscars tonight, the red carpet is only barely starting to discover a fabulous third way to be.', 'The 2019 Oscars red carpets got off to an exciting start early with the arrival of the actor Billy Porter in a flowing Christian Siriano design.', 'Billy Porter, being adjusted on the red carpet.', 'The designer tweeted out video of the gown in action. Then Mr. Porter went off to commentate for ABC with a big sparkly cocktail ring on his finger.', 'Anddddd flip!!', 'Elsie Fisher, the 15-year-old star of the film “Eighth Grade,” showed up in a three-piece suit. This is a daring look — simply because vests are not generally a hot red carpet look. That’s what’s very bold here!', 'Elsie Fisher.', 'It was also something of a surprise that the fashion was so traditional considering Timothée Chalamet and Michael B. Jordan showed up on red carpets earlier this year in harnesses that some found gender-disruptive in a way that no one could quite put their finger on — and in a way that women in suits are not.', 'What is gender? We do not know. Apparently people can wear anything!', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Fashion Review: No Sex, No Politics, No Risk
['Ferragamo and Missoni paid homage to family values. Armani played a rhapsody in blue. Versace celebrated grunge. And then there was Marni.', 'MILAN — The awards red carpet is not the only fashion show that seems to have fallen relatively silent on the subject of #MeToo: the runways, which in recent seasons focused broadly on a redefinition of female empowerment, at least as far as it relates to image, have almost entirely dropped that theme.', 'Instead, they were dominated by — family values! Not of the far-right kind; of the most branded, uncontroversial, personal/company history kind.', 'You can understand it: The past is so much more predictable than the fuzzy danger of whatever is to come. But it doesn’t always make for the most compelling clothes, even if both men and women are walking the runway. Especially when viewed through a sepia-tinged lens.', 'Or one washed in electric aquamarine. See Missoni, where the whole room was bathed in a cerulean light meant to represent a “door that connects different moments in the history of a fashion house,” like a magical wormhole in space and time leading to a moment in the mid-1970s (according to the show notes) when women wore enveloping striped capes, chunky zigzag coats, thin swishy trousers and long metallic sheaths. Also arm warmers, big neck doilies and little rolled-brim beanie caps. And men sported a lot of chevrons.', 'Don’t like the abstracted tiger print in blue, brown and cream that Paul Surridge created at Roberto Cavalli (which might have looked like sine waves or topographic lines if you didn’t know the house’s history)? Here it is in black and white. Or in pastels. You can have it as a high/low dress or a suit or a long-sleeved turtleneck and pleated midi skirt. Or you can forget all about it and try on a python tailcoat. Or a white tux.', 'At least at his own dual gender show, Giorgio Armani went all-in for one idea. That the idea happened to be (drumroll, please) blue! somewhat lessened its impact, but give him credit for stick-to-it-ness.', 'There were neat black jackets, with a slim squiggle of blue running down the center, over jodhpur pants. Trapeze swings of black and blue with rosettes encrusted around the hem. Glossy black velvet and one-shouldered beaded tops. More jodhpurs. More variations on the theme in minutely detailed bows and swirls and swags. Assorted tuxes. It was all very 50 shades of classic Armani, the executive kind.', 'While at Versace, it was very grunge, the defanged kind.', 'Which is why it was something of a relief to discover that Stella Jean, the most convincing of all the New Gen designers in Milan, had the courage to take an old trope — Le Grand Tour — and break out of its Eurocentric mold. She reimagined it as an experience that included Africa and Polynesia, with establishment silks and stripes and Gauguin references; red leather giraffes roaming across a field of python-print jersey.', 'And that, at Marni, Francesco Risso had eschewed decade-hopping and heritage-referencing to actually dare to delve into the scary subject: eroticism.', 'Indecipherable? So, kind of, was the collection, which was full of contradictory impulses and a frenetic undone-ness: slithery red and white and black pajama silks and nightgowns, sliced-up suiting, pixelated prints; and connected in odd ways by rows of rings and chain link harnesses, twists and turns.', 'Sometimes the contortions were hard to follow. But at least he is trying for something new, trying to figure out where we go from here. Trying to give women (he has not combined his collections) a new, as opposed to old, way to express themselves.', 'That’s what has been missing from Milan most of the week: that kind of ambition, that kind of willingness to take risks. So you stumble. So what? That’s how we fall into the future. And when we do, we need something to wear.', "Vanessa Friedman is The Times's fashion director and chief fashion critic. She was previously the fashion editor of the Financial Times.", 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


The San Vicente Bungalows: Hollywood’s New Clubhouse
['Jeff Klein’s latest hotel project protects celebrities and power brokers with a ban on cameraphones.', 'Throwing shade: Privacy is the primary luxury of the space, a former druggie motel.', 'WEST HOLLYWOOD, Calif. — The problem with stardom, most any star will tell you, is you can’t turn it off anymore. Certain protocols used to apply when it came to sightings of famous folk in public. But that was in the bygone days of the Brown Derby or Chasen’s, about a billion “creepshots” ago.', 'Now, of course, it is next to impossible for people like Jennifer Aniston or Justin Timberlake to do the boringly normal stuff the rest of us take for granted. And that realization was at the core of an idea the hotelier Jeffrey Klein had for a personal second act.', 'After more than a decade operating the celebrity petting zoo that is Sunset Tower Hotel and its now-storied Tower Bar, Mr. Klein understood better than most that the one craving that famous people cannot satisfy is to get their anonymity back.', 'It has been 15 years since Mr. Klein and his partners paid $18 million for the Sunset Tower, a faded Art Deco relic on a stretch of Sunset Strip that, although now booming, had fallen into funky desuetude. Against most odds and all prevailing wisdom, he soon established it and its Tower Bar restaurant as essential landmarks of the new Hollywood.', 'The Tower Bar, in particular, quickly evolved into the preferred watering hole of studio moguls, literary agents, fashion designers, power brokers and A-list movie stars, who prized Mr. Klein’s ability to reconcile the paradox that the famous experience the same giddiness we all do when exposed to others of their kind. Unlike ordinary mortals, though, they also yearn to recapture the privacy whose loss is the price tag of modern celebrity.', 'Jeff Klein at the entrance of his new venture.', 'Instead Mr. Klein pursued a challenge equal to that first presented by the Sunset Tower. “I like dumps, and I like places with ghosts,” he said. Both, as it happened, were to be found under his nose at a druggie, clothing-optional motel complex blocks away from Sunset Tower in West Hollywood, a cluster of bungalows erected in the late 19th century as housing for workers laying railway lines to the coast.', 'Not everyone would have detected in this collection of listing frame structures the potential for a private club that would make getting into Tower Bar seem almost as easy as grabbing a booth at IHOP.', 'But Mr. Klein had long nurtured a dream of recreating in Los Angeles a members-only gathering place on the order of Annabel’s, a London nightclub founded in 1963 in what had been a coal cellar by the aristocratic British entrepreneur Mark Birley and distinguished by a clientele that, over the years, included royals and Frank Sinatra, Aristotle Onassis and Kate Moss.', 'Not coincidentally, this interest coincided with a growing trend in Los Angeles, as elsewhere, for people to come together in upscale public settings not unlike social versions of a gated community.', 'Clubs are far from new in Los Angeles, of course, their long history likely beginning with the “gentlemen-only” California Club, which opened over a livery stable in 1887, followed eight years later with establishment of the staid Jonathan Club, whose headquarters still occupy almost a block of prime real estate in the city’s downtown (with another outpost on an unrivaled stretch of beach in Santa Monica).', 'Dimitri Dimitrov, Mr. Klein’s right hand man, surrounded by staff at a pre-meal meeting in the main dining room of the San Vicente Bungalows.', 'But it was Soho House that jolted the social landscape of Los Angeles with its opening nearly 10 years ago in a glass-box building along Sunset Boulevard just shy of Beverly Hills.', 'That perspective shifted, Mr. Klein said, when membership in Soho House boomed and the agents, actors, producers, publicists and studio executives that had long patronized his restaurant and hotel began clamoring to get in. “It pricked up my ears to see how successful it was," Mr. Klein said.', 'Rather than a membership roster drawn from a relatively broad swath of the local population, however, Mr. Klein envisioned for the San Vicente Bungalows a more tightly edited group of those representing the ecosystem he knows best: one composed principally of apex predators.', 'It was a chilly afternoon and Mr. Klein, 48, was seated in the forecourt of his new nine-bungalow complex dressed in a tan Boglioli blazer, a Brunello Cucinelli button-down and a rumpled pair of Acne jeans. The San Vicente club was fresh from a six-year renovation estimated to have cost $50 million — nearly $2 million of it allocated for gardens in which transplanted, century-old California pepper trees now shade lattice walls of espaliered kumquats — and there were glitches.', 'Crisp uniforms at the "SVB," as it will perhaps be known.', 'The power was dead in three electrical sockets in the club’s cozy living room, where the screenwriter Robert Harling (“Steel Magnolias”) sat in a corner tapping on an iPad. Vintage glass candy jars of peanut M&Ms were arranged on a console, but not precisely to Mr. Klein’s liking. A waitress attired in an aproned uniform from Mercatores, a Milanese livery shop, had set a lunch table backward, knife to the left and fork on the right.', 'Though by his own admission a “control freak,” Mr. Klein’s public face is one of affability and disarming bonhomie; he is perhaps unique as a businessman in his deployment of “I love you” as an all-purpose term of greeting and farewell.', 'Aaaah! Sink into the aquamarine screening-room chairs.', 'The napkins recall the colors at the Beverly Hills hotel.', 'Glance around, though, and no street artists are to be found. There is, however, Mr. Dimitrov — who followed Mr. Klein here from the Tower Bar, his ostentatious hospitableness intact though his striped suits traded for knit Armani blazers and sneakers from Comme des Garçons — escorting Lorne Michaels to a table in the candlelit dining room.', 'In its design, the club’s interior courtyard allows for clear sightlines on almost every entrance and exit. And here, in fact, much like Tracy Lord skipping down the front steps of her Main Line mansion in “The Philadelphia Story” comes Hannah Bronfman, the D.J. heiress, descending from one of the club’s nine private bedrooms to duck beneath a bower of pink bougainvillea. And there, hunched with a script in a rattan cafe chair, sits Armie Hammer. And here is John Mayer, feet shod in Visvims and propped on a coffee table.', 'While elsewhere in town, van loads of tourists are being carted around to view houses once inhabited by movie stars gone and long forgotten, at San Vicente Bungalows the live ones disport themselves.', "No 'Gramming at the inn: A staffer applies a sticker to a cameraphone.", 'As if to underscore that notion, members and guests at the club sign a code-of-conduct contract upon entry and surrender their phones to desk attendants dressed in piped rowing blazers. The phones are returned to them, of course, but only after the camera lens has been covered with a sticker bearing the logo of the club.', 'In Mr. Klein’s world, the paparazzi that routinely bribe servers and slip weekly updated price lists to parking valets for celebrity tipoffs may be a necessary evil. Instagram is the enemy. “We live in this connected world where no one is really connected,” he said, adding that if his experience at Sunset Tower alerted him to anything it was a need to create a “safe zone” for those people whose faces beam out at us from the covers of the tabloids.', "What is never in short supply is the hypnotic pull those on the inside exert on the rest of us and the sense that life would far better if you could only join the club. And that is Mr. Klein's fundamental proposition at both the Tower Bar and his San Vicente Bungalows.", 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Bill Jenkins, Who Tried to Halt Tuskegee Syphilis Study, Dies at 73
['Bill Jenkins in 1997. He denounced the government’s unethical Tuskegee syphilis experiment aimed at black men, and spent his career working against injustice in health care.', 'Bill Jenkins, a government epidemiologist who tried to expose the unethical Tuskegee syphilis study in the 1960s and devoted the rest of his career to fighting racism in health care, died on Feb. 17 in Charleston, S.C. He was 73.', 'His wife, Dr. Diane Rowley, said the cause was complications of sarcoidosis, an inflammatory disease.', 'Dr. Jenkins was working as a statistician at the United States Public Health Service in Washington in the 1960s when he first learned of the infamous Tuskegee study. In that study, the federal government deceived hundreds of black men in Macon County, Ala., where Tuskegee is the county seat, into thinking that their so-called “bad blood” — they weren’t told that they had syphilis — was being treated when it wasn’t.', 'The researchers had wanted to see what unchecked syphilis would do to the human body and used these men as guinea pigs, without their informed consent.', 'The disease, which is usually transmitted by sexual contact and can cause brain damage, paralysis, blindness and death, ran its course in several of the men. Some infected their wives, who passed it on to some of their children. The study lasted from 1932 to 1972.', 'A colleague told Dr. Jenkins about the study while it was still going on, but not in much detail. Dr. Jenkins did some research and found dozens of articles about it in medical journals, so he understood that it was not being done in secret. Even local chapters of the American Medical Association supported it.', 'Still, he was troubled by the ethics of the situation and spoke to his supervisor.', 'Dr. Jenkins, who was black, and some colleagues wrote an article about it and sent it to other African-American doctors and to a few reporters. But Dr. Rowley, his wife, said he did not include any background or explanatory information, and the news media did not pick it up.', 'Eventually, another health service epidemiologist, Peter Buxtun, gave the information to The Associated Press. The A.P. article appeared on the front page of The New York Times and elsewhere and shocked the nation. The study was soon halted.', 'For Dr. Jenkins, the Tuskegee study confirmed what he had long believed — that medical research was biased against people of color and that this study was just the tip of the iceberg.', 'It would change his life. He would go on to devote himself to trying to reduce disease and illness among African Americans and other people of color, in part by recruiting more such people into the public health professions.', 'He was one of the first researchers at the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention to recognize how dramatically AIDS was affecting black men. He helped organize the first conference on AIDS in underserved neighborhoods and became the C.D.C.’s director of AIDS prevention for minorities.', 'And for 10 years he oversaw the government’s Participants Health Benefits Program, which provides free lifetime medical care to the men of the Tuskegee study and their eligible family members.', 'A doctor in Tuskegee, Ala., drew blood from a subject of the government’s experiment on black men to determine what happens when syphilis is left untreated. The men were deceived into thinking that they were being treated.', 'Susan Reverby, author of “Examining Tuskegee: The Infamous Syphilis Study and Its Legacy” (2009), said in a telephone interview that Dr. Jenkins had successfully fought to expand the benefits for survivors and their families, insuring that health care, like nursing homes, would be covered in addition to medical care.', 'The apology is commemorated every year at the National Center for Bioethics in Research and Health Care at Tuskegee University; the government paid for the center as part of the apology, and Dr. Jenkins helped establish it.', 'William Carter Jenkins was born on July 26, 1945, in Mt. Pleasant, S.C. His father, Albert Daniel Jenkins, was a funeral home director and restaurant owner; his mother, Martha (Wilson) Jenkins, was a schoolteacher.', 'He graduated from historically black Morehouse College with a bachelor’s degree in mathematics in 1967. He went to work for the National Center for Health Statistics, a division of the public health service, and became one of the first black commissioned officers in the Public Health Service Commissioned Corps.', 'After the Tuskegee study was exposed, he was determined to make more of a difference in the world and decided he needed more training. He earned his master’s of science degree in biostatistics in 1974 at Georgetown University. He was awarded a second master’s, in public health, in 1977 from the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill, where he went on to earn a doctorate in epidemiology in 1983.', 'He married Dr. Rowley that year. They had met at the C.D.C., where they were both epidemiologists. In addition to his wife, Dr. Jenkins is survived by their daughter, Danielle Rowley-Jenkins. His brother, Dr. Albert Daniel Jenkins Jr., died in 2006.', 'Dr. Rowley said her husband had always been an activist. In high school, he had registered people to vote. In college, he was a foot soldier in the Student Nonviolent Coordinating Committee. He was jailed, along with the future Georgia congressman John Lewis and others, for protesting the whites-only restaurant owned by Lester Maddox, a segregationist and future governor of Georgia.', 'And while he was at the public health service, he helped start an underground newspaper, The Drum, directed at employees who felt they were experiencing racism in their work or witnessing it.', 'Later in his career, Dr. Jenkins founded the Society for the Analysis of African American Public Health Issues, which is dedicated to eliminating health inequities among the races.', 'But it was the Tuskegee study that would define his life’s work.', 'An earlier version of this obituary misspelled the given name of the director of the National Center for Bioethics in Research and Health Care at Tuskegee University. He is Dr. Rueben Warren, not Reuben.', 'It also misspelled the surname of an epidemiologist who gave information about the Tuskegee syphilis study to The Associated Press. He is Peter Buxtun, not Buxton.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Humpback Whale Washes Ashore in Amazon River, Baffling Scientists in Brazil
['A young humpback whale was found dead on Friday on an island near the mouth of the Amazon River in Brazil. Scientists are investigating how it died and why it was so far from where they migrate this time of the year.', 'Marine biologists in Brazil were stunned to discover a young humpback whale on Friday that had washed ashore on a remote, forested island in the Amazon River, at a time of the year when it should have already migrated thousands of miles to Antarctica.', 'Biologists examined the carcass over the weekend during low tide, looking for signs of how the whale might have died, and took samples for a necropsy, the group said. The whale, while about half the length of a full-grown humpback, was too large and in too remote an area to be entirely removed.', 'Ms. Emin told G1 that the group hypothesized that the young whale got detached from its mother before it died.', 'Humpbacks travel great distances every year, slowly migrating to and from the poles. Those in the Northern Hemisphere migrate this time of year to tropical waters before returning north in the summer. In the Southern Hemisphere, they migrate south during this time of year and return north during their winter, in the breeding season.', 'Ms. Emin said her group was examining the whale to try to determine its cause of death.', 'Ms. Emin did not respond to an email seeking comment.', 'Barbara Marcolini contributed reporting.', 'These Whales Are Serenaders of the Seas. It’s Quite a Racket.', 'New York’s Whales Love Bunker. So Do Fishing Boats. Conflict Ensues.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Seven Black Inventors Whose Patents Helped Shape American Life
['U.S.', 'U.S.', 'Garrett Morgan created an improved gas mask. Marie Van Brittan Brown patented a home security system. Lonnie Johnson dreamed up the Super Soaker.', 'Garrett A. Morgan, born to former slaves in the post-bellum South, designed an improved gas mask.', 'Mr. Morgan after putting his invention into practice in 1916, when he helped rescue injured workers from a tunnel after an explosion under Lake Erie.', 'Black inventors’ paths to securing a patent in the United States have historically been jammed with obstacles.', 'Black Americans had limited opportunities to receive technical training, Mr. Fouché wrote. And professional organizations that were often vital for making business connections did not allow black people in their ranks.', 'Still, many black inventors have overcome these obstacles to secure their own patents — though the marketing of those products brought further challenges. With Black History Month nearing its end, we looked back at seven such innovators.', 'Garrett A. Morgan’s patent application for his gas mask included an illustration of a man breathing through tubes that dangle low to the ground, where smoke is less likely to linger.', 'Born in the 1870s to former slaves in the post-bellum South, Garrett A. Morgan had only six years of formal education.', 'In the late 1960s, Marie Van Brittan Brown, who worked as a nurse, patented a invention that became a technological precursor to the modern home security system.', 'Lonnie G. Johnson created the design for what would one day be called the Super Soaker. Sales for the toy reached $200 million in 1992.', 'Mary Beatrice Kenner designed this sanitary belt in an effort to help women manage their periods. The belt could be adjusted to fit women of different sizes.', 'Before there were tampon commercials promising an easier period, there was Mary Beatrice Kenner, an inventor who wanted to make old-fashioned sanitary belts more comfortable for women.', 'Dr. Charles R. Drew created a device that could preserve donated blood for transfusions. He patented the invention during World War II, a time when there was a desperate need for blood donations.', 'Dr. Patricia Bath, who invented a more efficient way to remove cataracts, in 2017. In the 1980s, she discovered how to use a laser to correct the condition.', 'When Dr. Patricia Bath had her “eureka” moment with a tool to fix cataracts in the 1980s, her supervisor was skeptical. By that point, she was used to being treated differently from her male counterparts in ophthalmology.', 'Dr. Weatherby’s yellow detergent used nonstaining dyes that could maintain their color when in the presence of chlorine bleach, serving as the basis for the famous lemon-scented Cascade detergent.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


On Location: For an Atlanta Home of a Certain Age, a Design With Patina
['The developer of the midcentury-modern Dewberry hotel in Charleston, S.C., creates an apartment with an eye to an earlier century.', 'John Dewberry, who collaborated with the architecture and design firm Workstead on the Dewberry’s interiors, likes modernism well enough. But he is more interested in creating spaces that appear true to their context.', 'John Dewberry, the developer behind the Dewberry hotel in Charleston, S.C., bought and renovated an apartment in the 1924 neo-Classical Reid House in Atlanta with his wife, Jaimie Brown Dewberry.', 'Reid House was designed by Philip T. Shutze, of the architecture firm Hentz, Reid & Adler.', 'The couple was impressed with the intimately scaled architecture of the apartment, which included a series of smaller rooms for specific functions, including a formal dining room, a study and a sunroom, rather than the wide-open spaces seen in more contemporary homes. So they left the walls as they found them.', 'The dated kitchen and bathrooms weren’t quite so charming, so they gutted those spaces. The new kitchen has stainless-steel base cabinets, shelves made with wood reclaimed from an old Georgia icehouse, and walls and counters of Vermont Danby marble. The master bathroom has more Danby marble and the claw-foot soaking tub that came with it.', 'Mr. Dewberry insisted that they paint the walls gray, to create a feeling of coziness. But rather than choosing just one shade, they chose seven, using them in different rooms. They also added velvet and damask curtains, some of them finished with Samuel and Sons trim.', 'The living room has custom-made lounge chairs, vintage 1960s studded brass trunks used as end tables and a 1970s bronze mirror by Guy Lefevre. The James chandelier is by Robert Long Lighting (from $3,500).', 'To complete the décor, the couple collected furniture and art during their travels, from an 18th-century Hepplewhite sideboard found in Charlottesville, Va., to a vintage Turkish rug bought in the south of France. They added those to pieces Mr. Dewberry already owned, including a 19th-century mahogany dining table.', 'They completed the renovation in phases, and continued to use the apartment as construction progressed. By the time they were finished, in 2016, they had spent about $700,000, including the furniture and art.', 'The resulting design mixes traditional and contemporary elements to create a home that honors the past, but isn’t stuck in it.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Meet the Italian Makers of Luxury
['Crafted Society, an Amsterdam-based start-up, wants to give artisans their moment in the limelight.', 'Martin Johnston and Lise Bonnet, the co-founders of The Crafted Society, in their showroom in Amsterdam. Mr. Johnston is British and Ms. Bonnet, Dutch.', 'AMSTERDAM — The Milan collections have drawn to an end. Alessandro Michele of Gucci, bearded and bejeweled, has taken his runway bow. So has Miuccia Prada and Donatella Versace and Daniel Lee, the new name at Bottega Veneta.', 'We are long used to applauding designers at the end of a season. But behind them is a plethora of generally unheralded artisans who also power the “Made in Italy” brand, creating everything from knits to sneakers. Now, one nascent company is aiming to place that talent firmly in the spotlight.', 'That, however, gave them a new idea.', "The Amsterdam neighborhood where the couple's store is located.", 'Marco Cini, left, who makes luxury textiles, and the artist Roger Selden.', 'Sneakers at the Crafted Society’s showroom.', 'The partnerships that Crafted Society has been building, he said, could also tackle a broader crisis weighing on the future of Italian luxury manufacturing: the struggle to find the next generation of artisans.', 'An earlier version of this article misstated the lowest price of Panama hats. They are 125 euros, not 175 euros.', 'Elizabeth Paton is a reporter for the Styles section, covering the fashion and luxury sectors in Europe. Before joining The Times in 2015, she was a reporter at the Financial Times both in London and New York.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Scene City: Inside the Governors Ball, the Official Oscars After-Party
['Rami Malek, Lady Gaga, Regina King, Alfonso Cuarón and other winners get their trophies engraved.', 'If the Academy Awards are the peak expression of American culture, perhaps it’s fitting they’re held in a mall. After the ceremony at the Dolby Theater, guests ascended five levels via escalator, across from stores like Victoria’s Secret and Dave & Buster’s, to the Ray Dolby Ballroom.', 'Did Freddie ever mention who he wanted to portray him in the Hollywood version of his life?', 'Mr. May thought for a moment. “Burt Reynolds,” he said.', 'About last night!', 'All the looks from Hollywood’s biggest night.', 'Because of their work for “Black Panther,” Beachler and Carter became the first African-American women to win Oscars in a nonacting category since the 1980s.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


The Best and Worst Moments of the 2019 Oscars
['A more diverse winners’ list, a best-picture blunder, a joyous victory and misbegotten acceptance — these were the highs and lows as we saw them.', 'Only 3 black women have won Oscars for anything other than acting. 2 of them just happened tonight.', 'Sign up to the Watching newsletter for recommendations on what to watch straight to your inbox.', 'Glenn Close on the red carpet.', 'Maya Rudolph, Tina Fey and Amy Poehler onstage.', 'Awkwafina and John Mulaney presenting awards.', 'Kevin Hart, center, in a clip from “Night School” that was part of a montage at the Oscars.', 'Won’t You Be My Neighbor?', 'Lady Gaga and Bradley Cooper performing their duet.', 'The “Vice” winners with their Oscars.', 'What ‘Green Book’ Says About the Academy. Our Critics on the Oscars.', 'Nobody Hosted the Oscars. And They Did a Fine Job of It.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


In Milan, Men Win Supporting Roles
['The women’s shows, from Gucci to Roberto Cavalli, had a coed feel this season.', 'Gucci, fall 2019.', 'You couldn’t fairly say that they dominated it. The women on the runways, with their stern, set expressions, stalking in their fearsome heels (this was a week to remind you that our word “stiletto” derives from the Italian for “little dagger”), were too powerful and too numerous for that. It was more like a Sadie Hawkins Day, and women’s wear, with the power all on its side, had invited the men to the dance.', 'The reasons are easy enough to guess. While it remains, at least for the moment, a smaller part of the business than women’s wear, men’s wear has been growing explosively in recent years. And the heads of luxury brands have noticed the change with evident pleasure.', 'Presenting a unified collection while saving costs is a powerful draw, especially at a moment when fashion shows are as much a public entertainment as an industry invitational, and wherever and whenever they occur, they are ultimately destined to live where we increasingly all do: online.', 'For the designers and creators in Milan, the argument was more frequently one of creativity and coherence than commerce. Angela Missoni, who runs her family’s namesake knitwear label, invoked, in her own fashion, the old wisdom about measuring twice to cut once.', 'Clarity was the virtue cited as well by Paul Andrew of Salvatore Ferragamo, who was elevated last week from women’s creative director to creative director of the entire brand, men’s and women’s alike.', 'So it was that Mr. Armani’s ponytailed gentlemen, in their check suits and blue-on-black formal wear, gave the sense of being mere walkers to his women. Which was almost a shame, when you recalled that Mr. Armani, who started his label decades ago with men’s wear, revolutionized women’s wear by dappling it with the style and shape from the other side of that divide.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Shaped by Mérida’s Artistic Soul
['Plantel Matilde, an arts center rising in the jungle was conceived by Javier Marin, the Mexico City sculptor, and serves as a campus for international art students and local schoolchildren as well as studio and exhibition space for the artist..', 'The capital of the Yucatán attracts creative types from around Mexico and across many borders, drawn by its Mayan and colonial heritage and, for some, its path to the future.', 'Plantel Matilde, an arts center rising in the jungle was conceived by Javier Marin, the Mexico City sculptor, and serves as a campus for international art students and local schoolchildren as well as studio and exhibition space for the artist..', 'An elegant blonde woman in slacks drifted over to the table to say hello to David — Elena, he explained, a fashion designer from Milan. A few minutes later a tanned couple, the husband leaning on a cane as a result of a riding accident, dropped by — Ralf and Yvonne, the Germans who run the Yucatán Polo Club. After lunch we stopped at Ki’Xocolatl — the chocolate store next to the restaurant run by two Belgians — and bumped into Carmen, a painter from Mexico City, and Marcela, a Yucatecan artist who got out her phone to show me pictures of the sculptures she makes from sisal fiber.', 'Apoala, a Mexican-fusion restaurant in Mérida, is a great place for people watching.', 'The Catedral de San Ildefonso is evidence of a Roman influence in Mérida’s past.', 'The interior of the Catedral.', 'The heat — or maybe it was the food — was having the opposite effect on me. But our Uber driver, Israel, a Yucatecan of Lebanese descent, cranked up the AC in his Dodge Neon. The radio was also rousing: Israel blasted KIIS FM (“You’re the One That I Want”) as he negotiated the narrow streets lined with tall colonial houses in sherbet colors back to David’s place.', "The Paseo de Montejo, Mérida's main artery, is lined with mansions once owned by 18th- and 19th-century millionaires.", 'On cue, Israel had turned up the Paseo de Montejo, the city’s main artery, and suddenly we were surrounded by palm-shaded mansions in the Beaux-Arts style — the trophy homes of the 18th- and 19th-century millionaires who made their fortunes producing henequen (or sisal) from the agave plant. The rich Yucatecans rejected Hispanic culture in favor of all things French, and Paseo de Montejo bears more than a passing resemblance to a street in old New Orleans, which happens to be a sister city.', 'The pale blue exterior of the 200-year-old house in the Santiago barrio that David and his partner, Robert Willson, bought a few years ago is reserved, almost anonymous. Inside it looks the way you might imagine a casa restored by two guys who used to run one of Los Angeles’s premier design showrooms would look. There are 20-foot beamed ceilings and boldly patterned concrete tile floors, terra cotta sphinxes and French chairs made of steel and twine. The lush scent of plumeria wafts from the courtyard, where a Piranesi-inspired mural overlooks a turquoise pool.', 'Casa Lecanda, two blocks from Paseo de Montejo, is one of the fancier  places to stay in Mérida.', 'I repaired to my guest room, settling in for a siesta on the steel canopy bed. An Olivia Newton-John/John Travolta ear worm had worked its way into my head, but at some point I dozed off. When I awoke my room was dark, and rain pelted the roof — a steady, cooling volley punctuated by rumbling thunder.', 'Luckily Israel’s musical tastes were varied. The next morning, he was playing Mexican techno. In a light drizzle we set off for the ruins of Uxmal, a Maya city 50 miles south of Mérida, known for its ornate Puuc-style architecture and its fine state of preservation.', 'Uxmal, population 20,000, give or take, was founded about 500 AD by Chac Uitzil Hun, I learned from my guide, Fabio, a Yucatecan with a mouth full of gold and a wicked sense of humor. We made our way around the Pyramid of the Magician, the site’s tallest structure, to the grass-covered Ballcourt. Competitions here generally concluded with a human sacrifice, Fabio said, doing a little pantomime of the victor having his heart ripped out and offered to the gods, his gold teeth sparking in the mist.', 'The massive mosaic facade of the Governor’s Palace has 103 masks of the rain god Chac.', 'The restaurant Tatemar is in Plaza La Isla, a newly opened 180-store mall in the suburbs recently built north of Mérida.', 'Traditional Yucatecan cuisine, on the other hand, weds Mayan ingredients (corn, chilis, pumpkin) with culinary contributions from Spain (pork, lard, Seville orange) and other parts of Europe. Mr. Tower, the chef, who has lived in Mérida for the last decade, haunts the city’s food stalls for fried pork belly and other Yucatecan staples. Gringos who want to master time-honored recipes like pavo en relleno negro (roasted turkey in charred chili sauce) can take classes at Los Dos, the cooking school founded by David Sterling.', 'Tatemar serves Oaxacan-flavored dishes like octopus with maize purée and pork and shrimp tacos.', 'When we left the mall the sun was sinking below a stand of tamarind trees. Suddenly there was an explosion of bird chatter — the evening song of blackbirds known locally as X’Kau — a reminder that, for all the golf courses and Porsche dealerships, we were still in the jungle.', 'The Centro Cultural La Cupula, a sprawling garden-linked complex, hosts music, dance and theater performances, as well as exhibitions.', 'We had been asked to lunch at the country hacienda of Laura Kirar, the designer, and her husband, Richard Frazier. So we picked up a roasted chicken at a roadside stand, and Israel navigated a series of narrow village roads lined with shacks in taffy colors and teeming with mototaxis, pedestrians and dogs that seemed oblivious to both.', 'The Hacienda Subin, a crumbling 18th- and 19th-century Moorish-style compound on 40 acres in the jungle, is being painstakingly restored.', 'Dozens of the sisal haciendas outside Mérida have been renovated as resorts. One of the newest and poshest is the Chablé Resort and Spa, in Chocholá — 38 modern casitas, each with its own pool and hammock, on the jungled grounds of the former henequen estate Hacienda San Antonio Chablé. As for Hacienda Subin, Richard and Laura are rehabbing its factory building as a multipurpose space for community events.', 'One of the newest resorts is the Chablé Resort and Spa, in Chocholá,  which has 38 modern casitas, each with its own pool and hammock.', 'Expat colonies can be insular, but Mérida’s outlanders are establishing deep roots here. On our way back to the city we stopped at Plantel Matilde, a 39,000-square-foot arts center rising like a modern acropolis in the middle of the jungle. Conceived by the Mexico City sculptor Javier Marin, Matilde serves as a campus for international art students and local schoolchildren as well as a studio and exhibition space for the artist.', 'After a full day my host had planned a casual dinner back in town. But this was Mérida: the meal, at a simple cantina called Catrin, was a long, festive, Mezcal-fueled affair. Richard and Laura showed up, as did Marcela, the sisal sculptor. There was Jason, an artist from Chicago, and Kate, from Poland, who did hair, and Ross, from New York, who works in real estate.', 'We passed around platters of cactus salad and vegetarian flautas and empanadas. The conversation returned to Mérida’s recent growth. Not everyone shared David’s and Carlos’s enthusiasm for the changes. Jason groused about the traffic and noise. Ross said the Levi’s plant was polluting the water with toxic dyes.', 'Get weekly updates from our Travel Dispatch newsletter, with tips on traveling smarter, destination coverage and photos from all over the world.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Assam spurious liquor death toll mounts to 158
['The death toll in the Assam hooch tragedy rose to 158 on Tuesday while more than 300 people are still receiving treatment at hospitals in Jorhat and Golaghat districts, a health department official said.', 'A man undergoing treatment died on Tuesday at the Golaghat Civil Hospital, taking the toll in the district to 56. More than 50 people are still under care in the hospital, the official said.', 'In Jorhat district, 78 people were recorded to have died at Jorhat Medical College Hospital and another 20 were brought dead, while 260 are undergoing treatment, the official said. In Titabor sub-divisional hospital of Jorhat district, four persons had died so far, he added.', 'As many as 22 people have been arrested in connection with the hooch tragedy in Golaghat and Jorhat districts, police said.', 'Following Excise Minister Parimal Suklabaidya’s directions, the Excise department has launched a crackdown on sale and production of illicit liquor in both the districts as well as across the State to prevent recurrence of such tragedies in the future.', 'The State government has also banned the sale of ‘lali gur’ or red molasses used in production of country liquor.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Congress will protect the language and culture of northeast: Rahul Gandhi
['The Conress chief promises to restore ‘special status’ to Assam.', 'Congress president Rahul Gandhi Tuesday asserted that his party will protect the culture, history and language of the northeast if voted to power.', 'Kicking off the poll campaign in Assam, Mr. Gandhi attacked the BJP and the RSS, accusing them of “burning” every state in the region.', 'Mr. Gandhi exuded confidence that the Congress will come to power at the Centre and work towards protecting the identity of the region.', 'He also promised to restore ‘special status’ to Assam and bring back the North East Industrial and Investment Promotion Policy (NEIIPP).', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.', 'A 5-judge constitution bench headed by CJI says that even if one per cent chance of mediation exists in the politically sensitive land dispute matter, it should be done.']


Modi assures country in safe hands, says he will not let country down
['In his first public address after the air strikes on terror camps in Pakistan, Prime Minister Narendra Modi on Tuesday said the country is in safe hands and nothing is above the nation. The Prime Minister also said that he will not let the country down.', 'I want to assure the people that the country is in safe hands. There is nothing above the nation, he said addressing a public meeting in Churu.', 'The Prime Minister, however, did not make a direct reference to the Balakot strikes.', 'In an air strike following the Pulwama attack, India bombed and destroyed Jaish-e-Mohammed’s biggest training camp in Pakistan early on Tuesday, killing a “very large number” of terrorists, trainers and senior commanders. The operation, described as a non-military, preemptive strike, was welcomed by the entire political spectrum and military experts who had been advocating retribution after the February 14 suicide attack on a CRPF convoy in Pulwama claimed by JeM.', 'Addressing the rally, Mr. Modi said he was able to work because the party is above individuals and the country was above the party.', 'He said with the sentiment of ‘Jai Jawan, Jai Kisan and Jai Vigyan’, the country was progressing ahead. Referring to the Prime Minister Kisan Samman Nidhi scheme, Mr. Modi said that first installment of Rs 2000 was directly transferred to bank accounts of farmers.', 'Attacking the Congress government in the state, he said unfortunately not a single farmer from Churu was among the beneficiaries as the Rajasthan government was stopping the benefits that Centre wants to pass on to them.', 'Rajasthan has not provided list of farmers for the scheme launched by the Centre. Welfare of poor and farmers is the priority of our government but it is sad that schemes meant for them are subjected to politics, he said.', 'Mr. Modi said welfare of farmers was among the priorities of the government but it hurts when schemes related to them is subjected to politics. He said the government was working on ‘Sabka sath sabka vikas’ model.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.', 'A 5-judge constitution bench headed by CJI says that even if one per cent chance of mediation exists in the politically sensitive land dispute matter, it should be done.']


NIA carries out raids on separatists, including Mirwaiz Umer Farooq, in Kashmir
['The NIA on Tuesday carried out searches at the residences of nine separatist leaders in the Kashmir valley, including that of Hurriyat chairman Mirwaiz Umar Farooq, in a terror funding case, officials said.', 'Besides the Mirwaiz, the houses of JKLF’s Yasin Malik, Syed Ali Shah Geelani’s son Nayeem Geelani, Shabir Shah, Zaffar Bhat and Tehreek-e-Hurriyat chief Ashraf Sehrai were also searched.', 'According to police officers, the NIA raids were carried out in a “illegal funding case” registered by the national agency in 2017 when it rounded up seven top separatist leaders from Kashmir.', 'The NIA officials were accompanied by local police and CRPF personnel as searches were carried out.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


High-profile hopefuls begin campaign in Manipur
['Though the Lok Sabha election schedule is yet to be announced and party tickets yet to be allotted, some high-profile candidates have already launched their campaign in Manipur.', 'Former Chief Minister Radhabinod Koijam is one of the heavyweights who is seeking a BJP ticket for the Inner Manipur Lok Sabha constituency. His election posters have come up in all the valley districts. However, these posters do not state which party he will represent in the polls.', 'Another candidate, Oinam Nabakishore Singh, a former Chief Secretary, is also appealing to the voters of this constituency to elect him in front-page newspaper advertisements.', 'The State executive council of the CPI on Monday approved the candidature of M. Nara Singh, a former Minister. L. Sotin Kumar, the State secretary of the CPI, said there is a need to safeguard the people of the State since the BJP leaders are keen on including the Citizenship (Amendment) Bill, 2016, in the party’s poll manifesto.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


NASA Renames Facility After Katherine Johnson of ‘Hidden Figures’ Fame
['Katherine Johnson, left, and Christine Darden, two of the first African-American women to work as mathematicians at NASA. The agency named a facility in Ms. Johnson’s honor on Friday.', 'The 2016 film, based on a book released earlier that year, depicted the struggle of Ms. Johnson and other black women for equality at NASA during the height of the space age and segregation. The mathematician tracked the trajectories of crucial missions in the 1960s.', 'President Trump signed the measure to rename the facility after Ms. Johnson in December after Congress passed a bill introduced by Senator Capito to do so, according to a NASA spokeswoman.', 'NASA’s Katherine Johnson Independent Verification and Validation Facility in Fairmont, W.Va. The program housed at the facility monitors the software used to track high-profile NASA missions.', 'Ms. Johnson was not always respected. Called “colored computers,” she and other black women who worked in NASA’s computing pool more than a half-century ago were separated from their white colleagues while they calculated trajectories for the Apollo missions and other programs. Ms. Johnson tracked the orbits of certain major missions, including Alan Shepard’s Freedom 7 in 1961 and John Glenn’s Friendship 7 in 1962, the agency said.', 'Ms. Hylick said that her mother was living comfortably and was humbled by the recognition. She added that she hoped the dedication would inspire others in the future, beyond Black History Month.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Pinterest Restricts Vaccine Search Results to Curb Spread of Misinformation
['Opponents of a bill that would stop parents from opting out their school-aged children from a vaccine in Washington State. Companies such as Pinterest and Facebook have faced pressure to curb inaccuracies promoted by anti-vaccination groups.', 'Pinterest, a digital platform popular with parents, took an unusual step to crack down on the proliferation of anti-vaccination propaganda: It purposefully hobbled its search box.', 'Type “vaccine” into its search bar and nothing pops up. “Vaccination” or “anti-vax”? Also nothing.', 'Pinterest, which allows people to save pictures on virtual pinboards, is often used to find recipes for picky toddlers, baby shower décor or fashion trends, but it has also become a platform for anti-vaccination activists who spread misinformation on social media.', 'Other platforms like Facebook and YouTube have also been infiltrated with misinformation about vaccines, and are taking steps to combat it. One of YouTube’s policies is to demonetize anti-vaccine videos.', 'The changes, which were not publicly announced, started in September and October.', 'Opposition to vaccinations can be traced to the introduction of the first vaccine in the 18th century. Over time most people accepted vaccines, and diseases that could be prevented by them declined. They declined so much, in fact, that the success of vaccines may have muted the dangers associated with those diseases.', 'There are several reasons for vaccine hesitancy: worries about side effects, cost, moral or religious objections, fears about a debunked link to autism and lack of knowledge about immunizations.', 'YouTube said on Thursday that it started surfacing more authoritative content in late 2017 for people searching for vaccination-related topics, and that its algorithmic changes would become more accurate over time.', 'YouTube also said it does not permit anti-vaccine videos to show ads.', 'The company said it was considering reducing or removing this type of content from recommendations and demoting it in search results.', 'Dr. Poland, an internist who has spent 35 years in the vaccine field, said he often encountered patients who relied on social media when researching health questions.', 'For all of these companies, containing the spread of misinformation, particularly about something as emotionally charged as vaccines, will be a lasting challenge as they balance fears about censorship with the need to promote useful content, experts said.', 'Why Don’t We Have Vaccines Against Everything?', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


UnitedHealth Loses Case to the Health Venture Begun by Amazon, Berkshire-Hathaway and JPMorgan Chase
['UnitedHealth’s main argument was that the venture formed by Amazon, Berkshire Hathaway and JPMorgan Chase was a competitor.', 'A federal judge in Boston denied UnitedHealth’s request to have the executive, David William Smith, immediately stop working. Mr. Smith was an executive at Optum, a unit of UnitedHealth, and it accused him of taking corporate secrets to what it claimed was a competitor. Mr. Smith has denied any wrongdoing.', 'In its court filings, UnitedHealth argued that Mr. Smith’s role at Optum made him privy to sensitive information about its plans. Among Optum’s businesses is one of the nation’s largest pharmacy benefit managers, which serve as intermediaries between drug makers and employers that purchase medicine for their workers.', 'The industry has been sharply criticized for a lack of transparency in how pharmacy benefits managers operate, and Optum’s two main rivals recently merged with two large insurers, Aetna and Cigna.', 'While Judge Mark L. Wolf ruled against it, Optum emphasized that the issues remain unresolved and would need to be settled in arbitration. “We are committed to protecting our confidential information and will aggressively do so in arbitration,” said Matt Stearns, a spokesman for Optum, in an emailed statement.', 'A spokeswoman for the new venture, referred to as “A.B.C.” or “A.B.J.” in court papers, declined to comment. Unlike court proceedings, the arbitration sessions would not be public.', 'Dr. Atul Gawande, a high-profile physician who writes for The New Yorker.', 'The court proceedings also underscored just how unhappy customers — particularly these three employers — are with the status quo.', 'The three employers combined are spending about $4 billion a year on the roughly one million people they cover. But employees “have a poor experience,” Mr. Stoddard said.', 'The venture, which has no name and fewer than 20 employees, plans to tackle several areas, including how benefits are provided through traditional health insurance plans, Mr. Stoddard said. High deductibles, which force employees to pay for significant amounts of their care before their insurance kicks in, are a hardship for “fulfillment-center workers and call-center workers,” he said.', 'The companies also want to see if they can lower the cost of drugs for chronic conditions. In his testimony, Mr. Stoddard insisted that the new venture had no plans to enter the pharmacy business but wanted to better understand the process and the actual cost of drugs.', 'The employers also want to make it easier for workers to see a doctor, Mr. Stoddard testified. Because Optum also operates a large network of primary-care doctors, the venture might want to work with Optum to provide employees with easier access to physicians.', 'Like other large employers, the companies also want to see if they can make better use of doctor and hospital data and identify where employees can go for better care at lower prices.', 'The venture plans to conduct a series of experiments to test new approaches for smaller groups of employees with various partners, including Optum, Mr. Stoddard said.', 'But while Mr. Stoddard would not rule out the possibility that the venture could be a competitor, he emphasized that it had a different purpose. Unlike Optum, which he described as trying to “maximize profits,” the new organization is “trying to create value for families who are trying to use the health care system,” he said.', 'Follow @NYTHealth on Twitter.', 'Science Times newsletter.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Virgin Galactic Rocket Plane Reaches Edge of Space
['U.S.', 'U.S.']


Trump Administration Blocks Funds for Planned Parenthood and Others Over Abortion Referrals
['The new rule would steer federal family planning funds under Title X to anti-abortion and faith based groups.', 'An abortion rights supporter in Metairie, La.', 'The new federal rule is almost certain to be challenged in court. Clinics will be able to talk to patients about abortion, but not where they can get one. And clinics will no longer have to counsel women on all reproductive options, including abortion, a change that will make anti-abortion providers eligible for funding.', 'The rule, which has been expected for months, is the most recent step by the Trump administration to shift the direction of federal health programs in a conservative direction. The administration has expanded the ability of employers to claim religious or moral objections to the Affordable Care Act’s requirement that they offer employees insurance coverage for contraception. It has channeled funding for teen pregnancy prevention programs and family planning grants into programs that emphasize sexual abstinence over contraception.', 'Some of these changes are being challenged in lawsuits by groups that support reproductive rights, but the new policies have broad support among evangelicals, who are a big part of the president’s political base.', 'The rule announced on Friday is not a wholesale defunding of Planned Parenthood, a long-held goal of conservatives. Organizations receiving money through the federal family planning program, called Title X, will still be able to perform abortions but will have to do so in a separate facility from their other operations and adhere to the new requirement that they not refer patients to it.', 'Organizations that receive federal funds have already been prohibited for years from using that money to finance abortion services. The new rule goes a step further by ordering them to keep separate books for their abortion operations.', 'Many women’s organizations said the new requirements will interfere with health providers’ responsibilities to fully counsel patients about reproductive health.', 'Like the Science Times page on Facebook.', 'Science Times newsletter.', 'Title X provides $286 million in funding for programs that provide services like birth control, screening for breast cancer and cervical cancer and screening and treatment for sexually transmitted diseases. These programs serve about 4 million patients each year, many of them poor, at more than 4,000 clinics. About 40 percent of those clinics are operated by Planned Parenthood, which receives close to $60 million through the family planning program each year.', 'That rule was challenged all the way to the Supreme Court, which upheld it in 1991, during the administration of President George H.W. Bush. But the Bush administration did not implement it and in 1993 Bill Clinton was sworn in as president and eliminated the rule.', 'Conservative lawmakers hailed the new rule as a long overdue move back toward the Reagan policy, and some were especially pleased by the prospect that anti-abortion health providers could now be eligible for federal family planning funds.', 'But several medical organizations predicted that the new rule would ultimately leave large numbers of patients, especially low-income and minority women, without access to basic care.', 'Dr. Niva Lubin-Johnson, president of the National Medical Association, which represents African-American physicians and their patients, said that if Planned Parenthood loses the funding, other providers supported by the program would have to increase their caseloads by an average of 70 percent to care for the 1.6 million people who currently receive such services through Planned Parenthood.', 'Most of the changes required by the new regulation will be phased in beginning 60 days after it is published in the Federal Register. Compliance with the financial separation requirement takes effect 120 days after publication and clinics have a year to comply with the physical separation requirements.', 'Robert Pear contributed reporting from Washington.', 'Pam Belluck is a health and science writer. She was one of seven Times staffers awarded the 2015 Pulitzer Prize for International Reporting for coverage of the Ebola epidemic. She is the author of “Island Practice,” about a colorful and contrarian doctor on Nantucket.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Shopping Guide: Shopping for Desk Chairs
['When you’re choosing seating for a home office, don’t forget to think about where else you might be using it.', 'At the office, a desk chair usually has just one purpose: to keep you comfortably upright in front of a computer.', 'In addition to serving as a place to sit and write a letter or compose a quick email, for instance, a desk chair ought to be able to function as extra seating at the dining table, or in the living room.', 'That means that a high-tech, lever-sprouting task chair isn’t necessarily the best choice.', 'How long will you really be sitting there? An honest answer to that question, Ms. Gachot said, will help determine how much support and cushioning is required.', 'Should it have armrests? They can provide extra comfort, but measure how high they are, Ms. Gachot advised, to ensure that the chair can be tucked under your desk when it’s not in use.', 'Should it have casters? They are convenient for scooting between work areas, but not essential. For a seat that will double as a dining chair, it may be better to forgo them.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Oscars Red Carpet: Lady Gaga, Billy Porter, Kacey Musgraves and More at the Academy Awards
['Here’s everything we saw.', 'And a very brief moment of exciting gender fun but overall a very traditional view of mens’ and womens’ dressing.', 'Jonah Bromwich is based in New York. He writes for the Style section.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Oscars 2019: ‘Green Book,’ Rami Malek and Olivia Colman Are Winners
['LOS ANGELES — “Green Book,” about a white chauffeur and his black client in segregation-era America, won best picture and two other trophies at the 91st Academy Awards, overcoming a series of awards-season setbacks and mixed critical notices.', 'In many ways, the ceremony — the first without a host in 30 years — played out like the more populist and less prestigious Golden Globes: veering in multiple directions as voters sprinkled their attention among a dozen pictures, with no film walking away with a commanding sweep.', 'A gobsmacked Colman gave a giggling, circuitous acceptance speech that nonetheless managed to address the elephant in the room — that her victory had denied one to Glenn Close (“The Wife”), who had been expected to break her seven-nomination losing streak.', 'Spike Lee was not as sanguine. When “Green Book” won best picture, he made a disgusted gesture and started walking out of the theater as “Green Book” producers gave their speeches. Backstage, Lee said, “No comment,” when asked about the coronation of “Green Book,” which detractors complain has a retrograde view of race.', 'In a major shift from the #OscarsSoWhite years of 2015 and 2016, this year’s ceremony, which lasted a little over three hours, was notable for the diversity of honorees. Two “Black Panther” crew members, Hannah Beachler (production design) and Ruth E. Carter (costumes), became the first African-Americans to receive Oscars in their respective categories. Cuarón received the prize for best cinematography for “Roma,” making him the first director to win for shooting his own film.', 'Asian-Americans were represented in victories for “Free Solo,” which was named best documentary, and for “Bao,” which won best animated short. L.G.B.T. people were acknowledged with “Bohemian Rhapsody.', 'And the Oscar for best Academy Awards host goes to … nobody!', 'So began this hostless, in-a-hurry Oscars, itself a longtime institution moving forward and putting on a show without the public face it started with.', 'And as it turns out, Hart — or whoever might have replaced him — was hardly missed.', 'Brian May and Adam Lambert opened the Academy Awards ceremony.', 'The show took its lead from the Grammys, opening with a rowdy rendition of “We Will Rock You” by Queen.', 'Tina Fey, Amy Poehler and Maya Rudolph then took the stage and — while explaining they were not the hosts — gave a mini-performance that drew relaxed laughter from the audience and seemed to make the case that the three women should be hired to co-host next year, pronto. In a quick segue, they began presenting the Oscar for best supporting actress at the show’s eight-minute mark. Last year, it took the show 18 minutes just to get through Jimmy Kimmel’s monologue.', 'Two subsequent awards also found African-American women called to the stage. Carter, a three-time nominee (“Amistad,” “Malcolm X”), won best costume design for her Afro-futuristic “Black Panther” attire. Beachler made history herself for her work (with Jay Hart).', 'The film also won for Ludwig Goransson’s score.', 'The Academy of Motion Picture Arts and Sciences had pressed the producers of this year’s ceremony to drastically reduce the running time. Last year, the Oscars stretched to almost four hours — beyond the endurance of viewers, with ratings dropping to a record low. In one abandoned plan, the academy wanted to award four Oscars, including hair and makeup, during the commercial breaks, with the winning moments edited and aired later in the broadcast.', 'Perhaps as a protest, intentional or not, the three winners for hair and makeup, honored for their work on “Vice,” took their time at the microphone. In an awkward and halting set of thank yous, they fumbled with a piece of paper containing names and went way over their allotted 90-second time. Producers started the playoff music and ultimately cut sound to the microphone.', 'Notably, none of the winners from “Bohemian Rhapsody” thanked Bryan Singer, who was fired as the film’s director because of erratic behavior on the set and has been dogged by sexual misconduct allegations.', 'The first win for “Green Book” was a supporting actor victory by Mahershala Ali. It was Ali’s second supporting actor win in recent years. (He previously won in 2017 for his role in “Moonlight.”) Ali became the second African-American man to win two Oscars for acting, joining Denzel Washington.', 'Peter Ramsey, one of the three-credited “Spider-Verse” directors, spoke about the importance of inclusion in animated films. “We see you, we’re powerful,” he said to fans who identified with the diverse characters in the film.', 'Pixar did not leave empty-handed, thanks to its win for “Bao,” conceived and directed by Domee Shi. Even the space-race thriller “First Man” picked up an award, for visual effects.', 'Nobody Hosted the Oscars. And They Did a Fine Job of It.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


This Week’s Wedding Announcements
['All of the weddings right here on one handy page for you.', 'Patrice Moss and Melvin Witcher Jr.', 'Melvin Witcher Jr. got a first glimpse of Patrice Moss in April 2015 during an Easter play performed at the First Baptist Church in Glenarden, Md.', 'Mr. Witcher, who is admittedly shy, did not try starting a conversation with her. “The words were just stuck in my throat,” he said.', 'Two months later, he managed to let a few of those words loose and steered them in Ms. Moss’s direction when he bumped into her at a housewarming party in Upper Marlboro.', 'Two months later, Mr. Witcher and several friends were sitting in a restaurant when Ms. Moss walked through the door with several of her friends.', 'But this time, he went over to her and they chatted briefly and exchanged phone numbers.', 'But Mr. Witcher was still shy, which is why he didn’t call or text her for nearly a week. “I guess I was a little nervous,” he said. But Ms. Moss was not exactly sitting home waiting for her phone to ring.', 'Two weeks later, they were back where they started, at the same church, where a music festival was being staged.', 'Read more.', 'Jessica Rose Brandt and Dr. Jeffrey Alan Tornheim were married Feb. 20 in Westmoreland Hills Park in Bethesda, Md. Rabbi Hannah Goldstein, a friend of the couple, officiated. On Feb. 24, Rabbi Adam J. Baldachin also a friend of the couple, is to lead a Jewish ceremony at Casa Maya Kaan, a private villa in Tulum, Mexico.', 'Ms. Brandt, 35, is a fellow in foreign policy at the Brookings Institution in Washington, where her research focuses on multilateral institutions and the geopolitical consequences of state fragility. She is a David Rockefeller fellow of the Trilateral Commission and a term member of the Council on Foreign Relations in Manhattan. She graduated with honors from Johns Hopkins University and received a master’s degree in public policy from Harvard.', 'She is a daughter of Janet E. Ribardo of Lakewood Ranch, Fla., and Alan J. Brandt of West Nyack, N.Y. The bride’s father retired as the principal at Intermediate School 193 in the Bronx, and then retired as the director of curriculum for kindergarten through Grade 12 at the College Board in Manhattan. Her mother retired as an independent nurse practitioner, based in Yorktown Heights, N.Y.', 'Dr. Tornheim, 37, an infectious disease doctor, is an assistant professor of medicine and a physician-scientist at Johns Hopkins University School of Medicine in Baltimore. His research focuses on the application of new diagnostic technologies to improve health outcomes in the treatment of drug-resistant tuberculosis in India. He graduated magna cum laude from Brandeis University and received a medical degree and a master’s degree in public health from Mount Sinai School of Medicine, now known as the Icahn School of Medicine.', 'He is the son of Bonnie J. Tornheim and Mark Tornheim of Surprise, Ariz. His mother retired as a teacher at Sequoia Elementary School in Pleasant Hill, Calif. His father retired as a commercial real estate appraiser at the Alameda County Assessor’s Office in Oakland, Calif.', 'The couple met in the summer of 2016 through the dating app JSwipe, and when he moved to Mumbai, India, for the academic year in September, they then met for extended dates around the world in Tel Aviv, Paris, Lake Tahoe, Calif., and finally in Goa, India.', 'Craig Emery Szalai and Geoff Charles Todebush were married Feb. 23 at the Ritz-Carlton in Rancho Mirage, Calif.', 'Mr. Szalai (left), 42, is a senior manager for talent acquisition in the North American headquarters of Tommy Hilfiger in New York. He graduated from Allegheny College in Meadville, Pa.', 'He is the son of Janet E. Szalai and Emery A. Szalai of New Kensington, Pa. Mr. Szalai’s father, who is retired, owned Emery Szalai Architects and Associates in Pittsburgh.', 'Mr. Todebush, 48, is a senior vice president for production operations at Viacom in New York, where he works across several brands like Comedy Central, MTV and Nickelodeon. He graduated from Hobart College.', 'He is a son of the late Betty L. Todebush and the late Ralph B. Todebush Jr., who lived in St. Charles, Ill. Mr. Todebush’s mother worked as a sales associate at Talbots, a clothing store in Naples, Fla. His father was a data processing manager for Nichols-Homeshield, a company that manufactures specialized aluminum products in Naperville, Ill.', 'The couple met in 2006 through Match.com in New York.', 'Jeanne Esther Leitenberg and Jordan Isaac Newman were married Feb. 23 at Liberty House, a restaurant and events space in Jersey City. Rabbi Inna Serebro-Litvak officiated.', 'The bride, 35, is a television screenwriter in Los Angeles. Her credits include the CW’s “Gossip Girl” and ABC Family’s “Chasing Life.” She graduated from Emerson College in Boston.', 'She is a daughter of Marion M. Orr and Jack M. Leitenberg of New City, N.Y. The bride’s father is a New York-based manager for the musicians Lionel Loueke, Butcher Brown and Grégoire Maret. Her mother, who is retired, managed the career of the jazz artist Bob James and his record company, Tappan Zee Records.', 'The groom, 34, works in Los Angeles as a digital strategist for political campaigns. He currently serves as a digital director at Leadership for Educational Equity, an organization that helps elect teachers to public office. He graduated from Boston University.', 'He is the son of Mara H. Newman and Jeffrey D. Newman of Randolph, N.J. The groom’s mother retired as an outpatient dietitian at Morristown Medical Center in Morristown, N.J. His father, also retired, worked as a principal at PricewaterhouseCoopers in New York, and currently serves as president of Temple Shalom in Succasunna, N.J.', 'The couple met in October 2016 through the dating app Bumble.', 'Jessica Taylor Sutton and Patrick Thomas Quinn were married Feb. 23 at the Holy Trinity Church in Brooklyn. The Rev. Kate Salisbury, an Episcopal priest, performed the ceremony.', 'Mrs. Quinn, 30, is a senior associate in the litigation department at Willkie Farr & Gallagher, the Manhattan law firm. She graduated magna cum laude from Duke with two bachelor’s degrees, one in linguistics and one in French. She also received a law degree from the University of Pennsylvania.', 'She is the daughter of Christine Akerman Holzer of Manhattan and Dennis P. Sutton of Plano, Tex. The bride’s father is the director of owner relations and communications at Compass Royalty Management, an oil and gas asset management company in Addison, Tex. Her mother is a psychotherapist in private practice in Manhattan.', 'The bride is the stepdaughter of the late Karl Akerman, who owned Rocketfuel Sales, a sports management company in Manhattan.', 'Mr. Quinn, 29, is counsel at Two Sigma Investments, a hedge fund in Manhattan. He graduated magna cum laude from Villanova University, with two bachelor’s degrees, one in accounting and one in finance. He also received a law degree from the University of Pennsylvania.', 'He is a son of Aimee Quinn and Thomas P. Quinn of Havertown, Pa. The groom’s mother is the mathematics department chair at Merion Mercy Academy in Merion Station, Pa. His father, who is retired, was formerly the director of project management at Johnson & Johnson in Raritan, N.J.', 'The couple met in June 2014 while working together as associates at Willkie Farr & Gallagher.', 'Julia Niles Ward and Bryant Anthony Rich were married Feb. 23 at the Fifth Avenue Presbyterian Church in New York. The Rev. Kate Dunn, a Presbyterian minister, officiated.', 'The bride, 32, is the manager of workplace strategy in New York for New York Road Runners. She graduated from Davidson College and received a masters of public administration in nonprofit management from N.Y.U.', 'She is a daughter of Nancy N.W. Ward and Alex Ward of New York. The bride’s father is the editorial director of book development at The New York Times. Her mother is the vice president and the managing director of the Independent Journalism Foundation in New York, which creates training centers for journalists in Eastern and Central Europe and Southeast Asia.', 'The groom, 34, is a vice president in the credit research group at Conning Asset Management in Hartford. He graduated from Bowdoin College and received an M.B.A. from Georgetown.', 'He is the son of Vanessa L. Bryant and Tracy L. Rich of Avon, Conn. The groom’s mother is a United States District Court judge in Hartford for the District of Connecticut. His father is a retired executive vice president and general counsel for the Guardian Life Insurance Company of America, for which he now serves as of counsel to the company.', 'The couple met in October 2016 through the dating app Hinge.', 'Diana Dae Yeon Won and Hassan Emaduddin Ansari were married Feb. 21 at the Manhattan Marriage Bureau. Angel L. Lopez of the city clerk’s office officiated.', 'The couple met at the University of Michigan, from which the groom graduated and received a law degree, and each received a master’s degree in public policy.', 'The bride, 30, is a program manager in New York for the Pershing Square Foundation, a charitable venture that has provided more than $400 million in grants since 2006. She graduated magna cum laude from Rutgers and received a Fulbright grant in 2011-12 to teach English at the Autonomous University of Bucaramanga in Bucaramanga, Colombia.', 'She is a daughter of Junghee Won and Jongil Won of Closter, N.J.', 'The groom, 29, is an assistant professor of law at the Lahore University of Management Sciences in Lahore, Pakistan, where he teaches courses in legal theory and human rights to undergraduates. He is currently on sabbatical to conduct research in New York.', 'He is the son of Iram Ansari and Hassan Ansari of Lahore.', 'The couple met at a Mexican Independence Day party in September 2013, and began dating the next year.', 'Joanna Rose Genco and Dr. Christian Joseph Zaino were married Feb. 23 at the Shrine Church of St. Bernadette in Brooklyn. The Rev. Glenn Sudano, a Roman Catholic priest and a cousin of the groom, performed the ceremony.', 'Mrs. Zaino, 31, is a registered nurse in the Morristown, N.J., office of Garden State Urology, a group practice based in Whippany, N.J. She graduated from Hunter College, and received an associate degree in nursing from Phillips School of Nursing at Mount Sinai Beth Israel in Manhattan and a bachelor of science degree in nursing from the University of Texas at Arlington.', 'She is a daughter of Phyllis J. Genco and Joseph S. Genco of Brooklyn. The bride’s father, a retired dental technician, oversaw Genco Restorations, a dental laboratory in Brooklyn.', 'Dr. Zaino, 34, is an orthopedic hand surgeon at the Orthopedic Institute of New Jersey in Morristown. He graduated magna cum laude from N.Y.U., from which he also received a medical degree.', 'He is the son of Anita R. Zaino and Barney B. Zaino of Brooklyn. The groom’s father, who is retired, owned Dental Connections, a dental equipment and servicing company in Brooklyn.', 'The bride and groom, who each grew up in Dyker Heights, Brooklyn, met in 2009 at NYU Langone Medical Center while Ms. Genco worked for one of Dr. Zaino’s mentors. Five years later, after Dr. Zaino contacted the NYU Langone office, where she was still working, to do some research, she asked him out for a drink just to catch up. Instead, he asked her out to dinner in Red Hook, Brooklyn.', 'Pooja Patel and Alastair Eric Rami were married Feb. 22 at the Manhattan Marriage Bureau. Angel L. Lopez, a staff member of the city clerk’s office, officiated. On March 5, Jacob Ritter, an interfaith minister, is to lead the couple in an exchange of vows in a ceremony on the beach at the Phi Phi Island Village Beach Resort on Ko Phi Phi Island, Thailand.', 'Ms. Patel, 30, works as a director of legal affairs at Glossier, a cosmetics company in New York. She graduated summa cum laude from the University of Maryland and received a law degree from Harvard.', 'She is a daughter of Margi Patel and Navin J. Patel of Gaithersburg, Md. The bride’s father is an independently contracted software engineer for United States Customs and Border Protection in Alexandria, Va. The bride’s mother is a division chief at the Department of Defense in Arlington, Va.', 'Mr. Rami, 34, works as a team lead at Bridgewater Associates, an investment firm in Westport, Conn. He previously served as the deputy chief of staff and legislative director to Representative Henry Cuellar, Democrat of Texas. He graduated from Northwestern and received an M.B.A. from Stanford.', 'He is a son of Angela A. Rami and Anand C. Rami of Vancouver, Wash. The groom’s father works in Vancouver as the president of Silicon Innovation, a firm that advises companies that manufacture polysilicon.', 'The couple met in 2012 at a bar in Washington while both were graduate students.', 'Naomi Tanya Levin and Avraham Shneur Zalman Cohn are to be married Feb. 24 at Crystal Plaza, an events space in Livingston, N.J. Rabbi Naftali Citron is to officiate.', 'The bride, 35, will be taking her husband’s name. Until 2018, she was a software developer at Yext, an online business-management technology company in New York. She ran in the 2018 election as the Republican candidate in New York’s 10th Congressional District. She is on the board of Endowment for Middle East Truth, a pro-Israeli nonprofit group in Washington informing legislators and policy decisions on national security and the Middle East. She is also a vice president on the board of the Manhattan Republican Party. She graduated from Boston University with a dual bachelor’s degree in computer science and biology.', 'Ms. Levin is a daughter of Larissa V. Levin and Leonid A. Levin of Newton, Mass. Her father is a computer science professor at Boston University. He is a member of the American Academy of Arts and Sciences in Cambridge, Mass. Until 1992, her mother was a biochemist focusing on cancer research at the University of Massachusetts Medical School in Worcester.', 'The groom, 31, who is known as Abe, is an intellectual property lawyer at the Cohn Legal Group in New York, a division of Howard M. Cohn & Associates in Cleveland, in which his father, Howard M. Cohn, a patent lawyer, is the managing partner. The groom graduated cum laude from the University of Maryland and received a law degree from Yeshiva University.', 'He is a son of Basha Cohn and Mr. Cohn of Beachwood, Ohio.', 'The couple met in 2016 when Ms. Levin and a group of her friends met Mr. Cohn and a group of his friends at a sushi lounge in Midtown Manhattan.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Sackler Testimony Appears to Conflict With Federal Investigation
['Publication of a sealed deposition by Richard Sackler of Purdue Pharma shows inconsistencies between his statements about OxyContin and evidence presented in a Justice Department report.', 'A January demonstration outside Suffolk Superior Court in Boston, where the state’s lawsuit against Purdue Pharma, the maker of the opioid painkiller OxyContin, is proceeding.', 'A member of the family that owns the manufacturer of OxyContin repeatedly gave testimony in a lawsuit that conflicts with details in a report by federal prosecutors, newly disclosed court papers indicate.', 'Dr. Richard Sackler, who was once president of the company, Purdue Pharma, and is the son of one of its founders, said under oath during a pretrial deposition that he first learned from a Maine newspaper article in 2000 that OxyContin, a powerful opioid painkiller, was being abused.', 'The deposition, in a lawsuit filed by the state of Kentucky, was given in 2015 and has been sealed since. On Thursday, two news organizations, STAT and ProPublica, published the transcript of the deposition. Since the case’s settlement in 2015, Purdue Pharma has been fighting to keep the deposition secret.', 'In a statement, Purdue Pharma, which is based in Stamford, Conn., called the release of Mr. Sackler’s deposition “a clear violation of the court’s order and, as such, is regrettable.” The company also maintained that Mr. Sackler, when alerted to OxyContin’s abuse, immediately took steps to address the problem.', 'Mr. Sackler responded that he was not aware abuse was an issue when that email was written. However, it was two months earlier, in September, federal prosecutors wrote in 2006, that Mr. Sackler was told of internet reports of OxyContin abuse.', 'In the same deposition, Mr. Sackler testified that he recalled “never hearing about” significant abuse of OxyContin’s predecessor drug, a morphine-based painkiller sold under the brand name MS Contin.', 'That is also contradicted by the 2006 report, in which federal prosecutors pointed to emails and reports sent to Mr. Sackler and other family members in the late 1990s showing that there was significant abuse of MS Contin in Canada and other countries.', 'As part of the deposition, Mr. Sackler was also shown internal marketing documents that suggested Purdue Pharma was promoting OxyContin as a less powerful opioid than morphine. In fact, it is two times stronger than morphine. In his responses, Mr. Sackler claimed that the promotions were not efforts to mislead doctors into thinking OxyContin was a safer drug but to avoid any comparisons of it to morphine, which was viewed as a drug given to dying cancer patients.', 'Based on their findings, the prosecutors recommended in 2006 that three top company executives be indicted on felony charges. But in 2007, the government settled the case and allowed the three executives to plead guilty to misdemeanor charges. At that time, the prosecution memo was never disclosed.', 'Like the Science Times page on Facebook.', 'Science Times newsletter.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


After SpaceX Launch, Israeli Spacecraft Begins Journey to the Moon
['The privately built spacecraft will take a long trip to the moon, landing on its surface in April.', 'A SpaceX Falcon 9 rocket carrying an Israeli moon lander and other payloads ahead of its launch from the Cape Canaveral Air Force Station in Florida on Thursday.', 'Until now, only three nations — the United States, former Soviet Union and China — have sent robotic landers to the moon. Beginning in 2007, a competition run by the X Prize Foundation and financed by Google was supposed to spur entrepreneurs to send a privately financed spacecraft there, but the competition deadline passed without anyone taking home the $20 million grand prize.', 'When will Beresheet land on the moon?', 'The landing is expected to occur in April.', 'An artist’s rendering of the Beresheet spacecraft, which is expected to arrive at the moon in April.', 'Why will it take so long to get there?', 'The spacecraft is taking a long but fuel-efficient route. Instead of blasting out of Earth’s orbit, it will gradually elongate its elliptical orbit until it passes close enough to the moon to be captured by lunar gravity. Then it will spend a few more days making its orbit around the moon more circular before attempting a landing.', 'With $100 million and a lot of volunteer labor, SpaceIL’s Beresheet spacecraft could be the first privately built vessel to reach the lunar surface.', 'What will the Beresheet spacecraft do on the moon?', 'An instrument built by the Weizmann Institute of Science is to measure the moon’s magnetic field as the spacecraft approaches for landing. That information could reveal something about the iron core far below the surface.', 'NASA provided the spacecraft with retroreflectors, essentially, mirrors that reflect light in the same direction as the incoming beam. Lasers on Earth shined at that spot will bounce back, enabling precise measurement of the distance between Earth and the moon. Apollo astronauts left similar devices on the moon nearly 50 years ago.', 'The spacecraft is also a time capsule containing hundreds of digital files including the Torah, the Israeli flag, artwork contributed by the public and a children’s book that was inspired by SpaceIL’s mission to the moon.', 'It also will ferry a digital archive containing 30 million pages of information — including a full version of the English-language Wikipedia encyclopedia — provided by the Arch Mission Foundation, a nonprofit seeking to create a backup of humanity’s knowledge.', 'A final drill at SpaceIL’s mission control in Yehud, Israel, last week.', 'How long will the mission last?', 'Not long. Beresheet is not designed to operate for more than a few days. It will land at the beginning of a lunar day. The electronics are not designed to survive the hotter temperatures that prevail on the moon’s surface as the sun gets higher in the moon’s sky.', 'Will the mission succeed?', 'The traditional and more expensive approach to spacecraft design is to rely on components that have successfully flown before, and to include backups for critical systems. SpaceIL left out much of the redundancy and tried to take a more nimble approach to save money.', 'The engineers at SpaceIL and Israel Aerospace Industries, the large aerospace company that collaborated on building Beresheet, said the mission is riskier, but they made considered decisions on where to take shortcuts.', 'Will Beresheet hop?', 'One of the requirements for winning the $20 million Google Lunar X Prize was that the spacecraft had to move 500 meters, or 1,640 feet, on the lunar surface. To achieve this, SpaceIL’s engineers planned to have Beresheet take off again after landing and move the required distance.', 'The SpaceIL team will make a final hop-or-no-hop decision after the landing in April.', 'What other spacecraft launched with Beresheet aboard the SpaceX rocket?', 'Beresheet was not the main payload on the rocket. The main customer was Pasifik Satelit Nusantara, an Indonesian satellite operator that is launching a telecommunications satellite called Nusantara Satu. As a secondary rideshare, SpaceIL was able to pay much less for its trip.', 'The rocket will also deploy an experimental satellite for the United States Air Force.', 'The first stage of the SpaceX Falcon 9 rocket itself has launched and landed twice, once in July 2018 and again in October.', 'Kenneth Chang has been at The Times since 2000, writing about physics, geology, chemistry, and the planets. Before becoming a science writer, he was a graduate student whose research involved the control of chaos.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Wait —: Wait — What Is a Hole?
['Wait — What Is a Hole?', 'Wait — What Is a Hole?', 'Allow me to ruin your life real quick.', 'A few days into the new year, someone asked me, as a kind of puzzle: “What is a hole?” Right now, your brain is protecting you; human brains are poor multitaskers and since yours is occupied with reading, you haven’t yet had time to sit back and consider the question that has blown across the fecund wasteland of my thoughts nearly every day of 2019. The problem is that your brain cannot protect you forever. If you want to get off this ride, you need to do it now.', 'What is a hole?', 'And yet, there are other characteristics of holes that escape our special attention. We have no common word for a hole that is bigger than a pinprick but smaller than a pothole. German identifies a metaphorical hole in the month of January when the bustle, spirits and commerce of the holiday season suddenly abate (“Januarloch”). In some dialects of Spanish, a “butrón” is a hole made in a building to carry out a break-in.', 'Great question.', 'Speaking of holes...', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Upper East Side Salon Under Investigation for Racial Discrimination
['New York City is reviewing complaints from former employees at Sharon Dorram Color at Sally Hershberger who say their hair was deemed inappropriate for work.', 'A client getting her hair washed at Sharon Dorram Color at Sally Hershberger on the Upper East Side of Manhattan.', 'Former workers at a luxury Upper East Side hair salon that is under investigation for racial discrimination said this week that they were told by the management there that Afros and box-braided hairstyles did not reflect the upscale image of the neighborhood.', 'Between 2016 and 2018, four complaints were filed to New York City’s human rights commission about the management and one senior stylist at Sharon Dorram Color at Sally Hershberger. The resulting investigation into the salon led, in part, to the announcement last week of the city’s ban on discrimination based on hair.', 'Two other complaints were filed in June 2018. One was from a former receptionist who is Hispanic and claimed she was asked to steer clients away from stylists who refused to sign a document attesting to the fairness of the salon’s dress code.', 'Ms. Dorram asked him to create a dress code.', 'Ms. Ocasio, 28, who is Puerto Rican, said in an interview this week that she quit her job at the salon because she felt the hair-up rule was racist.', 'Ms. Roberts said that if white employees wore their hair down, “no one said anything.” She quit in May 2016 and filed a complaint several months later in December.', 'Afro.', 'Ms. Guy described the policy of mandating ponytails and buns as “a cop-out.” She said: “They were trying to figure out a way to have me not wear my hair like this,” referring to her Afro.', 'Ms. Aubourg, 26, also quit shortly after the rules were introduced, about a year after she was hired. When she started at the salon in October 2014, Ms. Aubourg wore her hair in a weave and it was straight. But later that year, after she came back from vacation with box braids, a senior stylist, Tim Lehman, didn’t approve, she said.', 'Mr. Lehman did not reply to repeated requests for comment.', 'Ms. Dorram vehemently denied that the employee hair policy was racially motivated and said the text messages were mischaracterized. She also said she offered Ms. Roberts a promotion and a raise and claimed that after Ms. Roberts quit, she would return to the salon for blowouts.', 'On Wednesday, Mr. Tuttleman said he was unaware of the details of the allegations. He described himself as a “silent partner,” who is not involved in the daily operations of the salon. “Of course, I don’t condone racial discrimination at all and never would support it in any capacity,” he said.', 'Mr. Speer, the general manager, shared emails with the Times that he sent to Ms. Hershberger and Mr. Tuttleman in August of 2015 informing them that he was resigning because he refused to enforce dress code policies.', 'On Wednesday, Ms. Guy recalled that in her time at the salon, clients reacted positively to her look.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Marella Agnelli, Society’s ‘Last Swan’ and a Passionate Gardener, Is Dead at 91
['Marella Agnelli and her husband, Giovanni Agnelli, in 1988.', 'Marella Agnelli, a descendant of Neapolitan nobility who lived a rarefied life of palatial estates, ornamental gardens, fine art, high fashion and lofty society, died on Saturday at her home in Turin, Italy. She was 91.', 'The death was announced by the Agnelli family in a statement.', 'Mrs. Agnelli remained active and creative in her later years, purchasing and restoring a dilapidated villa in Marrakesh, Morocco, publishing an autobiographical coffee table book and appearing in an HBO documentary about the life of her husband, in 2003.', 'She was born Princess Marella Caracciolo di Castagneto on May 4, 1927, in Florence. Her mother, the former Margaret Clarke of Peoria, Ill., was a wealthy Anglo-American expatriate, the daughter of a distiller; her father, Filippo Caracciolo, was part of a Neapolitan noble family.', 'The Agnellis in Rome in 1954.', 'Marella’s world expanded with her education. She studied art and design at the Académie des Beaux-Arts and Académie Julian in Paris before moving to New York in the early 1950s. There she modeled in exchange for the chance to learn about photography from Erwin Blumenfeld, a Vogue contributor.', 'The life of Mr. Agnelli, known as Gianni to his friends, seemed in line with the adventurous one she hoped to lead. She had heard stories about his service in World War II from friends and knew well of his tight-knit family’s penchant for glamour and speed.', 'Fiat, the company Mr. Agnelli’s grandfather founded in 1899 in Turin, had experienced tremendous growth after the war during a period known as Italy’s “miracolo economico,” or economic miracle. Accordingly, the Agnellis insulated their lives with excess: parties, villas, yachts, cars, women.', 'Gianni, the eldest of the seven Agnelli children and the head of the family since his parents’ deaths, had a reputation for being a playboy and had frequently been mentioned in gossip columns. So when he and Marella got engaged in 1953, it was a relief to his siblings.', 'The Agnellis’ villa in the hills of Italy’s Piedmont region.', 'After the wedding, Mrs. Agnelli was not eager to take on the role of housewife. She had recently spent 18 months apprenticing with Blumenfeld and accepted a reporting job with Condé Nast, which she abandoned after the wedding.', 'What she did love, though, was the leisure and the luxury. In the Vanity Fair article, she recalled a shopping trip in Paris shortly after the wedding. Mrs. Agnelli had booked an overnight train from Turin, and when she boarded her sleeping car, she found that it was full of her home comforts: monogrammed towels, her favorite toiletries, even fresh flowers.', 'Marella Agnelli during the funeral service for her husband, Gianni Agnelli, of the Fiat car manufacturing empire, in Turin, Italy, in 2003.', 'The couple had their first child, Edoardo, in 1954, and Margherita followed the next year. Mrs. Agnelli is survived by her daughter, Margherita Agnelli de Pahlen, her brother Nicola Caracciolo di Castagneto and eight grandchildren. Her son died in 2000.', 'As parents Marella and Gianni continued to refine their image as a power couple. They acquired an expansive contemporary art collection that included works by Jasper Johns, Robert Rauschenberg and Frank Stella; yachted up and down the Amalfi Coast with John and Jacqueline Kennedy and swam in the Adriatic Sea with Mr. Capote; collected cars, yachts and private planes; and cultivated acres of pristine gardens at their several homes on three continents.', 'Gardening was one of Mrs. Agnelli’s lifelong passions. She spent decades working with the English garden designer Russell Page to perfect her family’s 25 acres at Villar Perosa in Turin, and later got involved with the Italian Environmental Fund, an organization focused on preserving historic landscapes. Her love of landscape architecture was cataloged in two books that she co-wrote, “Gardens of the Italian Villas” (1987) and “The Agnelli Gardens at Villar Perosa: Two Centuries of a Family Retreat” (1998).', 'Gaia Pianigiani and Vanessa Friedman contributed reporting.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Domains: We Love to Be Smushed
['Heavy bedding is everywhere. Does it work?', 'Mr. Roche wanted out of architecture, but bubble ball, he reckoned, was maybe not the most sustainable future. He had been reading self-help books on entrepreneurship and they all said the same thing: Just start something.', 'By June of 2017 he had an online shingle, some basic Google ads and a place on Amazon. By 2018, rocabi was selling thousands for $199 and had branched out, just before Christmas, with a new item: the Boyfriend Blanket, made from shearling and denim, to mimic the look of a cozy jean jacket.', 'Mr. Roche is hardly alone in his heavy-bedding endeavor. Weight may be the new thread count, as he and other newly minted makers of therapeutic comforters hope to turn the bedroom into a quasi-medical space, the latest iteration in the commodification of sleep.', 'One frigid afternoon when the Polar Vortex was in town, I dragged the Boyfriend Blanket onto the sofa, furry side up. I put myself and the cat on top, and wrestled the Napper into place over my shins.', 'Thus encumbered, the cat and I passed out.', 'Penelope Green is a reporter for Styles. She has been a reporter for the Home section, editor of Styles of The Times — an early iteration of Styles — and a story editor at the Times magazine.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Norman Orentreich, 96, Force Behind Hair Transplants, Dies
['Dr. Norman Orentreich in the mid-1950s during an appearance on the television program “World of Medicine.” His research showed the viability of transplanting hair to a bald scalp.', 'Dr. Orentreich (pronounced OR-en-trike), who died on Jan. 23 at 96, went on to develop other cosmetic countermeasures for aging, but not without controversy. One of his novel treatments — injecting tiny droplets of liquid silicone in the skin to smooth facial wrinkles — raised concerns among some of his peers and drew regulatory scrutiny.', 'Dr. Orentreich’s pioneering approach and personal attention drew actors, artists, models, publishing executives and other high-profile clients to his office, the Orentreich Medical Group, on Fifth Avenue on Manhattan’s Upper East Side.', 'In addition to transplants and injections, Dr. Orentreich often prescribed face creams and other products of his own devising.', 'It was the second multibillion-dollar market that he had a hand in advancing. Today, American beauty products that apply ideas from dermatology to promote skin health or treat problems like acne are cosmetic industry staples.', 'Dr. Norman Orentreich in 2011. His private Fifth Avenue practice drew actors, artists, models, publishing executives and other high-profile clients.', 'Although Dr. Orentreich’s name was not listed on Clinique’s products, his role as its guiding dermatologist paved the way decades later for entrepreneurial plastic surgeons and dermatologists to develop and market skin-care brands under their own names.', 'Norman Orentreich was born on Dec. 26, 1922, in Manhattan and, with his younger brother, Seymour, grew up in tenements on the Lower East Side.', 'His father, David Orentreich, an immigrant from Austria, was a tailor in the garment district. His mother, Anna Scheiner, from Poland, ran a store selling household items.', 'Dr. Orentreich’s entrepreneurial bent emerged early on. He learned to drive when he was 13 during the Great Depression, and earned money parking cars.', 'He graduated from Stuyvesant High School in Manhattan in 1939 and from City College of New York with a bachelor’s in biology and chemistry.', 'While he was an undergraduate, Dr. Orentreich met his future wife, Roslyn Seidner, who was in high school. He was 19 and she was 16. The meeting had been arranged by their parents. Her father, a furrier, had met his father through the garment industry.', 'Dr. Orentreich received an introduction to medicine after he was drafted into the Navy during World War II. From 1943 to 1945, he was stationed at the Brooklyn Navy Yard, where he served in the Navy Medical Corps as a pharmacist’s mate, helping medical officers examine recruits.', 'After the war he attended what is now the New York University School of Medicine, graduating in 1948. From 1950 to 1953 he did postgraduate training in dermatology at the N.Y.U. Medical Center’s skin and cancer unit. He became head of the unit’s hair clinic in 1953.', 'But the medical understanding of hair loss was still in its early stages, and the young doctor had few treatments to offer. To learn more about hair growth and loss, he devised a research study, in which he punched out small circles of skin from the back and front of men’s scalps. He then transplanted the hair that he had removed from the back of the head to bald areas in the front.', 'It was a eureka moment. And it led Dr. Orentreich to begin developing hair transplantation surgery as a viable, medically proven treatment.', 'But his idea was so revolutionary that a major dermatology journal declined to publish his research. It was eventually published in the Annals of the New York Academy of Sciences, in 1959. Over the decades, other doctors would refine hair transplantation surgery.', 'His son, Dr. David Orentreich, said his father died of complications of pneumonia in Manhattan. In addition to him, he is survived by two daughters, Dr. Catherine Orentreich and Sari Mass, and four grandchildren. David and Catherine Orentreich, both dermatologists, continue to run their father’s practice and also consult for Clinique.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


China Uses DNA to Track Its People, With the Help of American Expertise
['Tahir Imin, a 38-year-old Uighur, had his blood drawn, his face scanned and his voice recorded by the authorities in China’s Xinjiang region.', 'The Chinese authorities turned to a Massachusetts company and a prominent Yale researcher as they built an enormous system of surveillance and control.', 'Tahir Imin, a 38-year-old Uighur, had his blood drawn, his face scanned and his voice recorded by the authorities in China’s Xinjiang region.', 'BEIJING — The authorities called it a free health check. Tahir Imin had his doubts.', 'They drew blood from the 38-year-old Muslim, scanned his face, recorded his voice and took his fingerprints. They didn’t bother to check his heart or kidneys, and they rebuffed his request to see the results.', 'Mr. Imin was one of millions of people caught up in a vast Chinese campaign of surveillance and oppression. To give it teeth, the Chinese authorities are collecting DNA — and they got unlikely corporate and academic help from the United States to do it.', 'Collecting genetic material is a key part of China’s campaign, according to human rights groups and Uighur activists. They say a comprehensive DNA database could be used to chase down any Uighurs who resist conforming to the campaign.', 'To bolster their DNA capabilities, scientists affiliated with China’s police used equipment made by Thermo Fisher, a Massachusetts company. For comparison with Uighur DNA, they also relied on genetic material from people around the world that was provided by Kenneth Kidd, a prominent Yale University geneticist.', 'On Wednesday, Thermo Fisher said it would no longer sell its equipment in Xinjiang, the part of China where the campaign to track Uighurs is mostly taking place. The company said separately in an earlier statement to The New York Times that it was working with American officials to figure out how its technology was being used.', 'Dr. Kidd said he had been unaware of how his material and know-how were being used. He said he believed Chinese scientists were acting within scientific norms that require informed consent by DNA donors.', 'China’s campaign poses a direct challenge to the scientific community and the way it makes cutting-edge knowledge publicly available. The campaign relies in part on public DNA databases and commercial technology, much of it made or managed in the United States. In turn, Chinese scientists have contributed Uighur DNA samples to a global database, potentially violating scientific norms of consent.', 'Cooperation from the global scientific community “legitimizes this type of genetic surveillance,” said Mark Munsterhjelm, an assistant professor at the University of Windsor in Ontario who has closely tracked the use of American technology in Xinjiang.', 'China has maintained an iron grip in Xinjiang, where it is trying to make Uighur Muslims more subservient to the Communist Party.', 'From 2016 to 2017, nearly 36 million people took part in it, according to Xinhua, China’s official news agency. The authorities collected DNA samples, images of irises and other personal data, according to Uighurs and human rights groups. It is unclear whether some residents participated more than once — Xinjiang has a population of about 24.5 million.', 'In late 2016, the Communist Party embarked on a campaign to turn the Uighurs and other largely Muslim minority groups into loyal supporters. The government locked up hundreds of thousands of them in what it called job training camps, touted as a way to escape poverty, backwardness and radical Islam. It also began to take DNA samples.', 'In at least some of the cases, people didn’t give up their genetic material voluntarily. To mobilize Uighurs for the free medical checkups, police and local cadres called or sent them text messages, telling them the checkups were required, according to Uighurs interviewed by The Times.', 'A market in Kashgar, a city in Xinjiang. China has detained up to a million people in camps in the western region.', 'Kenneth Kidd first visited China in 1981 and remained curious about the country. So when he received an invitation in 2010 for an expenses-paid trip to visit Beijing, he said yes.', 'Dr. Kidd is a major figure in the genetics field. The 77-year-old Yale professor has helped to make DNA evidence more acceptable in American courts.', 'His Chinese hosts had their own background in law enforcement. They were scientists from the Ministry of Public Security — essentially, China’s police.', 'During that trip, Dr. Kidd met Li Caixia, the chief forensic physician of the ministry’s Institute of Forensic Science. The relationship deepened. In December 2014, Dr. Li arrived at Dr. Kidd’s lab for an 11-month stint. She took some DNA samples back to China.', 'Dr. Kidd’s data became part of China’s DNA drive.', 'Paul Flicek, member of the steering committee of the 1000 Genomes Project, said that its data was unrestricted and that “there is no obvious problem” if it was being used as a way to determine where a DNA sample came from.', 'The data flow also went the other way.', 'Dr. Kidd said he was “not particularly happy” that the ministry had cited him in its patents, saying his data shouldn’t be used in ways that could allow people or institutions to potentially profit from it. If the Chinese authorities used data they got from their earlier collaborations with him, he added, there is little he can do to stop them.', 'He said he was unaware of the filings until he was contacted by The Times.', 'Dr. Kidd also said he considered his collaboration with the ministry to be no different from his work with police and forensics labs elsewhere. He said governments should have access to data about minorities, not just the dominant ethnic group, in order to have an accurate picture of the whole population.', 'As for the consent issue, he said the burden of meeting that standard lay with the Chinese researchers, though he said reports about what Uighurs are subjected to in China raised some difficult questions.', 'China is ramping up spending on health care and research. The Chinese market for gene-sequencing equipment and other technologies was worth $1 billion in 2017 and could more than double in five years, according to CCID Consulting, a research firm. But the Chinese market is loosely regulated, and it isn’t always clear where the equipment goes or to what uses it is put.', 'Thermo Fisher sells everything from lab instruments to forensic DNA testing kits to DNA mapping machines, which help scientists decipher a person’s ethnicity and identify diseases to which he or she is particularly vulnerable. China accounted for 10 percent of Thermo Fisher’s $20.9 billion in revenue, according to the company’s 2017 annual report, and it employs nearly 5,000 people there.', 'China used Thermo Fisher’s equipment to map the genes of its people, according to five Ministry of Public Security patent filings.', 'The researchers said they had obtained 95 Uighur DNA samples, some of which were given to them by the police. Other samples were provided by Uighurs voluntarily, they said.', 'Tahir Hamut, a Uighur now living in Virginia whose blood was taken by the police in Xinjiang, said it was “inconceivable” that Uighurs there would have consented to give DNA samples.', 'Human rights groups praised Thermo Fisher’s move. Still, they said, equipment and information flows into China should be better monitored, to make sure the authorities elsewhere don’t send them to Xinjiang.', 'China’s tracking campaign unnerved people like Tahir Hamut. In May 2017, the police in the city of Urumqi in Xinjiang drew the 49-year-old Uighur’s blood, took his fingerprints, recorded his voice and took a scan of his face. He was called back a month later for what he was told was a free health check at a local clinic.', 'Mr. Hamut, a filmmaker who is now living in Virginia, said he saw between 20 to 40 Uighurs in line. He said it was absurd to think that such frightened people had consented to submit their DNA.', 'Sui-Lee Wee has been a correspondent for The New York Times in the Beijing bureau since October 2016. She covers business in China, Chinese consumers, health care and the intersection of demographics and the economy.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Inside the Rise and Fall of a Multimillion-Dollar Airbnb Scheme
['Two apartments at 385 Greenwich Street in TriBeCa, Manhattan, were illegally offered through Airbnb, city officials said. According to a lawsuit, they were part of an enterprise that made more than $20 million in revenue.', 'Multiple misleading identities, more than 100 host accounts and 18 corporations were created to run an illegal hotel business in Manhattan, according to a lawsuit filed by the city.', 'Two apartments at 385 Greenwich Street in TriBeCa, Manhattan, were illegally offered through Airbnb, city officials said. According to a lawsuit, they were part of an enterprise that made more than $20 million in revenue.', 'From the outside, there was nothing especially notable about the small white building on the corner of a cobblestone street in TriBeCa. But until recently, it was a crucial location in a sprawling empire.', 'Two of the three apartments in the building were popular with tourists looking to stay in one of Manhattan’s most desirable neighborhoods — at $600 a night each, they were a bargain for a large group.', 'But they were also illegal — part of an elaborate real estate scheme to make millions by circumventing state and local laws and Airbnb’s own rules.', 'The plot was geared toward getting around city regulations that are intended to keep blocks of apartments from being turned into makeshift hotels that avoid lodging taxes and oversight.', 'Interviews and documents offer a glimpse at how the New York scheme worked. According to the suit, the ring used multiple misleading identities to dodge Airbnb’s rules, text tourists and book apartments to budget-minded travelers. Addresses were fudged to avoid scrutiny. A cadre of cleaners was apparently recruited through Facebook.', 'In all, more than 100 Airbnb host accounts and 18 corporations were created to run an illegal hotel business that stretched north from TriBeCa to SoHo, Gramercy, the Upper East Side and Harlem, according to a lawsuit brought by the city.', 'One apartment on Greenwich Street was advertised on Airbnb as “Beautiful Loft Prime Tribeca 4BR/2BA Sleep 10” for $600 a night.', 'New York regulations are supposed to keep apartments from being pulled out of an already-tight rental market to cater to the tourist trade. They specify that it is illegal to rent an entire apartment in most buildings for fewer than 30 days unless the permanent tenant is present while the renter is there.', 'Posting a unit that should not be listed on Airbnb is a civil offense, not a criminal one, and the city typically issues violations that can result in fines of thousands of dollars; lawsuits are filed in the most egregious of cases. In this lawsuit, the city is seeking more than $20 million from the defendants.', 'At the center of the scheme was Max Beckman, 35, a former real estate broker, according to the lawsuit. Mr. Beckman, who moved to the United States 18 years ago from Israel, was one of five people accused. There has not been a verdict, and the case is continuing.', 'Mr. Beckman agreed to be interviewed, making clear that he believed that he did nothing wrong.', 'What he did have was an ambitious, though risky, idea.', 'It was 2012 and Mr. Beckman, in his own telling, was struggling to make it as a real estate broker. He said he had a dismal credit score and $100 to his name when he used that money to pay the application fee for a one-bedroom on the Upper East Side.', 'He began renting it out, short term, to tourists through Airbnb and pocketed the difference after paying rent. It was a simple business model he would go on to replicate.', 'In 2015, Mr. Beckman quit his job as a real estate broker for Metropolitan Property Group, a brokerage firm in Manhattan, to devote himself full time to his Airbnb venture.', 'He persuaded two friends who were also brokers at the firm to become his partners, he said. The men, Alon Karasenty and Simon Itah, were also sued by the city. They did not respond to multiple requests for comment.', 'By the end of the year, the trio was managing dozens of listings on Airbnb, including large spaces in some of the city’s most sought-after neighborhoods — a penthouse overlooking Central Park, a loft in Chelsea — according to court documents.', 'The lawsuit alleged that Mr. Beckman’s former employer, Metropolitan Property Group, and its chief executive officer, Sami Katri, along with his wife, Shely Katri, were also involved.', 'Some of the 18 corporations that received payouts from Airbnb had been registered using Metropolitan Property Group’s office addresses. The suit also claimed the Katris’ names were linked to two Airbnb accounts and the utility bills for two apartments at 200 East 116th Street in East Harlem, where all seven units were on Airbnb.', 'The listing on Airbnb for a four-bedroom unit at 200 East 116th Street in East Harlem.', 'But Mr. Beckman said that the addresses were used without the company’s knowledge and that the Katris were not involved.', 'Mr. Katri, through his lawyer, said he had partnered with Mr. Karasenty and Mr. Itah to legally lease apartments at the East Harlem building, but was unaware they were rented out through Airbnb.', 'The scheme required leasing scores of apartments.', 'Some landlords claimed they were deceived, renting apartments to Mr. Beckman and his partners without knowing the units would be used as hotel rooms.', 'For example, Mr. Beckman signed leases for two apartments in another East Harlem building in late 2017, according to a separate lawsuit filed by the building’s owner last year.', 'A day after signing the lease, the apartments were on Airbnb under the host names “Cedric” and “Tom & Lisa,” the lawsuit said.', 'The rent for one apartment was $3,225, but it was on Airbnb for $250 a night. Hypothetically, Mr. Beckman could cover a month’s rent by filling it with tourists for about two weeks.', 'The owner of 78 East 119th Street in East Harlem sued Max Beckman after Mr. Beckman leased two apartments in the building and rented them to tourists through Airbnb.', 'In just a few months, Mr. Beckman had booked more than 500 guests and generated about $84,000 from the building at 78 East 119th Street, according to the city’s lawsuit.', 'Some residents in the 10-unit building grew annoyed by strangers constantly showing up with luggage.', 'The listing for an apartment in East Harlem. The city has argued that Airbnb has diminished the supply of housing available to full-time renters.', 'The city learned that the units were on Airbnb and slapped the landlord with violations last year, meaning daily fines that could have cost about $60,000, according to Gary Wachtel, a lawyer for Orsipel, the company that owns the building.', 'Airbnb has long said the majority of its hosts are everyday New Yorkers who rent out a spare bedroom or list their apartment while on a long vacation.', 'Still, the company has voluntarily taken down more than 5,000 commercial listings since late 2015. The city estimates that about one-third of listings on home-sharing websites are run by commercial operators; Airbnb disputes those numbers.', 'Under Airbnb’s “One Host, One Home” policy, New Yorkers can list only one apartment, with few exceptions.', 'But Mr. Beckman and his partners appear to have bypassed that policy by creating host accounts using different email addresses and multiple identities, including those of relatives and some with variations of the same name (“Jacob Itah” vs. “Jacob Itach”).', 'They also provided Airbnb with incorrect or incomplete addresses for apartments to avoid scrutiny, according to the city’s lawsuit.', 'Josh Meltzer, the head of public policy for Airbnb in the Northeast, condemned the behavior and acknowledged the limitations of the company’s rules, which he said were intended as a short-term remedy.', 'The mayor and other politicians have argued that Airbnb listings diminish the supply of apartments available to full-time renters, making the city’s affordable housing crisis even worse.', 'But Mr. Beckman said that he never rented out rent-stabilized units and that his listings did not take apartments away from low-income New Yorkers. The majority of the units were high-end apartments in expensive neighborhoods, he said.', 'Ultimately, Mr. Beckman believes the city’s tourism industry could benefit if lawmakers allow apartments to be offered on Airbnb and taxed like hotels.', 'For him, the proof is that he and his associates made it work.', 'At its peak, the city claimed, the business run by Mr. Beckman and his partners booked tens of thousands of guests for 55,331 nights over three years across 35 different buildings.', 'Six buildings each generated more than $1 million in revenue; the top-earner was a residential building in Kips Bay that brought in about $1.8 million, according to the city.', 'At the beginning, Mr. Beckman said, he decorated the apartments with used furniture, but later was able to afford an interior designer.', 'He was also able to employ 15 housekeepers who roamed Manhattan tidying up the apartments, he said.', 'Indeed, most tourists left positive ratings in listings reviewed by The New York Times, although a few lobbed complaints.', 'The Airbnb listing for an apartment at 385 Greenwich Street. Mr. Beckman said his listings did not take units away from low-income New Yorkers.', 'Ms. Swift said she felt unsafe when someone entered the apartment to replace a couch without notice while she was away. She realized the apartment above hers was also a faux hotel after she saw three different groups cycle in and out during her 10-day stay.', 'The lease for one of the apartments in the TriBeCa building was signed by Mr. Beckman and his two partners, and the monthly rent checks of $25,000 for both units were mostly paid by different corporations connected to the men, according to court documents.', 'The landlord, a company presided over by Charles Cohen, terminated the lease in March as a result of the short-term rentals, the lawsuit said. But, according to court documents, Mr. Cohen continued to receive monthly checks until the end of 2018, and the apartments were on Airbnb’s website as late as a few weeks ago.', 'It was unclear whether landlords were typically aware of the Airbnb operations in their buildings, and Mr. Beckman refused to comment on the matter.', 'Mr. Cohen, who appeared to have leased apartments in other buildings where the partners listed Airbnbs, did not respond to multiple requests for comment.', 'All seven apartments in a building at 200 East 116th Street in East Harlem were offered on Airbnb.', 'One night in early January, a police sergeant showed up outside Mr. Beckman’s apartment to serve him with a notice that the city was going to sue him.', 'Mr. Beckman was not home, so the sergeant left the notice with his wife.', 'Since then, Mr. Beckman, who has two children, has been huddling with his lawyers and shuttering his Airbnb operations, terminating dozens of apartment leases.', 'The city also sued five buildings for not cracking down on Airbnbs managed by Mr. Beckman and his partners despite violations issued by the city.', 'Abington Properties, the owner of three of the buildings, did not reply to multiple requests for comment. A secretary for Helm Management, which runs the East Harlem building that became a de facto hotel, said the company did not comment on pending litigation.', 'Mr. Beckman said he intended to reach a settlement with the city, even if that meant paying a hefty fine. He said that, despite the lawsuit, he spoke to The Times because he thought the city had unfairly portrayed him as a criminal.', 'Now, he said, his sights were on “legal new ventures.” Asked to elaborate, he said he was starting a business to sell electric scooters, which are illegal to ride on New York City streets, but could be legalized by the City Council soon.', 'Derek M. Norman contributed reporting. Doris Burke contributed research.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Nine Key Questions About the Green New Deal
['Representative Alexandria Ocasio-Cortez of New York and Senator Edward J. Markey of Massachusetts, right, announcing the resolution on Feb. 7.', 'Want climate news in your inbox?', 'A Green New Deal is Technologically Possible. Its Political Prospects Are Another Question.', 'What is the Green New Deal?', 'The Green New Deal is a congressional resolution that lays out a grand plan for tackling climate change.', 'Introduced by Representative Alexandria Ocasio-Cortez of New York and Senator Edward J. Markey of Massachusetts, both Democrats, the proposal calls on the federal government to wean the United States from fossil fuels and curb planet-warming greenhouse gas emissions across the economy. It also aims to guarantee new high-paying jobs in clean energy industries.', 'The resolution is nonbinding, so even if Congress approves it, nothing in the proposal would become law.', 'Variations of the proposal have been around for years.', 'Ms.', 'Will there be a vote on it?', 'Yes.', 'Republicans have cast the Green New Deal as a socialist takeover and say it is evidence that Democrats are far from the mainstream on energy issues.', 'Mitch McConnell, the Senate majority leader, plans to bring the plan to the floor as early as next week. Democrats say that the vote would be a stunt because Republican Senate leaders do not want to have a sincere debate about climate change.', 'What problem is the Green New Deal addressing?', 'Oil refineries near Norco, La. The Green New Deal calls on the federal government to wean the United States from fossil fuels.', 'The goal of the Green New Deal is to reduce greenhouse gas emissions in order to avoid the worst consequences of climate change while also trying to fix societal problems like economic inequality and racial injustice.', 'Subscribe today for free.', 'Supporters of the Green New Deal also believe that change can’t just be a technological feat, and say it must also tackle poverty, income inequality and racial discrimination.', 'A Green New Deal Is Technologically Possible. Its Political Prospects Are Another Question.', 'What are its main provisions?', 'The Green New Deal calls on the federal government to dramatically reduce greenhouse gas emissions, create high-paying jobs, ensure that clean air, clean water and healthy food are basic human rights, and end all forms of oppression.', 'To achieve those goals, the plan calls for the launch of a “10-year mobilization” to reduce carbon emissions in the United States. It envisions sourcing 100 percent of the country’s electricity from renewable and zero-emissions power, digitizing the nation’s power grid, upgrading every building in the country to be more energy-efficient, and overhauling the nation’s transportation system by investing in electric vehicles and high-speed rail.', 'To address social justice, the resolution says it is the duty of the government to provide job training and new economic development, particularly to communities that currently rely on jobs in fossil fuel industries.', 'What doesn’t it say?', 'The resolution doesn’t do any of those things.', 'The resolution itself also steers clear of endorsing or rejecting specific technologies or sources of energy, something that Mr. Markey said was done purposefully to encourage broader support for the plan.', 'What’s with the name?', 'The Green New Deal takes its name and inspiration from the major government makeover, known as the New Deal, launched by President Franklin D. Roosevelt to help the United States recover from the Great Depression.', 'That series of public-works programs and financial reforms included the Civilian Conservation Corps (which put people to work in manual labor jobs like planting trees and constructing park trails) and the creation of the Public Works Administration to work on the construction of bridges, dams, schools and more.', 'Like the original New Deal, the Green New Deal is not a single project or piece of legislation.', 'What are the costs?', 'That’s not clear yet.', 'President Trump claimed it would cost $100 trillion. Supporters of the Green New Deal say climate change could be equally costly to the American economy. For now it’s impossible to pin down dollar figures on the plan.', 'Modernizing the electrical grid across the United States could cost as much as $476 billion, yet reap $2 trillion in benefits, according to a 2011 study issued by the Electric Power Research Institute.', 'Ms. Ocasio-Cortez has acknowledged that the Green New Deal is going to be expensive, but contends the plan will pay for itself through economic growth.', 'Do critics offer alternative proposals?', 'How will the Green New Deal shape the debate?', 'At the same time, all of the attention on the Green New Deal has put new pressure on Republican critics to come up with their own plan for cutting greenhouse gases.', 'It is likely that the Green New Deal will remain a lightning rod throughout the 2020 presidential campaign.', 'Lisa Friedman reports on climate and environmental policy in Washington. A former editor at Climatewire, she has covered nine international climate talks.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Trilobites: The World’s Largest Bee Is Not Extinct
['An expedition of conservationists found a living Wallace’s Giant Bee on remote islands in Indonesia. It hadn’t been seen since 1981.', 'Wallace’s giant bee, shown here with a honeybee for scale, has a wingspan of more than 2.5 inches and a body the size of a thumb.', 'It’s been 38 years since scientists last spotted the insect known as Wallace’s Giant Bee, a rare species found only in a group of Indonesian islands called the North Moluccas. With a wingspan of 2.5 inches and a body the size of a human thumb, it’s considered the world’s largest bee, and was feared extinct.', 'Like the Science Times page on Facebook.', 'Science Times newsletter.', 'The discovery did not come easily. Despite the bee’s size, its rarity, remote location and nesting habits make it difficult to find.', 'The bees make their homes by digging holes in the nests of tree-dwelling termites, where they spend much of their time hiding.', 'Photographer Clay Bolt, left, and a guide, Iswan, photographing the Megachile pluto nest in the North Moluccas of Indonesia.', 'Though Wallace didn’t seem particularly interested in the bee — he devoted only a single line to it in his journal — it became something of an obsession among biologists. The next sighting didn’t come until 1981, when Adam Messer, an entomologist, observed several in the wild and returned home with a handful of specimens that are now held in the American Museum of Natural History in New York, the Natural History Museum in London and other institutions.', 'Dr. Messer observed that the bees use their unusually large mandibles to scrape together balls of tree resin and wood to fortify their nests, and that they are relatively solitary animals.', 'Simon Robson of the University of Sydney with the live specimen, the first time a living Megachile pluto has been photographed and videotaped.', 'The plan now is for the team to return to the island and conduct more extensive research, but “that will involve making links with local scientists in the area and getting permission to go and work with them,” said Dr. Robson.', 'Can You Pick the Bees Out of This Insect Lineup?', 'Do Bees Know Nothing?', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Trilobites: Sleepless Flies Lived Long Lives. Why Not Us?
['Sleepless Flies Lived Long Lives. Why Not Us?', 'Sleepless Flies Lived Long Lives. Why Not Us?', 'Flies deprived of sleep didn’t see reductions in their life spans. Does that mean we’ve got sleep deprivation all wrong?', 'Researchers developed a system for monitoring fruit flies kept track of their movements with cameras and used tiny motors that would tip the flies any time they went still for 20 seconds.', 'Sleep — that absurd, amazing habit of losing consciousness for hours on end — is so universal across the animal kingdom that we usually assume it is essential to survival. Now, however, scientists who repeatedly disturbed the sleep of more than a thousand fruit flies are reporting that less slumber may be necessary for sustaining life than previously thought, at least in one species.', 'A handful of studies involving dogs and cockroaches going back to the late 19th century suggest that being deprived of sleep can result in a shortened life span. But the methods behind some of these studies can make it difficult to say whether the test subjects were harmed by sleep deprivation itself, or by the stress of the treatment they were given — such as being shaken constantly.', 'The new study took a milder approach, in hope of seeing the true effects of sleep deprivation. The automated system the researchers developed for monitoring the flies kept track of their movements with cameras, scoring any extended period without movement as sleep. When they were not being awakened repeatedly, the males slept about 10 hours a day, females about five on average.', 'To keep the flies awake, the researchers equipped the system with tiny motors that would gently tip the flies any time they went still for at least 20 seconds. With this method, researchers deprived flies of rest over the course of their entire lifetimes, tipping them hundreds of times a day such that if they were snoozing during those periods of stillness, they might have been able to sleep around 2.5 hours a day on average.', 'Like the Science Times page on Facebook.', 'Science Times newsletter.', 'While female flies in the experiment died about ten days sooner than other flies, male flies had completely normal life spans of about 50 days. Dr. Gilestro suggests that perhaps whatever sleep is doing in the way of essential maintenance can happen in a very, very short period of time, such that little sleep is required to keep an organism alive.', 'The study has limitations. It looked at only a single strain of fruit fly, said Dragana Rogulja, a professor at Harvard who studies sleep using fruit flies. “In principle, I think it would be have been awesome to test multiple strains,” she said, to understand whether other flies, some of which can live much longer, respond similarly.', 'Additionally, not everyone agrees that the scientists have succeeded in accurately recording when the flies are awake or asleep. Some periods in which flies made tiny movements were scored as waking time, for instance.', 'Dr. Gilestro countered that these movements are not the same as the twitches that occur while animals are asleep.', 'The flies walked around in between the recorded small movements, and they appeared to be feeding or grooming at those times.', 'The work touches on an interesting question: how much does the length of time spent asleep connect to sleep’s beneficial effects? For most of us, knowing exactly how much sleep you need to be healthy is likely to remain of academic interest. The unpleasant effects of missing even a couple hours, or being awakened even a couple times during the night, tend to discourage experimentation. But it’s intriguing to think that perhaps some of that time spent asleep matters less than the rest of it.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


styles Q. AND A.: Where Is Carine Roitfeld Now? Making Perfume
['The longtime editor of Vogue Paris strips down to advertise seven new scents.', 'Ms. Roitfeld near her office on Avenue Montaigne in Paris.', 'They will be placed in hot spots all over the city. No model, fashion editor or tourist will be able to escape them. A team has been hired to put up new posters if the first ones are vandalized or covered up.', 'Ms. Roitfeld, 64, has long been a ubiquitous force during the shows here. As the editor in chief of Vogue Paris for 10 years and, later, the founder of CR Fashion Book, she was a front-row regular. Her parties are known for being the most exclusive and elaborate, attracting celebrities like Lady Gaga and Kim Kardashian West.', 'But in those roles she was still somewhat in the background: an editor and influencer, not the main event. Now that’s about to change.', 'They will retail for $285 apiece on Net-a-Porter beginning Monday, May 6 (coincidentally the same day that her rumored longtime rival, Anna Wintour, hosts the Met Gala). Ms. Roitfeld hopes the perfumes will be the beginning of a long line of products that will perpetuate her personal brand and legacy.', 'We had questions.', 'Tell us about the teaser posters. Are you ready for your nude photo to be all over Paris?', 'The photo was actually taken as a joke. It was two years ago, and my daughter was just taking photos of me for fun. But then I thought it might be perfect for this. I asked my son and business partner, Vladimir, if it was O.K., because sometimes I go too far.', 'I like to push. I’m not afraid. I’m following in the footsteps of some notable perfumes. Opium by Yves Saint Laurent. To call something Opium today would be forbidden. Look at Tom Ford; he had naked people in all of his pictures. A lot of people refused to put it in the magazine, but with French Vogue we did. I love the aesthetic.', 'What is the best and worst thing somebody could say about it?', 'The best thing somebody could say about it is you have a good body or you are fearless.', 'If they say “I don’t like your butt,” I don’t care. When you become a public figure you get so many butt comments on Instagram. But I don’t want anyone to think I’m pretentious. Of course I’m a bit of an exhibitionist; that I will accept. But if someone says: “Who do you think you are?” That I would not like.', 'Do you have a favorite Paris Fashion Week memory?', 'For the 90th anniversary of Paris Vogue we held the first masked ball. I copied it after the Truman Capote ball, and I tried to be at that level; I think we beat it. The girls wore the most eccentric dresses. It was a dream, dream, dream party.', 'Stone had a huge mask on for the cover of the issue, and Philip Treacy left with a big poster of her at 2 a.m.', 'Then when I launched CR Fashion Book at Raspoutine, a nightclub, we had a vampire ball. It was so exciting because everyone came for me not just because I was with Vogue. It made me happy because you don’t know if you will disappear.', 'I remember John Galliano called me on the phone before the party and said he can’t be there, but he might be the vampire that comes and bites my neck at midnight.', 'Ms. Roitfeld hopes to create other products that will perpetuate her personal brand.', 'What are you most excited about this year?', 'What will be the best show? I cannot say that, I have too many friends in fashion. But of course Chanel is always a dream. Paris Fashion Week is the greatest. I’m so happy to be home. I know people, and we are speaking French. It’s great.', 'But of course Paris has changed a lot, and it’s now very young and international. Before people looked like they were attending a meeting of Congress. Now the new kids come in crazy dressed, and it’s much more fun to look at.', 'Why did you decide to do a perfume?', 'I did a lot of collaborations, a lot of magazines, but it was always something transient. If you don’t like a magazine, thank God, there is another one coming out in three weeks. But for me perfume is a way to have a legacy. Like Miss Chanel. Chanel No. 5 has been around for almost 100 years.', 'I’ve always been very sensitive to smell. I entered a competition one time to test hundreds of vodkas blindly. I knew which one was which based on the smell.', 'Why are they modeled after seven lovers?', 'I worked 10 years with French Vogue, and I knew with advertising it was really hard to talk about perfume. If you show the bottle you look like an advertisement. If you talk about the smell, it’s very difficult to understand smell with words. So with this perfume we decided to have a story behind the perfume.', 'Seven is also my lucky number. If I get an extra lover somewhere I didn’t expect I guess I will have to do more, but this is a starting point.', 'The lovers of the perfume are just fantasies; I came up with them with my cup of tea in bed. I’m much more boring than people think I am. I would love to be like that, to be fun, but I’m really not.', 'Are any of them named after real people?', 'Lawrence, the Dubai perfume, is named after “Lawrence of Arabia.” I discovered all the ways to protect from the sun from that movie. It’s my favorite.', 'Was making perfume harder or easier than you thought?', 'I thought it would be cool to make a perfume, but it’s not cool. There are so many rules and regulations to make sure it doesn’t burn your skin. And they change across countries. In some places you can’t use alcohol, but George has weed base in it.', 'This interview has been edited and condensed.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Critic’s Notebook: President Trump Has Inspired Art. That’s Not Always a Good Thing.
['President Trump Has Inspired Art. That’s Not Always a Good Thing.', 'President Trump Has Inspired Art. That’s Not Always a Good Thing.', 'In “Ivanka Vacuuming,” the artist Jennifer Rubell hired an Ivanka Trump look-alike to clean in a former art gallery in Washington.', 'Sandow Birk’s Trumpagruel #5 from “The Horrible & Terrible Deeds & Words of the Very Renowned Trumpagruel” (2017).', 'A projection by the artist Robin Bell on the side of the Trump International Hotel in Washington, D.C., on Jan. 30, 2018.', 'That may be what’s missing from so much Trump art today — the critical introspection to accompany the laughter. Mr. Guston’s drawings and paintings are intimate, as if he were grappling with the reality of Mr. Nixon’s existence. The process of making them was fraught, both politically and artistically; only a handful were shown in the following decades (Mr. Guston died in 1980). I don’t mean to suggest that contemporary artists like Ms. Bernstein and Mr. Birk don’t know the stakes of our time — I’m sure they do — but hanging on the white walls of galleries, for the eyes of a largely liberal, self-selecting public, caricatures of President Trump feel safe. Creators and viewers alike get validation, rather than a prompt for examination or self-reflection.', 'Part of the trouble may also be with the form. When you have a president whom many people already view as a caricature, representing him as such loses some of its disruptive power. As with Ms. Rubell’s performance, you end up with familiar images and generalized meanings. What would it look like to make art about the Trumps without their likeness? How might it create different aesthetic and political possibilities?', 'An earlier version of this article referred incorrectly to the project titled “Ivanka Vacuuming.” There was one look-alike model vacuuming, not several. The error was repeated in a picture caption.', 'Is Donald Trump, Wall-Builder-in-Chief, a Conceptual Artist?', 'Painting Shows Trump Hanging Out With Lincoln and Nixon. He Loves It.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Critic’s Notebook: The Lustful Middle School Girl Rises
['In the middle school of the American collective imagination, packs of filthy-minded boys stalk the halls, snapping bras and howling at the cliff’s edge of puberty. The sex-obsessed adolescent girl is a rarer breed. More often girls are positioned as victims of raging male hormones, or else they are styled as preternaturally mature, rising above the boys and their juvenile misadventures. Now — in “PEN15,” the film “Eighth Grade” and the Netflix animated comedy “Big Mouth” — the lustful adolescent girl is having her moment.', 'The sex-obsessed adolescent girl is a rarer breed in the pop-culture portrayal of middle school, but shows like “PEN15” (starring Anna Konkle, left) are giving her a moment.', 'It is not, to be clear, an altogether glorious time. At least, it’s not for the girls themselves. Trapped in the years between childhood and adulthood, they are realizing that women are valued for their sex appeal, but do not yet know how to look or feel sexy. They think about boys constantly, but aren’t actually ready to touch them. They pursue sex and romance aggressively, but almost exclusively in their imaginations.', 'Though polished and popular girls — fitted with thongs, coated in lip gloss and paired with boyfriends — exist in their worlds, they might as well belong to a different species. Our girls are awkward and weird. They are undergoing orthodontic treatments. They have made out with every bedpost and doorframe in their bedrooms.', 'Knowing that Elsie Fisher, the star of “Eighth Grade,” was in the same life stage as her character when filming only magnifies the movie’s anxious, claustrophobic feel.', 'In the second episode of “PEN15,” Maya finds herself in a closet make-out scenario with a boy, and when she unclamps her dripping retainer from her mouth, the boy flashes a look of such genuine disgust that you can’t help but feel empathy for both parties. We have seen a version of this dynamic before — it is a staple of the teen movie (à la “She’s All That” and “Never Been Kissed”) for the popular kid to be forced into intimate contact with a loser — but here our alliances have shifted. While it’s clear that Maya has been unfairly ranked in the middle school sexual hierarchy — her “Ace Ventura” impression is criminally underrated — we also recognize that on some level, she is not ready to kiss a boy. And the boy, for his part, seems neither overly judgmental nor indiscriminately sex-obsessed. Through him we see that girls can be revolting, too.', 'The central conceit of “Big Mouth” — pubescent kids are visited by animated hormone monsters — helps to situate its boys and girls as equals.', 'Often tween boys and girls are isolated into separate spheres, portrayed as alien to each other and to adults. But these properties reveal much of adolescent culture that can be shared. When Kayla in “Eighth Grade” finally connects with a boy, it is over their mutual love of the Adult Swim animated comedy “Rick and Morty.” “PEN15” gets its name from the PEN15 Club — a made-up institution that exists to trick other kids to write “penis” on their hands — and the show reveals that such juvenile antics are not exclusive to one gender.', 'In “PEN15,” the 30-something creators, Konkle (left) and Maya Erskine, play seventh-grade best friends with an absurd and haunting realism.', 'Though these are all comedies, they take their horny girls quite seriously. In “PEN15,” the adults who play Maya and Anna are supported by a cast of real middle schoolers. This could easily be played as a sight gag, but instead the choice resonates deeply. It works to punctuate the moment when girls’ growth spurts send them towering over boys, and it dramatizes Maya and Anna’s outsider status at an age when kids seem capable of sniffing out difference on a cellular level.', 'The hyper-realistic style of “Eighth Grade” delivers its own emotional gut punch. The 14-year-old Kayla is played by Elsie Fisher, who was herself 14 when she shot the film. Though Kayla makes YouTube videos for an audience in the single digits, and Fisher is a professional performer, knowing that character and actor are both stuck in the same life stage only magnifies the film’s anxious, claustrophobic feel. Jessi of “Big Mouth” is, of course, a cartoon, which allows the character to careen dramatically between adolescence and maturity. When she gets her period on a field trip to the Statue of Liberty, she is a steel cage of emotional control, but the second she enters her mother’s car after school, she melts into a sub-verbal puddle.', 'New technologies are typically framed as accelerators for the sexual corruption of girls, but here their risks are linked inextricably to great rewards. For the girls of “PEN15,” who together pretend to be a “hot” 26-year-old woman in a chat room, AOL is a portal to disembodied sexual exploration, a way to digitally map out imaginary adult sex lives without actually exposing them to stranger danger. And though it can be painful to watch Kayla lying in her dark bedroom, mainlining her classmates’ Instagram feeds on her phone, it is merely an embodied version of the fantasies that have always thrilled and haunted middle school girls. The “Big Mouth” indifference to technology is its own form of commentary: Social media, it seems to say, just can’t compete with the wild physical and emotional forces of adolescence.', 'Even for a woman who was once a girl like them — I, too, practiced kissing the back of my hand when my mouth was jammed with wires and rubber bands — there can be a frisson of anxiety to actually seeing their private moments revealed onscreen. The default pop cultural perspective remains that of the adult man, and from his vantage point, exposing adolescent female sexuality onscreen can feel predatory or perverted. These comedies have little interest in considering how those men will feel when they are transported into a girl’s bedroom. Girls’ feelings matter, too. And these girls feel so much.', 'An earlier version of a picture caption with this article misstated the surname of one of the actresses. As the article noted, she is Maya Erskine, not Maya Ishii-Peters, which is her character’s name.', 'Why Must I Be a Tween In Lust?', 'Nick Kroll Still Isn’t Over Puberty. Just Ask His Therapist.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Fashion Review: Dressing for Love and War and ‘Wheel of Fortune’
['Prada and Moschino wrestle with reality in unexpected ways; Tod’s goes all-in for leather.', 'It’s a good question at the moment, if a kind of annoyingly existential one, which may be why it’s so hard to handle. At Tod’s, for example, there’s no effort to wrestle with complicated reality; instead there is — leather! As much of it as possible: tailored leather shorts and leather shirts and leather blazers; leather shift dresses and leather puffers; leather trench coats; nappa leather and patent leather. Oh, and some tweed. It’s perfectly accomplished. But not convincing as the answer to everything.', 'More persuasive was Jeremy Scott, and his “don’t we all just need a smile right now? Don’t we all need a little levity in our lives?” explanation backstage before his laugh-in of a Moschino game show.', 'It was funny, no question, but even game show culture has a dark underbelly; problems, after all, can’t really be solved by a spin of the wheel. In recent shows, Mr. Scott has started to grapple with some of the implications of his pop culture one-liners — almost making an art of it — but not this time.', 'This time he seemed distracted by the coming Met Gala, themed around Camp, and its red carpet needs and possibilities. So while there was a lot of sparkle and wit in the clothes (sparkling wit, even), ultimately it was all promise with no real payoff; escape, with little lasting effect.', 'Which doesn’t mean we can’t dream of a happy ending. Mrs. Prada did: One that toggled between Hitchcock heroines and frogwomen, love and war. It’s a perennial story, after all — as human as our lust for a get-rich-quick scheme.', 'The high romance of portrait-necked 1950s party dresses in black wool and silk with swagged skirts caught up at the hip by O-rings, some splashed with bouquets of roses, alternated with crisp white shirt-dresses dangling three-dimensional satin tulips (they were kind of floppy, like they were on their last legs) and army green utilitarian suiting.', "Vanessa Friedman is The Times's fashion director and chief fashion critic. She was previously the fashion editor of the Financial Times.", 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Fashion Review: Bottega Veneta Gets a New Look
['The verdict is in on Daniel Lee’s first runway collection.', 'Wait! Maybe more was going on than boring designer musical chairs.', 'Was Bottega going to reimagine itself as the brand for loyalists of what has become colloquially known as Old Celine? Were they going to have a new place to shop? Was Mr. Lee’s aesthetic also — maybe? — a Philo-phile aesthetic? If so, was that, in fact, a good thing or had its time come and gone (has it been idealized in retrospect)?', 'On Friday morning in Milan, as Mr. Lee unveiled his first runway collection for the brand, everyone got to find out.', 'And the answer is … a qualified yes.', 'Though clearly in the vernacular of Old Celine as well as the house he has just joined, Mr. Lee’s Bottega was tougher, cooler, less interested in tête-à-têtes in an arty corner, and less well-behaved than either past brand. That’s a good thing.', 'It was also, on occasion, overly tricky (especially when it came to quilted skirts that folded into an A-line shape at the sides and linked across the groin with a fancy chain) and sometimes too literal (full-body leather biker jackets and pants). But those are relatively little quibbles. Given the weight of expectations and Mr. Lee’s youth (he’s in his early 30s), it was an impressively confident and coherent debut.', 'A new geometric V was introduced as closures on coats and the flap shape of a pocket, and the aforementioned chain repeated as gold trim on deep round-necked sweaters, and in the form of leather links woven together into a new sort of intrecciato coat.', 'The neck was the erogenous zone, both in reference to Renaissance portraiture and because, Mr. Lee said after the show, “it’s a part of the body most people are comfortable exposing.” Jackets had their collars raised and the lapels wrenched open, the shoulder dropped just off the bone, to create a heart-shaped curve. There were mirrored shirt dresses (shirt dresses are a thing this season) layered atop each other, and two-tone knits twisted up and around and over. There was men’s wear in a similar mode.', 'Even if afterward, with the stress of the reveal finally over, he looked a little played out.', "Vanessa Friedman is The Times's fashion director and chief fashion critic. She was previously the fashion editor of the Financial Times.", 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Buying Abroad, With a Logo
['A growing number of home buyers are choosing to live in corporate-branded communities, with companies from Marriott to Porsche ready to greet them.', 'Ivan and Ann Highley-Gergel, of Philadelphia, bought this Four Seasons branded property on the Caribbean Island of Nevis about a year ago. From their private house, they have access to all the resort’s amenities and facilities.', 'After 16 years of hauling suitcases to the Four Seasons Resort Nevis, Ivan and Ann Highley-Gergel of Philadelphia no longer need to pack for vacations at the Caribbean island resort.', 'About a year ago, the Highley-Gergels paid around $3.5 million for a furnished, four-bedroom villa that comes with a pool and a cottage and is operated by Four Seasons, allowing them to keep the bathing suits, flip-flops and tennis rackets at their otherwise turnkey vacation home.', 'The Highley-Gergels had sworn they would never buy a vacation home because of “the hassle,” but the convenience of buying at a branded development convinced them otherwise. From their private house, they have access to all the resort’s facilities, plus 24-hour security, room service, home maintenance and weekly cleanings.', 'The Highley-Gergels are among a growing number of Americans buying residences in brand-name resort properties, mostly in the Caribbean and Latin America. Elsewhere around the world, international buyers are snapping up easy-to-lock-up-and-leave, high-rise residences under hotel banners like Mandarin Oriental, Marriott, Ritz-Carlton and W, in cities from London to Barcelona to Bangkok.', 'According to a Knight Frank “Global Branded Residences — 2019” report, branded residences are “growing exponentially and can now be found in almost every major city and major holiday destinations,” with more than 400 mostly hotel-branded residences in 60 countries.', 'The Highley-Gergels at their Four Seasons villa. The couple had sworn they would never buy a vacation home because of “the hassle,” but the convenience of buying in a branded development convinced them otherwise.', 'Paul White, president of residential at Four Seasons Hotels and Resorts.', 'More than 80 percent of all projects in its pipeline include a residential component, and eight of the nine new resorts scheduled to open this year will include residences for buyers who want to call Four Seasons their home.', 'In London, for instance, buyers looking to tie the knot with Four Seasons can do so at Twenty Grosvenor Square, A Four Seasons Residence, the hotelier’s new stand-alone project with 37 private residences, a wine cellar, spa, pool, game room and business center, amid private landscaped gardens in the high-end Mayfair neighborhood. About a mile away, the Residences at Mandarin Oriental Mayfair, with 80 luxury apartments, housekeeping and a rooftop bar, are slated to open in 2021.', 'By buying a home with, say, St. Regis or Ritz-Carlton, “you buy into a global brand,” Mr. Bailey said, one able to offer guidance on purchasing real estate in an unfamiliar country with unfamiliar tax laws and regulations. For those buying something that is still under construction, it instills confidence that the developer will deliver a completed product.', "The Highley-Gergels' home came furnished, with a pool and a cottage for guests.", 'Mr. White noted that buying an overseas home under the marquee of a familiar brand also assuages buyers who may be nervous about immersing themselves in a foreign culture.', 'The model has become so popular, in fact, that brands beyond hotels are also attaching their luxury images to residential developments. The Italian jeweler Bulgari now offers residences in London and Dubai. French crystal maker Baccarat operates 60 homes in its Manhattan hotel. Fashion house Fendi is developing 41 Fendi Private Residences in Scottsdale, Ariz. At the Porsche Design Tower in Sunny Isles Beach, Fla., residents can park their cars next to their apartments — even on the 50th floor. And just a few blocks away, 260 luxury residences are nearing completion in the 60-story Armani Casa tower.', 'All that comes at a price.', 'Simon Jacobs, an investor from Manhattan, long considered buying a vacation home in the Caribbean, but he didn’t know where. He was after something with a beachfront, and that was reachable via nonstop flight. “I didn’t want to have to deal with any of the issues,” he said.', 'After checking out possibilities in Anguilla, St. Barts, Barbados, and Turks and Caicos, Mr. Jacobs, 58, his wife Eliana and their two daughters found their dream island home during a Christmas 2015 stay at Sugar Beach, A Viceroy Resort, which is built on an old sugar plantation on St. Lucia and offers privately owned, one- to four-bedroom residences.', 'The 60-story Porsche Design Tower opened in 2017 in Sunny Isles, Fla., with 132 residential units.', 'That May, he paid about $8.25 million for one of the hotel’s five new contemporary beachfront residences, personalizing the 4,200-square-foot house with a double-height living and dining room, a media room and a closet to store snorkeling gear. Since the house was completed a year ago, the Jacobses, who also have a weekend home in Connecticut and summer in Europe, have only been there a few times.', 'But as sales volume rises at branded communities, the average age is falling. Mr. White, of the Four Seasons, said buyers were “younger than expected,” spanning several generations. At resort properties, multigenerational clients are important. “We will see a family buy a residence and bring the grandparents and kids along and use it as a vehicle to build a great legacy and memories,” he said.', 'Four years ago, Mark and Tori Smith bought a beachfront apartment at the Ritz-Carlton Reserve in Dorado Beach, P.R. In 2017, they were fortunate when their new home survived Hurricane Maria largely unscathed.', 'Sagar Desai, the global head of acquisitions and development for Viceroy Resorts, said condo hotels and resort residences started as a way “to help developers financially engineer their deals,” then “morphed into a very unique way to satisfy the needs of guests” who wanted to own homes. Viceroy is currently building residences at new resorts in Panama, Portugal and Mexico.', 'Often, buyers are looking for more than swimming pools and spas. The Four Seasons Palazzo Tornabuoni, popular with Americans and Canadians, houses 37 apartments in a restored 16th-century palace in Florence, Italy, and offers a calendar of lectures and events (wild boar hunting, anyone?) “which you generally wouldn’t find in a residential complex in that location,” Mr. Bailey said. Homeowners also are offered tours to other cities and towns, to help them engage with local culture.', 'Marriott currently has 11 stand-alone residential projects in the works — from a Ritz-Carlton in Singapore to a St. Regis in Dubai and a Marriott in Cairo — as well as eight others in the pipeline.', 'When the Trump Organization launched its Trump International Realty brokerage in 2012, its first project in South America was a luxury residential tower in Punta del Este, a resort area in Uruguay. The building, slated to open in 2020, is not owned by Trump but will bear his brand. About 84 percent of about 160 units have been sold, and the first condos are expected to close by the end of 2019, said Juan Jose Cugliandolo, chief executive of YY, the developer. The Trump Organization currently has 10 properties completed or in development, according to a 2018 report on branded residences by Savills, which lists the organization as the 11th-largest individual residence brand worldwide.', 'As a wider range of brands enters the market, offerings are also being expanded to include people who are not phenomenally wealthy.', 'In 2017, Andrew Ashcroft, a developer, approached Marriott about making Alaia, a 155-unit complex on the barrier reef of Belize’s Ambergris Caye, part of the chain’s Autograph Collection.', 'The Ritz-Carlton Reserve hotel in Dorado Beach, Puerto Rico, was redeveloped in 2012 to include the first Ritz-Carlton Reserve residences.', 'The Smiths’ 3,500-square-foot, three-bedroom apartment includes balconies, ocean views and access to the hotel’s amenities.', 'Slated to open next year, the complex will include studios at $199,000, one-bedrooms at $419,000, two-bedrooms for $649,000, three-bedrooms for $799,000 and eight beachfront villas priced at $1.3 million. Twenty-five percent of inventory is sold, Mr. Ashcroft said, and 85 percent of the buyers are American.', 'Four Seasons also has its eyes on Belize, developing 85 residences as part of a new complex on Caye Chapel, a 280-acre private barrier island, slated to open in 2021.', 'Even as international locales explode in popularity, though, the Savills report notes that the U.S. remains by far the largest market for branded residences, with 32 percent of the globe’s supply. Four years ago, Mark and Tori Smith of Denver purchased a 3,500-square-foot, three-bedroom condo for $3.5 million at the Dorado Beach Ritz-Carlton Reserve, in Dorado, Puerto Rico. When Hurricane Maria hurtled toward the island two years later, the Smiths left before it landed, worried they might lose their investment.', 'They got lucky. The resort suffered extensive damage and the hotel was closed for about a year, but the residents were allowed back when utilities were restored. Last October, Dorado Beach reopened with more than 300,000 new plantings and expanded facilities.', 'Although the Smiths return to Denver every month, they spend a total of five months and a day at the Dorado — the minimum required to call Puerto Rico their permanent residence.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Manipur fake encounters: kin allege bribe for settlement
['Members of the Campaign For Peace and Democracy (Manipur) protesting in New Delhi against ‘State-sponsored atrocities in Manipur’.', 'A court in Thoubal district of Manipur has disposed of a case of alleged extrajudicial killing of a man by a police team in 2011, thanks to the delay in sanction of prosecution from the State government.', 'The family of the victim on Monday alleged that it was fighting the case despite coercions, including a lump sum being offered as “bribe” to withdraw the case.', 'Tampha, the wife of Angousana Athokpam of Bishnupur district who was arrested on February 27, 2011, by a Thoubal district police team and allegedly killed in a fake encounter, told reporters in Imphal that some stranger had come to her home last month and offered her “₹7 lakh for an out-of-court settlement”.', 'Tanoubi, Athokpam’s daughter, said the Chief Judicial Magistrate, Thoubal, had disposed of her father’s case on Saturday saying it cannot proceed further as the Manipur government has not given the prosecution sanction. “Such prosecution sanctions had already been given in the Imphal East and Imphal West districts,” said Ms. Tanoubi.', 'She said her father’s “killing” was one of the 39 cases registered on the specific orders of the Supreme Court. The accused in nine such cases have already been chargesheeted.', 'The SC is looking into 1,528 alleged fake encounter cases in Manipur filed by Extrajudicial Execution Victims Families Association Manipur, a group seeking speedy trial in these cases.', 'There has been no explanation from the BJP-led State government as to why no prosecution sanction was issued in Athokpam’s case.', 'The EEVFAM activists are not happy with the court order in the case.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


MDM scheme food found to be unsafe in 2 Odisha districts
['The State food analyst has found food served as part of the Mid Day Meal programme “unsafe and substandard” in Kendrapara and Kandhamal districts.', 'Based on the finding, the Odisha State Food Commission has directed the Secretary of Department of School and Mass Education and Collectors of the two districts to take action.', 'According to the report, samples of loose dals sent from Kandhamal loose boiled rice collected from Kendrapara were deemed unsafe. Salt samples in Kendrapara were also substandard.', 'The State food testing laboratory has found synthetic colour in samples of split arhar dal, which is unsafe under Section 3(1)(zz) of the Food Safety and Standards Act, 2006.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Bail for alleged Maoist sympathiser in Yerwada jail since 2015
['The Bombay High Court on Monday granted bail to Konnath Muralidharan, 66, an alleged sympathiser of Communist Party of India (Maoist), who has been in Yerwada jail since May 2015 after the Maharashtra Anti-Terrorism Squad (ATS) arrested him for possessing ‘objectionable material’. His bail has been previously rejected by the Pune court in September 2016.', 'On May 8, 2015, Mr. Muralidharan was arrested at 6 a.m. after the ATS got information that he, along with an aide Chirag Palli, were operating from their hideout at Talegaon in Pune. ATS recovered hand written notes along with printed literature that talked about Operation Green Hunt, central military commission and other material related to CPI (Maoists).', 'According to the FIR, Mr. Muralidharan introduced himself as Thomas Joseph and was holding names such as Sunny alias Rajendra Goppi Vijayan alias Raghavan alias Ajith Kannampillai alias Kannakaran. His aide Mr. Palli introduced himself as James Mathew.', 'Statements of some witnesses were recorded and the ATS had seized laptops, CPUs, printers, three pen drives, 10 mobile handsets, five sim cards, two dongles and books in Malayalam from them.', 'The ATS also recovered a fake PAN card in the name of Thomas Joseph with Mr. Muralidharan’s photo, while Mr. Palli had a fake Aadhaar card in his name.', 'Mr. Muralidharan was charged with Section 419 (punishment for cheating by personation), Section 467 (forgery of valuable security, will, etc), Section 468 (forgery for purpose of cheating), Section 471(using as genuine a forged document or electronic record) of the Indian Penal Code and Section 10 (penalty for being member of an unlawful association, etc), Section 13 (punishment for unlawful activities), Section 20 (punishment for being member of terrorist gang or organisation), Section 38 (offence relating to membership of a terrorist organisation), and Section 39 (offence relating to support given to a terrorist organisation) of the Unlawful Activities Prevention Act (UAPA).', 'The ATS filed a chargesheet on October 14, 2015, before a sessions court in Pune. On September 9, 2016, Mr. Muralidharan who suffered heart ailments prior to his arrest, and suffered a mild heart attack while he was lodged in prison, moved a bail application which was rejected by the Pune court.', 'The present bail application, filed in HC through his advocates Sudeep Pasbola and Susan Abraham, states that he has been falsely implicated, and that there is no evidence to prosecute him under UAPA.', 'Justice Nitin Sambre granted bail to Mr. Murlidharan on ₹1 lakh surety and ordered him to report to Pune police station twice a month.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Invite to Brahma Kumaris draws criticism
['The government’s decision to invite a member of the Prajapita Brahmakumari to conduct a talk inside the legislative building has come under criticism.', 'Brahma Kumari Shivani, member of the Brahmakumaris World Spiritual University, is scheduled to deliver a ‘motivational speech’ at the Central Hall on Tuesday. The Bramha Kumaris claim to be a worldwide spiritual movement dedicated to personal transformation.', 'Finance Minister Sudhir Mungantiwar said it is a “motivational speech” and should be seen in a positive manner.', 'However, Nationalist Congress Party leader and former deputy chief minister Chhagan Bhujbal questioned it’s purpose. “If it is a religious function, then you will have to allow other religions to hold similar functions,” he said.', 'Calling the legislature building a ‘temple of democracy,’ All India Majlis-e-Ittehadul Muslimeen MLA Imtiaz Jaleel said it should not be used for religious speeches.', 'While announcing his decision to not attend the program, Samajwadi Party MLA Abu Azmi said the move is “unconstitutional and unacceptable”.', 'In 2016, two Jain monks addressed lawmakers inside the Assembly building in Harayana and Madhya Pradesh. The latter was then ruled by the BJP.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Vows: Two Art Collectors Who Caught Each Other’s Eye
['Within six months of meeting, Yelena Ambartsumian and Miroslav Grajewski began buying paintings together. They fell in love with more than the art.', 'Yelena Ambartsumian and Miroslav Grajewski began buying artwork together within six months of meeting. It led to a romance fueled by robust curiosity and the desire to build a legacy.', 'Marriage, they say, is a negotiation, a protracted conversation built on trust, shared goals and infinite reserves of tact.', 'It’s a concept not lost on Yelena Ambartsumian and Miroslav Grajewski, who, well before they traded vows Jan. 19 at St. Illuminator’s Armenian Apostolic Cathedral in Manhattan, had already mastered the art of the deal.', 'Two years ago, Ms. Ambartsumian, 30, an associate in the law firm Milbank, and Mr. Grajewski, 28, an engineer and executive with Zuvic Carr and Associates, embarked on a courtship sparked by a mutual passion for contemporary art. That shared appetite led them to invest piece by piece in a jointly held collection.', 'The bride preparing for the ceremony Jan. 19 at St. Illuminator’s Armenian Apostolic Cathedral in Manhattan.', 'Their path in the art world was halting at first. “We definitely had a fair number of moments where we thought we were nuts,” Mr. Grajewski said just days before the wedding, going on to describe a romance fueled by robust curiosity and the desire to build a legacy. Were they driven to compete with other, perhaps more seasoned young trophy hunters?', 'To some, such sums may seem staggering. Indeed Ms. Ambartsumian’s parents — her mother a psychiatrist, her father, an electrical engineer — may well have been taken aback.', 'The Rev. Mesrob Lakissian placed gilded coronets on the heads of the bride and groom, an Armenian tradition anointing the couple as the rulers of their domestic kingdom.', 'During their treks, they would compare notes, often astonished to find that on just about every occasion they were drawn to the same several pieces, their interests encompassing canvases both abstract and figurative, vividly colorful and monochromatic, and, in addition, pieces of sculpture and photography.', 'Once the couple set their sights on a piece, they would return to it multiple times, at varying hours, and in shifting moods. When they settled on a purchase, Mr. Grajewski, the more extroverted of the pair, would begin negotiations. The couple, who drew from their savings, had agreed in advance to split the cost.', 'Some of their pieces were housed early on in Ms. Ambartsumian’s former apartment near Wall Street. They would later find their way to Milford, Conn., where the couple now resides.', 'Before Ms. Ambartsumian moved to her new home in Connecticut, her mother, Dr. Barbara Sumbatian, paid a visit.', 'A chance to write a note during the reception, which was at 11 Madison Park in New York.', 'The groom’s mother, Marici Zuvic Grajewski, had raised an eyebrow as well. But his unorthodox choice in art did nothing to dent her faith in the match. What could go wrong, after all?', 'A short time later Ms. Ambartsumian caused necks to crane as she glided toward the altar in an ivory flower-embroidered Elizabeth Fillmore dress, its back plunging toward her waist. Its otherwise regal look was enhanced when the officiant, the Rev. Mesrob Lakissian, intoned the familiar verses from Corinthians, “Love bears all things, hopes all things…,” and placed a crown on her head.', 'Her gesture was in keeping with the convention-bending spirit of the pair. “These are two people who are ahead of their times, behind the times, and in the moment all at once,” Ms. Matevosyan told guests at the reception.', 'But on this occasion, it seemed, the couple was resolutely looking forward. “Collecting was part of a journey that Yelena and I went on,” Mr. Grajewski said.', 'Pushing aside the church call for modesty, the bride shed her cape before she sailed down the aisle, revealing a gown that plunged in the back.', 'Toward the end of the ceremony, the Rev. Mesrob Lakissian placed gilded coronets on the heads of the bride and groom, an Armenian tradition anointing the couple as the rulers of their domestic kingdom.', 'Continue following our fashion and lifestyle coverage on Facebook (Styles and Modern Love), Twitter (Styles, Fashion, and Vows) and Instagram.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Sunday Routine: How Susanne Bartsch, Night Life Queen, Spends Her Sundays
['From her home base at the Chelsea Hotel, the high-fashion Swiss diva hits the flea markets and the gym before experimenting with new looks in the afternoons.', 'Born in Switzerland, she moved to London at 17 and promptly fell in love with a British boy who was headed to New York. “My heart runs my life. I followed him here in 1981 on Valentine’s Day,” she said.', 'The pair broke up soon after, but he left her his apartment at the Chelsea Hotel. Rather than move, Ms. Bartsch expanded. One apartment became two, then four.', 'Sunday is my one day to sleep in, so I get up late, around 11:30 a.m. I’m a night owl. I was born close to midnight, maybe that has something to do with it. My bedroom is really dark, so I put on sunglasses and start my day. I’m the sunglass queen.', 'I make instant organic coffee, it’s called Mountain something. I add lots of milk because I don’t like coffee. I like the idea of it. I’m Swiss so we don’t do big breakfasts I’ll have bread and jam, maybe boiled eggs. I never feel hungry. It’s already late so I’d rather get out.', 'Sometimes I see my son. He has his own self-contained apartment. If I want to see him I have to look for him.', 'I’m out the door by 2. I don’t shower, I just put on jeans or a casual dress and bootees and go to a flea market. I like the one in Dumbo or the Brooklyn Flea, and the one on east 39th Street in Manhattan. I also like pop-ups where underground designers sell their stuff.', 'I go to Whole Foods and pick up ingredients to make homemade chili. While I’m there I buy soup. I like their clam chowder and their potato leek. Sometimes I go to Foragers to get a mozzarella and tomato sandwich or their Brie and turkey. Their food is really fresh and homemade.', 'Back home I start to cook. I cut the onions, garlic, and tomatoes for the chili. I make it for my son and I. We’ll eat it during the week.', 'I meet David for 30 minutes. We’re still married, but we don’t live together. He lives a block away. We catch up and talk about our son.', 'Around 8 I’ll meet a friend for a drink, somewhere in the neighborhood. I like Blue Ribbon, the Standard Grill, and Souen. Sometimes I go the McKittrick to interview new talent. There’s a ring-tossing guy we might use.', 'By 11:30 I’m back home. I don’t like to have late nights on Sunday. Then I putter around for a few hours. It’s the quietest time of the day for me, so I’m able to get on the computer and return emails or answer an interviewer’s questions. Then I post on Instagram. I know you’re supposed to do it at a certain time during the day, but I can never remember when that is. Then I take a bath with Epsom salt. Before I know it, it’s 2 a.m. I try not to stress that it’s so late, because I have to get up at 9.', 'Sunday Routine readers can follow Susanne Bartsch on Instagram @bartschland or on Twitter @bartscharama.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Modern Love: How Bibliophiles Flirt
['They loved each other, but she harbored a shameful secret: She had stopped reading books.', 'I was an English major in college and went on to get a master’s in literature. But shortly after the spiral-bound thesis took its place on my shelf next to the degree, I stopped reading. It happened gradually, the way one heals or dies.', 'When I created my OkCupid profile (screen name: missbibliophile52598), I filled out the “favorite books” section, letting my taste in literature speak for me: “100 Years of Solitude,” “A Moveable Feast,” “White Teeth,” “The Namesake,” “The Known World,” “The God of Small Things,” “How to Read the Air.” But a twinge of panic surged through me when I realized it had been more than two years since I had read most of those titles, and more than five years for some.', 'Despite my track record, I tried to maintain my bookish persona. I joined book clubs on Meetup.com that I never attended. I requested the library copy of Kazuo Ishiguro’s “Never Let Me Go” because everyone else was reading it, only to return it a week late, unread, with fines.', 'I still loved the idea of reading. I treasured books and bookstores. Whenever I found one, I would linger between the shelves for hours as if catching up with old friends, picking out volumes I had read and buying new ones I hadn’t.', 'When my father’s girlfriend gave me a book by Joel Osteen for Christmas, I returned it for Toni Morrison’s “A Mercy.” I also bought a collection of short stories by Dostoyevsky. But I didn’t read either of them.', 'David was my first OkCupid date — my first online date of any kind. He was tall and nice, if awkward. I asked him question after question to keep him at ease and the conversation flowing, but also to deflect his attention (a classic introvert trick).', 'His profile said he liked to read, so I asked him about his last book. His face lit up and his fingers danced. I realized within the first several weeks that David read much more than I did, about a book or two a week. We seemed an unlikely couple: me, a 5-foot-3 black woman born to a Caribbean mother, and him, a 6-foot-4 white guy from Ohio. But as we got to know each other, our shared faith and mutual love of books bridged our gaps.', 'The first time David visited my house, we compared libraries. We only had four titles in common, two of which were C.S. Lewis collections. David preferred history and nonfiction, whereas I gravitated toward fiction writers of color and immigrant narratives.', 'Months later, when we began to discuss the possibility of getting married one day, I didn’t broach the subject of combining our libraries — not because I feared having to untangle them someday but because I liked having my own stories to share.', 'On our seventh date, David and I visited the central library downtown.', 'David paused from listing the titles he planned to read over summer and raised his eyebrows.', 'I was painfully aware of the glaring hypocrisy in my life. I defended the virtues of bookstores in the age of online retailing and bought books whenever I got the chance, but I hardly read them. They sat on every surface until my house appeared to wear books the way one wears clothes. They piled up on chairs and draped across sofa arms.', 'The Japanese language has a word for this: tsundoku. The act of acquiring books that go unread.', 'The shelves of my bookcase sag in the middle, and not just because it’s made of cheap plywood. It’s because each shelf holds two rows of books, an inner and an outer.', 'If I want to find a book from college or before, I know to reach back to the inner row. If I want to find a more recent addition, I look along the edge. Surrounding the bookshelf are stacks containing different categories of books.', 'There are: Books I Have Read. Books I Want to Read. Books I Started but Did Not Finish Because I Did Not Like Them. Books I Started and Loved but Could Not Justify Reading Given Their Graphic Sexual or Violent Content. That category contains two books by Philip Roth.', 'The last time I visited a dollar bookstore, I bought five titles for myself and two for David. His charge to “read a book” echoed in my head. One afternoon I picked up one of the dollar hardbacks I bought solely for its poetic title.', 'I pushed through the first two chapters and discovered a new narrator in the third. I loved the alternating points of view. I carried the book to work and read at lunch. I read on my walk home, occasionally lifting my eyes to make sure I avoided strangers and uneven concrete.', 'I felt smug that while most of my millennial peers also walked with their heads down, eyes hovering just above their palms, I was not merely scrolling through Instagram. I was reading. Reading a book.', 'It was not a competition, but there was a push. I felt him pushing me to be more of the person I used to be and more of who I wanted to be. Whenever he turned to discussing his current nonfiction book about the rise of Silicon Valley or environmental philosophers, I would tell him of fiction, of men who left their countries by hiding in boxes only to climb out and turn into birds. I would remind him that sometimes the only way to explain the world we live in is to make it all up.', 'I asked David once what he liked about me.', 'A little over a year after our date at the library, David suggested we visit again. As we walked along the shelves, he asked if I remembered the game we played on our first visit, when we put Post-it note reviews in our favorite books.', 'His proposal had rested between the pages of “The Rebel Princess” for over a year.', 'We embraced in the middle of the fiction aisle, surrounded by other people’s stories and about to begin our own.', 'Karla Marie-Rose Derus is a writer in Los Angeles.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Trilobites: Why Do Zebras Have Stripes? Scientists Camouflaged Horses to Find Out
['If you spend time around horses or flies, you might want to invest in some zebra print.', 'Those stripes might be some of nature’s most effective insect repellent.', 'What’s black, white and striped all over — except for its head?', 'Horses wearing zebra coats on a farm in Britain.', 'The animals weren’t attending a masquerade. They were dressed for studies investigating a mystery that has puzzled scientists for more than a century.', 'Wallace were theorizing about evolution, scientists have debated the function of this sassy animal print. It’s been called camouflage to confuse big predators, an identity signal to other zebras and a kind of wearable air conditioner. Now most scientists agree that the function of a zebra’s stripes is to ward off biting flies that can carry deadly diseases.', 'But what exactly is it about a zebra’s wardrobe that flies don’t like?', 'Like the Science Times page on Facebook.', 'Science Times newsletter.', 'A horse dressed as a zebra to investigate fly behavior in England.', 'The flies pestered all of the horses and the zebras in the paddocks equally. But once they got close, the zebra stripes seemed to dazzle the flies so much that they couldn’t manage a controlled landing. Flies zoomed in too fast and either veered off just in time — or simply bumped into the zebra and bounced off. The flies didn’t seem to like the zebra coats on horses, either, but their bare heads were fair game.', 'The only thing they can say for certain is that the high contrast between black and white most likely tricks the fly’s low-resolution vision, which relies on sensing movement.', 'In an optical illusion called the barber pole, diagonal stripes appear to move up or down, depending on which way the pole is rotating. Something similar could be happening as flies approach zebra stripes. From afar, the fly may interpret the object as gray, but as it moves closer, the zebra’s diagonal stripes may appear to be moving in false directions. As a result, a fly may think it’s headed toward open space instead of landing. Or perhaps the sudden appearance of stripes may overload the fly’s vision and startle it into a buzzing stupor.', 'The researchers are now conducting tests with coats of different patterns, contrasts and thickness, to see just what it is about the stripes that stops the flies. “By playing around with those variables, we’ll be able to get inside the head of the fly, or the eye of the fly, to work out what’s sort of confusing to it,” said Dr. Caro.', 'In the meantime, people planning on being around horses or horse flies may want to consider wearing zebra print rather than a solid to avoid being bitten. You should probably make your horse a twinsie, too.', 'What’s Black and White and Travels 310 Miles?', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


White House Climate Panel to Include a Climate Denialist
['Water from recent heavy rainstorms breached a levee in Novato, Calif., on Feb. 14.', 'Want climate news in your inbox?', 'WASHINGTON — President Trump is preparing to establish a panel to examine whether climate change affects national security, despite existing reports from his own government showing that global warming is a growing threat.', 'Happer, whose views are sharply at odds with the established scientific consensus that carbon dioxide pollution is dangerous for the planet.', 'William Happer, a physicist serving as President Trump’s deputy assistant for emerging technologies, has said carbon dioxide is beneficial to humanity.', 'Scientists defended the research already conducted by the government. “The link between climate science and national security has been closely studied for over a decade at the highest levels of the U.S. government — by scientists, the Defense Department and intelligence agencies — and all those studies have made a strong case that various aspects of climate change have an effect on national security,” said Michael Oppenheimer, a professor of geosciences and international affairs at Princeton.', 'Critics focused on the appointment of Dr. Happer to the panel given his public history of denying established climate science.', 'Dr. Happer suggested to the purported funders that he not be paid directly. “My activities to push back against climate extremism are a labor of love,” he wrote.', 'How to Cut U.S. Emissions Faster? Do What These Countries Are Doing.', 'How the United States could cut emissions in half, using policies that other countries already have in place.', 'The peer-reviewed reports, researched over several years, were published by more than 13 federal agencies alongside dozens of academic researchers. Dr. Oppenheimer scoffed at the White House’s contention that the reports had not gone undergone rigorous peer review.', 'In addition to those reports, the Pentagon has commissioned and funded scientific research on the impact of climate change and sea-level rise, in order to plan for the effects on low-lying military installations.', 'For example, the report suggested that a string of South Pacific islands that is home to the Ronald Reagan Ballistic Missile Defense Test Site, which operates space weapons programs and tracks NASA research, could be uninhabitable by as soon as 2035 because of rising sea levels.', 'That Pentagon-funded research came after more than a decade of major military and scientific studies, dating back to the George W. Bush administration, that linked climate change to national security threats.', 'Nicholas Fandos contributed reporting.', 'Coral Davenport covers energy and environmental policy, with a focus on climate change, from the Washington bureau. She joined The Times in 2013 and previously worked at Congressional Quarterly, Politico and National Journal.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Measles Outbreak: Your Questions Answered
['One in 10 children with measles gets an ear infection, which can lead to permanent deafness.', 'What is measles?', 'Measles is an extremely contagious virus. It can cause serious respiratory symptoms, fever and rash. In some cases, especially in babies and young children, the consequences can be severe. Measles killed 110,000 people globally in 2017, mostly children under 5.', 'Like the Science Times page on Facebook.', 'Science Times newsletter.', 'How is measles transmitted?', 'Measles is transmitted by droplets from an infected person’s nose or mouth. If you’re in a room with someone infected with measles, you can inhale their virus when they cough, sneeze or even talk. Infected people can transmit the measles virus starting four days before they develop a rash, so they may be contagious before they realize they have the disease. They remain able to spread the virus for about four days after the rash appears.', 'What are the symptoms of measles?', 'But after two or three days of that, fever spikes to 104 or 105 degrees and the telltale red dots appear on the skin, first on the face, then spreading down the body.', 'Abel Zhang, 1, being helped back into his clothes by his mother, Wenyi Zhang, center, his grandmother, Ding Hong, left, and Dr. Lauren Lawler, after receiving inoculations for measles, mumps and rubella at a clinic in Seattle.', 'Is there a cure for measles?', 'No. The vast majority of people who contract measles haven’t been vaccinated, and giving them the measles vaccine within 72 hours of being exposed to the virus might help — at least by reducing the severity and duration of the symptoms. The Mayo Clinic says that pregnant women, babies and people with weak immune systems can receive an injection of antibodies called immune serum globulin within six days of being exposed to measles, which might prevent or lessen the symptoms.', 'How safe and effective is the measles vaccine?', 'Children should receive two doses of the vaccine: the first when they are 12 to 15 months old; the second when they are between 4 and 6 years old. If infants who are between 6 and 11 months old are about to travel from the United States to another country, the C.D.C. recommends they receive one dose of the vaccine beforehand.', 'People who don’t get the vaccine are at very high risk for contracting measles. “Almost everyone who has not had the MMR shot will get measles if they are exposed to the measles virus,” the C.D.C. says.', 'If I’m not vaccinated, is it too late to get the shot?', 'If most people are getting vaccinated, why does it matter if I don’t vaccinate my child?', 'You are probably thinking of the concept of herd immunity, which means that if a large number of people are protected from a disease by a vaccine, the disease will be less likely to circulate, diminishing the risk for people who are unvaccinated. The threshold for herd immunity varies by disease — for a highly contagious disease, a very high percentage of people need to be vaccinated to meet that threshold.', 'In a hypothetical community where nobody has immunity from the measles virus, one infected person might infect 12 to 18 people, who might each infect another 12 to 18 people. At this rate, a small outbreak would quickly grow out of control.', 'In a hypothetical community where nobody has immunity from the measles virus, one infected person might infect 12 to 18 people, who might each infect another 12 to 18 people. At this rate, a small outbreak would quickly grow out of control.', 'In a hypothetical community where nobody has immunity from the measles virus, one infected person might infect 12 to 18 people, who might each infect another 12 to 18 people. At this rate, a small outbreak would quickly grow out of control.', 'In a hypothetical community where nobody has immunity from the measles virus, one infected person might infect 12 to 18 people, who might each infect another 12 to 18 people. At this rate, a small outbreak would quickly grow out of control.', 'Wait, didn’t we eliminate measles?', 'In 2000, measles was declared eliminated from the United States because the country had gone for more than 12 months without any “continuous disease transmission” within its borders. “Eliminated” doesn’t mean the disease was completely eradicated; it means the United States no longer had any places where the disease was endemic or homegrown.', 'Most of the American cases since 2000 have been the result of people traveling to or from countries where measles is endemic because there is little vaccination.', 'How many people haven’t been vaccinated?', 'Who are the people not getting vaccinated?', 'Generally, those who do not immunize their children are demographically more white and more educated, Dr. De St. Maurice said. “In part due to the success of vaccines, people are not as familiar with these diseases, so they question their effectiveness,” she said. Conversely, when the disease reappears, as it did in Washington, demand for vaccines rises.', 'Don’t states have laws requiring parents to vaccinate their children?', 'Signs warning patients at a clinic in Vancouver, Wash.', 'Are the states with lax laws the ones with the most measles cases?', 'There have not been enough cases to warrant a major survey, but Dr. Saad Omer of the Emory Vaccine Center in Atlanta warned that with a rising number of cases, that could change.', 'Dr. Omer, who studies immunization coverage and disease incidence, said research had shown that states that allow more exemptions have increased pertussis (whooping cough) outbreaks.', 'Studies have also shown that people who refuse vaccines are disproportionately represented in the early stage of outbreaks. “They’re providing the tinder that can start the fires of the epidemics,” Dr. Omer said.', 'How does the U.S. compare with other countries?', 'Canada, Britain and Switzerland are a few of the Western countries that are below 90 percent.', 'Worldwide cases of measles have increased 30 percent since 2016, the World Health Organization said last year.', 'Does this mean mumps and rubella cases are re-emerging, too?', 'C.D.C., and cases have increased in recent years, from 229 in 2012 to 6,366 in 2016.', 'Rubella used to cause millions of infections in the United States.', 'According to the C.D.C.', 'Rubella was declared eliminated in the United States in 2004, and the C.D.C. says that fewer than 10 cases are reported each year. But, as with measles and mumps, there are still many countries where it persists because of lack of vaccination, and every case since 2012 has been traced to people infected while traveling or living in another country.', 'Pam Belluck is a health and science writer. She was one of seven Times staffers awarded the 2015 Pulitzer Prize for International Reporting for coverage of the Ebola epidemic. She is the author of “Island Practice,” about a colorful and contrarian doctor on Nantucket.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


How to Choose the Right Perfume or Cologne for You
['Choosing a perfume is tough, but the experts are here to help you find a fragrance that you’ll love for years.', 'Whether you’re a fragrance fanatic or you’re new to scents, finding a fragrance you love can be a daunting experience. When you approach a fragrance counter, the only information you can garner about any of the scents in front of you is how the bottle looks, which, of course, tells you nothing. You’re often left to sniff a few selections from hundreds of available bottles with the help of an overbearing salesperson, who is usually no help at all.', 'A scent you love can truly become a part of you, an extension of yourself. But how do you find one?', 'Whether you have a few minutes to research before you hit the stores, or you’re trying to pick the perfect scent on the fly, here are a couple of easy tips from fragrance experts to help you land a scent that you’ll love for years and feels (and smells) like you dreamed it into existence.', 'Sometimes, the best place to start is, for lack of a better term, right under your nose. Think about your daily life. What scents do you already love?', 'The most crucial part of finding your new favorite fragrance is, of course, trying it on. Spray it on a pulse point where your skin is naturally warm, like your wrist or elbow, so the fragrance will really heat up and reveal itself over time.', 'As to why scents sometimes smell completely different on two different people, Ms. Yang said that fragrances are sensitive to light and heat, and even your own personal body chemistry, diet and hormonal levels. Even time of day plays into how a perfume “wears,” or how it smells on you, how powerful it is and how long it lasts.', 'If multiple trips to the mall to sample new fragrances sounds exhausting, keep in mind that department stores have small sample vials behind the counters ready for you to bring home — all you have to do is ask. If you prefer a cosmetics store like Sephora, their staff is able to make a sample vial of fragrances on their shelves so you can wear them over a few days to know how they function in different environments, giving you time to live with the scent.', 'Ms. Yang also pointed out that natural vs. synthetic elements in your scent affect not only the length of the wear, but the smell of the scent itself and how it interacts with your body. “Natural is not always more sustainable … or better for you. I’m a trained aromatherapist and I love natural fragrances as much as synthetic/natural combos. That said, four tons of roses, composed of approximately 1,600,000 rose blossoms, yields only 1 kilogram of rose oil. Real, all-natural perfumes are very expensive. No two rose yields will smell exactly the same (like wine) due to climate conditions.', 'Finding a scent you love can be challenging, but if you know what you’re looking for, and how to look for it, the experience can be enjoyable, especially when you’re armed with the knowledge of scents to change your daily life. A few online resources to learn which notes you prefer, how to apply and test, and determining your next scent is easier than you think.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Social Q’s: Honey, That’s Not Why Your Dad Left
['What to do when you learn that the story your husband has told himself for years is untrue? Tell him, our advice columnist says.', 'My husband, who is in his 30s, always told me that his mother threw his father out of the house — on my husband’s 12th birthday, no less — because she found marijuana in his bag. (They agreed to give it up after having kids.) But her current husband, a wonderful man who overshares, told me the breakup was actually due to the first husband’s repeated infidelity. My mother-in-law confirmed this when I asked her. She also said she believes my husband knows. Should I tell him? His father died of cancer several years ago. I hate to speak ill of the dead, but should I, in this case?', 'Of course, your obligation is to your husband, who deserves gentle truth and support. If you hadn’t verified the story your stepfather-in-law told you, you might have written it off as idle gossip and let it go. But you did verify it. So now you must tell your husband. Withholding this information would put you in weird league with your in-laws. They’ve done nothing wrong, but for you to keep the secret would make you disloyal to your husband.', 'Say, “Honey, can we talk about your dad?” and take it calmly from there. He may be upset by the news or regard it as the missing piece of a family puzzle. It’s too bad he can’t discuss it with his father. And I get your reluctance to share unsavory stories of the dead. But fortunately, your husband has you to lean on if he needs help.', 'Guess Who’s Not Coming to Dinner?', 'We love to make dinner for friends. People say our apartment is minimalist, spacious and nicely lit. But the last three times we invited one couple to dinner, they suggested we come to their place instead. Who does that? Not only were we deprived of the activity we proposed, we’ll be the ones who have to travel to another part of town on a cold night. Would it be O.K. to insist: “No, we’d like to have you over”?', 'A.O.', 'Here’s the thing: Some people have trouble accepting hospitality. Others have numerous food allergies. And still others don’t like going out at night. Why not be gracious and let this go? Three invitations later, it doesn’t sound as if this couple is coming to dinner anytime soon.', 'My husband and I live with our young children on a small cul-de-sac. It’s a neighborhood of mostly older people. We’re one of the few young families. Many neighbors drive fast, but one older woman drives at dangerous speeds. She whips around the corner so fast that she startles my toddler! My husband thinks I should talk with her directly. But I would prefer slipping a polite note under her door. Thoughts?', 'In any event, it’s easier to accommodate a neighbor, smiling at your doorstep with a reasonable request, than to go along with written appeals, slid under the door like (super-polite) complaints. When possible, attach a face to requests for favors. And since it was your husband’s brilliant idea, why not let him cross the street and ask the woman to slow down?', 'I went to the symphony and sat next to a woman wearing perfume. I have asthma, so I was uncomfortable, but I didn’t say anything until intermission. I asked her nicely if she was wearing perfume. When she said she was, I told it her it probably wasn’t a good idea in a crowded concert hall and left it at that. Then I left. What would you have done?', 'No offense, but I don’t think your educational campaign accomplished much. You didn’t explain why it’s not a good idea to wear scent in tight spaces. The perfume wearer will be no wiser the next time out.', 'I might have said, “You may not have considered this, but I have asthma, and your perfume is making me uncomfortable.” Then I would have approached an usher or the box office, explained my predicament, and asked for a less fragrant seat. Why miss the second half?', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Wait —: Wait — What Is a Hole?
['Wait — What Is a Hole?', 'Wait — What Is a Hole?', 'Allow me to ruin your life real quick.', 'A few days into the new year, someone asked me, as a kind of puzzle: “What is a hole?” Right now, your brain is protecting you; human brains are poor multitaskers and since yours is occupied with reading, you haven’t yet had time to sit back and consider the question that has blown across the fecund wasteland of my thoughts nearly every day of 2019. The problem is that your brain cannot protect you forever. If you want to get off this ride, you need to do it now.', 'What is a hole?', 'And yet, there are other characteristics of holes that escape our special attention. We have no common word for a hole that is bigger than a pinprick but smaller than a pothole. German identifies a metaphorical hole in the month of January when the bustle, spirits and commerce of the holiday season suddenly abate (“Januarloch”). In some dialects of Spanish, a “butrón” is a hole made in a building to carry out a break-in.', 'Great question.', 'Speaking of holes...', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Trump Says Space Force Creation a ‘National Security Priority’
['U.S.']


Made on the Inside, Worn on the Outside
['Brands are using prison labor to provide inmates with jobs and training. But is it possible — and ethical — to build a profitable fashion business behind bars?', 'Peruvian inmates at work.', 'In a lush valley surrounded by the Peruvian Andes — past two sets of security gates, high fences, barbed wire and a rigorous pat-down — 13 women stood hard at work. They were weaving and knitting luxurious alpaca wool sweaters, deep-pile roll-necks and silky-soft track pants, destined to be sold to wealthy shoppers with lives far away, and a far cry, from their own.', 'More than two years into their program, both Carcel’s founders and the Peruvian prison authorities say the project has been a measurable success. It’s popular with prisoners and consumers alike and proof that the profitable and responsible production of luxury fashion can have a place behind bars.', 'Peru is becoming something of a case study on the issue of aid versus exploitation. A little more than 5,000 women are currently incarcerated there, and over 50 percent are actively employed in producing leather goods, clothing and textiles, according to INPE, the national penitentiary institute.', 'Carcel, a Danish brand, was founded in 2016 to provide incarcerated women with jobs, training and, possibly, a crime-free future.', 'Pietà was founded in Lima in 2012 by Thomas Jacob, a Frenchman who had once worked for Chanel, and currently employs around 50 male and female inmates from some of the largest jails in Peru. Prisoners manufacture anti-establishment logo T-shirts, sweatshirts, hand-knit sweaters, varsity jackets and high-top sneakers using locally sourced materials. Prices range from $8 for tote bags to $120 for jewelry.', 'Inmates don’t just make the clothes, he said — on occasion they also contribute to his designs, giving them both a creative outlet and training. Often, they act as models for advertising campaigns and are paid a portion of the sale price for each unit of clothing they produce, providing income they can send home to their families. Upon release, former inmates can continue working with Pietà, or seek jobs at other companies with Pietà’s recommendation and support.', 'Louise van Hauen and Veronica D’Souza, the founders of Carcel (which means “prison” in Spanish), met while living and working in Kenya. The former was a creative manager at a leather bag company and the latter was the head of a social start-up that made and distributed menstrual cups.', 'Veronica D’Souza, left, and Louise van Hauen are the founders of the Carcel label.', 'Ms. van Hauen said she wanted to start somewhere with proximity to high-quality natural materials, where some of the skills required were already part of local culture.', 'Virginia Matamoros, the director of Cusco Female Penitentiary, said that the prison offered basic training in sewing, weaving, baking and gardening to all new inmates with the hope that they can then move on to working with companies that can prepare them for release.', 'In Cusco, the Carcel inmates are trained by more experienced weavers until they have developed the vocational skills to work a five-hour shift, five days a week. They earn cash salaries of 650 to 1,100 Peruvian soles ($180 to $329) per month, depending on their level of experience. Earnings in both Peru and Thailand are benchmarked against the national minimum wage. In Peru, this is 930 soles a month.', 'The prison takes a 10 percent cut of inmates’ wages. The workers keep a portion for living expenses like food and soap, and Carcel pays the rest into their families’ bank accounts. Beyond the base salary, women can also receive bonuses for the quality of their work, good behavior and overtime.', 'Benigna Salinas operates a knitting machine.', 'There is no question the work is selling. According to Elizabeth von der Goltz, the global buying director of Net-a-Porter, fashion brands with social purpose are increasingly popular with shoppers.', 'To meet demand, Carcel is now looking to double its staff base in the Peruvian prison. At the company’s second production base in Thailand — the country with the most female inmates in the world — e-banking accounts are being developed for some prisoners and their relatives to minimize siphoning from wardens or companies. Carcel said it hoped to operate in a further three to five countries within the next five years.', 'Considerable challenges remain. This week, Carcel halted sales in America when it became aware of a federal law that bans the import of goods made by convicts. The company is now seeking a waiver; it pointed out that the United States is one of the few countries that did not ratify a 2014 International Labor Organization convention on forced labor, despite domestic prison labor being legal. Net-a-Porter confirmed Wednesday that it would suspend Carcel sales until the issue was resolved.', 'Elizabeth Paton reported from London, and Andrea Zarate from Cusco, Peru.', 'Elizabeth Paton is a reporter for the Styles section, covering the fashion and luxury sectors in Europe. Before joining The Times in 2015, she was a reporter at the Financial Times both in London and New York.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Oscars 2019: Your Guide to All the Best Picture Controversies
['How to navigate a fractious, scandal-plagued year at the movies.', 'Lucy Boynton and Rami Malek in “Bohemian Rhapsody,” which has been caught up in the controversy over the director Bryan Singer.', 'How hot is this beef?', 'The film is based on the true story of a black pianist (Don Shirley, played by Mahershala Ali) who hired a white driver and bodyguard (Tony Vallelonga, played by Viggo Mortensen) to chauffeur him on a tour across the Deep South in 1962.', 'But there are larger criticisms of the movie.', 'How hot is this beef?', 'How hot is this beef?', 'How hot is this beef?', 'How hot is this beef?', 'How hot is this beef?', 'Are you happy in this modern world?', 'Or do you need more?', 'How hot is this beef?', 'How hot is this beef?', 'Why Do the Oscars Keep Falling for Racial Reconciliation Fantasies?', 'Reggie Ugwu\xa0is a pop culture reporter covering a range of subjects, including film, television, music and internet culture. Before joining The Times in 2017, he was a reporter for BuzzFeed News and Billboard magazine.', 'How Would You  Like That Beef?', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Fashion Review: At Fendi, Raising the Bar in Farewell
['Karl Lagerfeld’s final collection for the house, and the question of vision at Gucci and Alberta Ferretti.', 'MILAN — Normally before a fashion show the decibel level is close to that of a small zoo, as people pass the time in gossip and air kisses and yelling into their phones. But Thursday at noon, as the crowd filed in for Fendi, the noise was just a whisper.', 'There were double FFs in fur and celadon green cotton and canvas on audience members everywhere you looked. A small card with an F (the lower leg replaced by a heart) and Mr. Lagerfeld’s signature scrawl had been placed atop every seat; the date of his death was on the back. At the end of the runway was a handwritten sign reading “Love Karl.” According to Serge Brunschwig, Fendi’s chief executive, Mr. Lagerfeld had been working on the collection until the end.', 'It showed.', 'Atop a base of sheer hosiery and bodysuits speckled with the rococo italics of a 1980s logo that Mr. Lagerfeld had created and called “karligraphy” was layered men’s tailoring in irony-tinged 1970s shades of brown and camel, purple and green; the backs of jackets and high-collared shirts (a reference to the style Mr. Lagerfeld favored for himself) sashed with a lavish taffeta bow. Leather coats laser-cut to mimic technical athletic mesh were paired with sheer pleated wrap skirts; governess dresses shifted just so over the body to suggest the branded underthings beneath.', 'It was easy and entirely contemporary; built on heritage, dipping in and out of trend (sports, suits, the soup of decades past) but indebted to neither. It was smart, in every sense of the word.', 'After the last model had filed past, Silvia Fendi, the designer for men’s and accessories and Mr. Lagerfeld’s partner on the creative side of the business, took her bow alone. A short video was shown of Mr. Lagerfeld sketching his first look for the brand, and explaining the power of a healthy dose of disrespect.', 'His work gave proof to his words but it didn’t matter: Respect was what he was due, not just because of what he had achieved but because of what he had just made. And backstage, everyone — models, modélistes, hair and beauty teams, executives — was in tears. As his last gesture he had raised the bar for everyone.', 'Milan Fashion Week began in the shadow of Mr. Lagerfeld’s death, and it cast a strange, uneasy light on the opening shows.', 'He wasn’t speaking of the general mood, though it would have made sense, or Mr. Lagerfeld’s legacy, though that would have made sense, too (and, in fact, Mr. Michele had started his career working at Fendi). Rather, he was talking about the wall of strobe-like L.E.D.s that flashed in formation throughout the show, shining directly in the eyes of audience members, forcing them into temporary sightlessness. What was going to happen next? The timeliness of the effect was a coincidence but a resonant one.', 'Which may be why, once you blinked away the spots on your retinas, what was visible on the runway was a play on all kinds of masks — blank-faced and S&M leatherette and filigree metal, some full-face, some playing peekaboo with eyes and mouth — and Mr. Michele’s now-signature exaggerated vintage grabfest of gender-bending costume for both sexes.', 'It was a little Venetian and a little Freddy Krueger; frump punk, cut with a dash of Hannah Arendt, the German philosopher who wrestled with questions of totalitarianism and freedom and was liberally referenced in the show notes.', 'Anyway, back to Mr. Michele and Gucci.', 'The show had bouquets of references and free-association fantasy. It probably had commercial hits buried underneath. What it did not have were any revelations or surprises.', 'Maybe we’d had enough for this week, anyway. Continuity! Sometimes it looks awfully good.', 'So if there was familiarity in the checkerboards and pomegranate prints in midcentury modern shapes and shades at Arthur Arbesser and the masculine/feminine play at Jil Sander, where Luke and Lucie Meier layered sweeping shirtdresses sliced to the hip and dish towel tunics over trousers wide and slim, that’s O.K. Brunello Cucinelli has built an entire theory of fashion on the virtues of merely nudging along his hand-knit cashmeres (now mixed with a base of chiffon) and earthy tailoring.', 'In any case, the result was more appealing than the unexpected swerve that’s been going on at Alberta Ferretti, where this season the designer veered even further backward into 1980s power-woman-meets-Vegas-sound-and-light-show territory. Guess she’s really not interested in being associated with those delicate pintucks and frothy Oscar frocks any more. Fair enough.', 'The problem is what was offered instead: shoulders — big ones, sometimes complete with fringe-bedecked epaulets. Jackets with shiny brass buttons. Jodhpurs and pleated stonewashed gray denim jeans. Cowboy boots and flat-brimmed hats. A whole lot of gold and silver and magenta lamé, in the form of jumpsuits, one-shouldered Komodo dragon ruffled minis, and high-waisted suspender trousers. Yes: suspenders.', 'They left you rubbing your eyes.', "Vanessa Friedman is The Times's fashion director and chief fashion critic. She was previously the fashion editor of the Financial Times.", 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


You Asked: What to Do When a Doctor’s Visit Is the Cause of Pain?
['What to Do When a Doctor’s Visit Is the Cause of Pain?', 'What to Do When a Doctor’s Visit Is the Cause of Pain?', 'Tips for dealing with pelvic pain during an OB-GYN exam.', 'Jen Gunter, M.D.', 'I have vaginismus, and though I’ve undergone physical therapy for it, pap smears are still unbearably painful — it basically feels like I’m being stabbed. Is there any way to tell my doctor that an Ativan and a Tylenol won’t cut it? Or am I doomed to never get a pelvic exam ever again?', 'Pap smears should not be painful, and they are most definitely not something to endure. In fact, each painful pelvic exam or Pap smear can further increase your pain, which worsens your underlying condition, never mind causing stress and trauma. There are definitely options to reduce your pain.', 'Have a question about women’s health? Ask Dr. Gunter yourself.', 'Pap smears and pelvic exams should not be painful, and I am sorry for your experience. As an OB/GYN and pain medicine physician I cannot say this enough: A painful pelvic exam should be stopped.', 'Find someone with expertise in doing pelvic exams for women who have pelvic pain.', 'As a pelvic pain specialist, I see women every day who tell me that my exam was their first pain-free Pap smear. I am so happy to help them, but it also makes me want to cry because it shouldn’t be that way. An experienced provider should allow enough time (feeling rushed helps no one relax) and may be able to coach you in other ways to help you relax your pelvic floor muscles. Some other options that can help reduce pain are applying topical numbing medication to the vaginal opening and using a narrow vaginal speculum that is about the size of a finger. Sometimes, I even have my patient insert the speculum herself.', 'A vaginal sample for H.P.V. (human papilloma virus) testing instead of a Pap smear.', 'Intravenous anesthesia.', 'For women for whom the first two options are not going to work (for example there is too much fear or pain, or memories of past trauma to take a vaginal swab, or there is a need to collect a Pap smear and look at the cervix because the H.P.V. test is positive), there is the option of an anesthetic. It is not any sign of failure to need anesthesia for a pelvic exam — we have modern anesthesia for a reason! This type of anesthesia is typically called monitored anesthesia care and an anesthesia provider (a doctor or nurse anesthetist) administers intravenous anesthesia in an operating room or a surgical center to control pain and anxiety.', 'It is more expensive and typically requires several hours out of the day, although with modern anesthesia techniques and a short procedure the recovery is typically very fast.', 'In some cases, this measure is worth it to be able to screen for potentially serious diseases like cervical cancer.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


The New Speakeasy: Cocktails in a Stranger’s Kitchen
['He is a tour guide by day and mixologist by night. She is a photographer with a knack for snacks. Together, they are offering a new way to drink with strangers.', 'On a chilly Saturday night in late January, a handful of strangers huddled outside a townhouse on a quiet street in Bushwick. A small neon sign in its window, “Cocktails Here,” was the only indicator that they had come to the right place.', 'At 9 p.m., the front door of the townhouse opened and Matt Levy ushered his guests inside.', 'Mr. Levy, 38, mixes cocktails for strangers in his home, which he shares with his wife, Jennifer MacFarlane, 41, and their two young daughters. Guests sit around the couple’s kitchen table as Mr. Levy mixes cocktails from a rotating menu. A prix fixe of $80 will get you four drinks and some assorted snacks prepared by Ms. MacFarlane. Guests are also encouraged to bring their own booze if they want something specific; once, a guest from North Carolina brought her own bottle of house-infused lavender gin.', 'A couple in their mid-30s, Chris Donohoe and Wesley Loden, actually live down the street from Mr. Levy and Ms. MacFarlane. “We’ve always been so curious to come here,” Mr. Donohoe said. “We always see that sign and get jealous.” Mr. Loden was actually in the middle of doing “Dry January,” but when a reservation at the club opened up, he decided to shift his priorities.', 'Mr. Levy designs all the cocktails, and sometimes take inspiration from current events.', 'Once everyone was settled around the kitchen island, Mr. Levy handed his guests an aperitif — this evening, it was a rum pineapple Pimms punch — and introduced himself as the bartender and host. He looked the part in a gray short-sleeved button-up shirt, maroon chinos with a tropical palm tree print and a dark brown belt with an oversize Statue of Liberty buckle. His mustache even curled a little at the ends.', 'He became a “cocktail fanboy” and began experimenting at home. He spent years learning bartending techniques, memorizing recipes, figuring out how to hand-cut ice (he owns two ice saws from Japan) as well as how to set drinks on fire.', 'Mr. Levy designs all the cocktails, and sometimes take inspiration from local current events. In December, he created the “Astoria Borealis” after the power plant explosion in Queens turned the skies an eerie blue. The rum-based cocktail has blue Curaçao (for color) and banana liqueur (because, as Mr. Levy put it, the whole thing was “bananas”). Shaken and strained over crushed ice, the final flourish is a splash of Rum Fire, which Mr. Levy briefly sets on fire.', 'Instagram and word-of-mouth from a community of “boozehounds,” as Mr. Levy calls them, keep the club hopping. Mr. Levy said that even professional bartenders have come calling. One bartender visiting from Ottawa had such a great time that he sent Mr. Levy a bottle of his homemade jerk-spiced bitters and a handwritten recipe book.', 'The couple decided to let the alcohol do most of the work.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


It Was the Hottest Oscar Night Party. What Happened?
['It Was the Hottest Oscar Night Party. What Happened?', 'It Was the Hottest Oscar Night Party. What Happened?', 'Vanity Fair has ruled the roost, but its guest list is bloated by corporate sponsorships. And now there’s competition from Jay-Z.', 'Lady Gaga was invited. So was Mahershala Ali. But the screaming fans outside Vanity Fair’s Oscar party in Beverly Hills on Oscar night might have had a hard time recognizing everyone — like the two civilians who secured invitations in an online auction, bidding with customer-loyalty points from Marriott.', 'Condé Nast titles.', 'Sounds like a wild night, right?', 'Where are my Vanity Fair tickets?', 'Pity the publicist who couldn’t secure a pair.', 'Hosted by the magazine’s current editor, Radhika Jones, the party remains a big to-do. Stars still care about being photographed as they walk in. But the hysterical frenzy that once surrounded the event has been fading for some time, at least among top celebrities, three longtime publicists said in interviews.', "Radhika Jones, the editor of Vanity Fair, at the magazine's Oscar party in 2018.", 'For many years, the Vanity Fair party was associated with the magazine’s longtime editor Graydon Carter, who spent nearly a quarter-century styling himself not just as a chronicler of Hollywood’s movie stars and moguls, but also as a part of their inner circle, before retiring last year.', 'The New York Times’s books department, who seems less driven to make herself the centerpiece of this signature annual event and remains unknown to many on the Left Coast.', 'But a number of forces besides a lower-profile host have shaped the perception that the party is, if not over, at least past its prime.', 'A spokeswoman for the magazine said that the notion that the Vanity Fair party is less in demand “couldn’t be further from the truth.” The question, perhaps, is: Who is demanding?', 'The party started in 1994, but its roots really extend to the 1960s, when Irving Paul Lazar — the superagent known as Swifty, a nickname bestowed by Humphrey Bogart — began hosting Oscar gatherings for the crème de la crème of Hollywood.', 'Voilà! The A-list had a new rendezvous point.', "Wolfgang Puck, top, with Irving Paul Lazar, left, and Dudley Moore at Mr. Puck's restaurant Spago, where Mr. Lazar's star-studded Oscar-night party took place for some years.", 'The ’90s were the last decade when movie stars — Julia Roberts, Tom Cruise, Tom Hanks — truly dominated the culture, before franchise filmmaking took over Hollywood and the internet began its rapid fragmentation of media in general. Absent smartphones and social media, the party was a place where such celebrities could let their hair down.', 'The big night at Mortons became such a desirable invitation that the magazine began meting out arrival times to lower-status guests, including a smattering of journalists, later in the evening.', 'Tom Cruise arriving at Spago on Oscar night in 1989.', 'Bruce Feirstein, a screenwriter and Vanity Fair contributing editor, has attended the party regularly since its inception. Generally, he said, he has arrived at his appointed 11 p.m. time and prepares to run the gantlet of hundreds of cameras.', 'Ben Affleck and Jennifer Lopez were captured canoodling at Mortons in 2003.', 'But the magazine’s (quite literal) catering to business interests only became really apparent after the 2008 financial crisis. By then the party had moved to the Sunset Tower Hotel. Still more advertisers got invited, and the hotel’s relatively compact party space (made larger by covering the pool) turned into something out of the movie “The Day of the Locust.” People were packed elbow to elbow, forming a “sweaty mob,” in the words of one 2013 attendee.', 'The move to the Sunset Tower came with signage aplenty.', 'But the royals — Angelina, Denzel, Leo, Reese — were nowhere to be seen. Maybe they were off shooting films in Europe. Maybe they weren’t invited. Or maybe they had decided to head straight to the ultraexclusive, no-grubby-journalists-allowed parties held by celebrities.', 'Madonna has hosted her party, with Guy Oseary, since 2008. Photography is not encouraged. Jay-Z is newer on the scene. In a repurposed garage of the Chateau Marmont, he will host an Oscar-night event called the “Gold Party,” as he did last year, when some invitations did not even go out until the day of the Oscars.', 'Smartphones, on the other hand, abound at the Vanity Fair party. “Now, every single person in there is a paparazzo,” Mr. Rushfield pointed out, or a marketer amplifying a brand.', "Gabrielle Union, Regina Hall and Olivia Munn, and a smartphone, at last year's bash.", 'Well, not Twitch. But viewers at home can in fact livestream parts of the Vanity Fair wingding from Twitter and the magazine’s website, thanks to the sponsorship of Verizon and two other companies.', 'Tellingly, though, Instagram, the social network preferred by the beautiful people, will not have an official presence at the 2019 Vanity Fair party. The company sponsored a portrait studio there for the past five years but has pulled out to focus on video products like IGTV, a spokeswoman said.', 'Newsstand sales for Vanity Fair dropped 14 percent in the first six months of 2018, to an average of 101,834 copies per issue, compared with the same period a year earlier, according to the most recent data available from the Alliance for Audited Media. Total subscriptions increased 2 percent, to 1.13 million, despite a decline in digital subscribers.', 'Warner Bros., the studio behind “A Star Is Born,” will take over at the Bungalows.', 'All the activity and do-goodery can’t mask that the Academy Awards are losing power. In the late 1990s, when the Vanity Fair party was at its peak (some 15,000 people requested invitations in 1999, according to reports at the time), the Oscars telecast attracted more than 40 million viewers. More than 55 million people tuned in for the 1998 ceremony, when “Titanic” won best picture.', "Janelle Monae wore a Time's Up pin to last year's party.", 'It was not so long ago that the party had “cigarette girls” wandering around, part of the magazine’s ethos of Old Hollywood glamour. But celebrating Old Hollywood — lily-white, often misogynistic — has abruptly fallen out of fashion over the last two years, since the #MeToo movement rocked the culture.', 'That event is hosted by Lancôme. It is the sixth year the company has sponsored a Campaign Hollywood event, and it also advertises in the magazine.', 'In a digital age, said Doreen Arbel, the senior vice president of marketing at Lancôme, a key company strategy is to create real-life experiences that can have a second life as content shared on social media.', 'With some 17 company executives, she too will attend the Vanity Fair party on Sunday.', 'Brooks Barnes is a media and entertainment reporter, covering all things Hollywood. He joined The Times in 2007 as a business reporter focused primarily on The Walt Disney Company. He previously worked for The Wall Street Journal.', 'Hooray for Hollywood?', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Opposition boycotts Governor’s address to protest his RSS ties
['What’s with the frown?: Governor Ch. Vidyasagar Rao is escorted out by Chief Minister Devendra Fadnavis after his joint address to both Houses of the legislature at the start of the Budget session in Mumbai on Monday.', 'In a stormy start to the Budget session, Opposition parties on Monday boycotted Governor Ch. Vidyasagar Rao’s joint address to both Houses of the legislature as a mark protest over his recent remarks praising and expressing pride over his association with the Rashtriya Swayamsevak Sangh (RSS).', 'Mr. Rao had, earlier this month, termed RSS as one of the most secular and inclusive organisations and expressed pride to be part of the ‘Sanghatan’ and being part of the RSS. Expressing displeasure over the remarks, Opposition members stayed away from his address.', 'In his address, Mr. Rao emphasised on the State government’s efforts to make Maharashtra a trillion dollar economy. “In order to achieve $1 trillion economy by 2025, my Government is preparing a new Industrial Policy with the objective of creating 60 lakh new employments and attracting an investment to the tune of ₹10 lakh crore,” he said.', 'Mr. Rao claimed that due to several industry-friendly policies over the last four years and — events like Make in India Week and Magnetic Maharashtra Convergence Summit 2018 — the State has attracted ₹3.36 lakh crore Foreign Direct Investment. “Maharashtra continues to be the leading State in attracting FDI in India,” the Governor said.', 'Recounting the measures taken by the State government for the welfare of farmers, Mr. Rao said that the government is working on schemes to achieve the objective of doubling the farmers’ income.', 'The Governor also announced that land acquisition for the Mumbai-Nagpur Samruddhi highway has been completed in a year and construction has begun. “This is the single largest project costing ₹55,335 crore that aims to connect the entire State from west to east,” he said.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Maharashtra tables over ₹4,200 crore in supplementary demands
['Finance Minister Sudhir Mungantiwar on Monday tabled supplementary demands worth ₹4,284.65 crore in the Assembly. Of this, ₹3,146.43 crore is the demand for additional expenditure till the next session while the remaining amount pertains to expenses already incurred by the government.', 'A supplementary demand is an additional grant to meet government expenditure, outside the annual budget.', 'The government will be presenting its interim budget on Wednesday. With this, the Bharatiya Janata Party-led State government has presented supplementary demands worth ₹1,71, 961 crore since December 2014.', 'According to Mr. Mungantiwar, the supplementary demand figure jumped because of the State’ decision to allot ₹ 2,000 crore from its contingency fund to be spent for farmers suffering from natural calamities such as drought. The government has allocated an extra ₹10.82 crore as financial assistance to the heirs of farmers who have committed suicides in the current financial year.', 'It has also provided ₹1,000 crore for the expenditure incurred on concessions given in the electricity tariff for agricultural pump and power loom consumers in the State, while ₹482.26 crore has been allocated to comply with the Bombay High Court order to issue pension to freedom fighters who were denied it on technical grounds. The State government also made a ₹305-crore allocation for milk procurement.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


‘Lack of advice to pilots led to collision’
['The non-availability of any advice to the pilots by the airport operator’s dispatch section with regard to restrictions on taxiing and poor lighting have been found to be the cause of a ground collision of two aircraft at Mumbai airport in 2016.', 'An official probe by the Aircraft Accident Investigation Board into a ground collision between a Kuwait Airways flight which had just landed in Mumbai and an IndiGo aircraft headed for Jaipur has also recommended that the Mumbai International Airport Ltd and the Airports Authority of India treat the incident site as a ‘hot spot’ till a permanent solution is reached. The incident, reported on November 30, 2016, occurred when the IndiGo aircraft was cleared to taxi via a specified path and hold when it reached a particular point.', 'The AAIB probe revealed that the Kuwait Airways aircraft, an Airbus 330 had swept wings which are subject to a phenomenon known as ‘swept wing growth’ or ‘wing creep’ that occurs during a turn when the wingtip describes an arc greater than the normal wingspan due to the geometry of the aircraft and the arrangement of the landing gear. Though in the present case, the Kuwait Airways aircraft was stationary it had hit its wing.', 'The Indigo aircraft suffered damage to the upper section of left hand Sharklet - a vertical wing-tip extension that improves the efficiency of an aircraft - was found sheared off from the main wing structure. The leading edge stainless steel cap of the Sharklet was found damaged from the top edge. Both outer and inner skin of the sharklet was also damaged.', 'The Kuwait Airways aircraft suffered outboard aileron - panels near the tip of the wing that move up and down - lower skin damage. The out board aileron trailing edge wedge structure was also damaged along with superficial paint scratches to the lower wing surface and wing trailing edge fairings.', 'The AAIB report said that an assumption by the Indigo flight crew that they were clear of the Kuwait Airways flight had continued taxiing onto taxiway N, thereafter crossing runway 14 without realising that left winglet had contacted the second aircraft.', 'AAIB said that Indigo Airlines may provide guidance material to its flight crew regarding the difficulty associated with assessing wing tip clearance. “MIAL and AAI may review the procedure for taxiing on taxiway N when an aircraft is holding on taxiway W4, short of Runway 14. MIAL may carry out assessment of the visibility conditions in the portion of W4 / N and take necessary corrective action if required,” the report said.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Uneasy calm in Arunachal capital
['An uneasy calm prevailed in Arunachal Pradesh capital Itanagar and nearby Naharlagun town under the watch of security forces on Monday, a day after widespread violence and arson left a trail of destruction and death.', 'Chief Minister Pema Khandu held a series of meetings with community-based organisations and students’ unions to “work out peace.” But most political parties, including the Congress and BJP ally National People’s Party, skipped his call for an all-party meeting.', 'Remove Arunachal CM and Rijiju: Cong.', 'Three persons have been killed in firing by the security forces since Friday night, when a 48-hour shutdown called by 18 indigenous organisations opposed to a move for granting permanent resident certificates (PRC) to six non-tribal communities turned ugly. Protesters burnt cars, vandalised the venue of the first Itanagar International Film Festival, damaged roadside property and set houses and shopping complexes owned by the ruling BJP Ministers and leaders on fire.', 'Mr. Khandu clarified misconceptions about the issue and sought the cooperation of all the organisations in restoring peace.', 'The CM expressed pain at the loss of three lives and announced Rs 20 lakh as compensation and a government job for the next of kin of the deceased and Rs 10 lakh for those injured.', 'Mr Khandu admitted a “communication gap” regarding the PRC issue that was to be brought up in the Assembly only for discussion and to make the report of the joint high power committee (JHPC) public. “We had no plan to introduce a Bill or resolution in this regard. We made this clear through social media,” he said.', 'The CM said an inquiry committee to be headed by a commissioner would be formed to investigate the causes behind the violence. An assessment committee would also be formed to compensate for the private properties damaged.', 'Musicians from Assam and Nagaland and participants of the abandoned IIFF have sought compensation from the State government for losing their vehicles, musical instruments, acoustics, and other instruments during the mob violence.', 'Meanwhile, the Congress has in a letter to Union Home Minister Rajnath Singh demanded the immediate sacking of Mr Khandu, Deputy Chief Minister Chowna Mein and Union Minister of State for Home Kiren Rijiju for “failure in tackling the situation”. The party also sought the constitution of a panel to probe the “firing and killing of innocent and unarmed protestors”.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Working for a New Normal in Italian Fashion’s Understanding of Race
['The Gucci blackface sweater and Dolce & Gabbana’s missteps in China have the knitwear designer Edward Buchanan seeking change.', 'Edward Buchanan, the designer and founder of knitwear label Sansovino 6, in Milan.', 'It was 1996.', 'Certainly, things have changed — somewhat.', 'And Lawrence Steele, an African-American designer who is the associate creative director of Marni and who has lived and worked in Milan for years, said, “I’ve had no difficulties whatsoever in getting a job. They’ve happened spontaneously, and at the brands where I have worked, there has been a language of openness.” He said that Marni has long had a multicultural design team.', "Mr. Buchanan's sketches for a new collection of knitwear.", 'A spokesman for Italy’s National Institute of Statistics, which maintains the country’s census, said it would not release information about the racial makeup of the population.', 'So he has been addressing the reality in the most effective way he knows how: with a collection.', 'The scarves are sold on the Sansovino website for about $45 (the cost of manufacturing, Mr. Buchanan said) and with the request that customers post photos of themselves wearing the scarves or communicate in some way what the slogans mean to them.', 'At the time, he recalled, his network of fashion friends like Emil Wilbekin, a founding editor of Vibe magazine, and Marni Senofonte, an L.A.-based stylist, told him how luxury houses refused to lend their products and how the two were buying from stores to dress rhythm and blues performers.', 'Italian journalist Angelo Flaccavento as, “a mix of Victoriana and R&B,” the fashion label garnered attention from Cher and Iman.', 'Mr. Buchanan later left Italy for New York and went on to consult for Jennifer Lopez’s Sweetface line and Sean Combs’s Sean John collection, eventually closing Leflesh to concentrate on his outside work.', 'In 2009 he returned to Milan and the following year he started Sansovino 6, naming the unisex cashmere line for the factory that produced it. The singer-songwriter Erykah Badu snapped up early pieces.', 'Now Mr. Buchanan is hopeful the industry will start another conversation. Last week Prada announced plans to create an inclusion advisory committee led by the artist and activist Theaster Gates and the director Ava DuVernay. Mr. Buchanan described the move as “very positive,” although he noted that brands “tend to run to the upper echelons of celebrity when addressed with such issues’’ rather than turning for advice to people already working in the business.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Modern Love: Listen: William Jackson Harper Reads ‘Your Dog Has Seen Me Naked’
['Are You My Husband?', 'Mr. Pfeffer is the associate editor at Time Out Miami. In his entertaining 2018 essay, he wrote about the trials of dating women with dogs.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Choupette, Karl Lagerfeld’s Cat, Has a Million Reasons to Purr
['The fashion designer Karl Lagerfeld posed next to a photo of himself and Choupette in 2014.', 'Karl Lagerfeld stole his famously pampered cat, Choupette, and was not ashamed to say so.', 'Despite her luxurious lifestyle, Choupette retained a taste for the simpler feline pleasures.', 'If it turns out that Mr. Lagerfeld left Choupette a substantial inheritance, she will be far from alone: There have been plenty of lucky pets left with eye-popping sums after the deaths of their owners.', 'The billionaire Leona Helmsley and Trouble, her Maltese, in 2003.', 'Jonah Engel Bromwich contributed reporting.', 'After Karl Lagerfeld, What’s Next for Chanel and Fendi?', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Trilobites: Why Do Zebras Have Stripes? Scientists Camouflaged Horses to Find Out
['If you spend time around horses or flies, you might want to invest in some zebra print.', 'Those stripes might be some of nature’s most effective insect repellent.', 'What’s black, white and striped all over — except for its head?', 'Horses wearing zebra coats on a farm in Britain.', 'The animals weren’t attending a masquerade. They were dressed for studies investigating a mystery that has puzzled scientists for more than a century.', 'Wallace were theorizing about evolution, scientists have debated the function of this sassy animal print. It’s been called camouflage to confuse big predators, an identity signal to other zebras and a kind of wearable air conditioner. Now most scientists agree that the function of a zebra’s stripes is to ward off biting flies that can carry deadly diseases.', 'But what exactly is it about a zebra’s wardrobe that flies don’t like?', 'Like the Science Times page on Facebook.', 'Science Times newsletter.', 'A horse dressed as a zebra to investigate fly behavior in England.', 'The flies pestered all of the horses and the zebras in the paddocks equally. But once they got close, the zebra stripes seemed to dazzle the flies so much that they couldn’t manage a controlled landing. Flies zoomed in too fast and either veered off just in time — or simply bumped into the zebra and bounced off. The flies didn’t seem to like the zebra coats on horses, either, but their bare heads were fair game.', 'The only thing they can say for certain is that the high contrast between black and white most likely tricks the fly’s low-resolution vision, which relies on sensing movement.', 'In an optical illusion called the barber pole, diagonal stripes appear to move up or down, depending on which way the pole is rotating. Something similar could be happening as flies approach zebra stripes. From afar, the fly may interpret the object as gray, but as it moves closer, the zebra’s diagonal stripes may appear to be moving in false directions. As a result, a fly may think it’s headed toward open space instead of landing. Or perhaps the sudden appearance of stripes may overload the fly’s vision and startle it into a buzzing stupor.', 'The researchers are now conducting tests with coats of different patterns, contrasts and thickness, to see just what it is about the stripes that stops the flies. “By playing around with those variables, we’ll be able to get inside the head of the fly, or the eye of the fly, to work out what’s sort of confusing to it,” said Dr. Caro.', 'In the meantime, people planning on being around horses or horse flies may want to consider wearing zebra print rather than a solid to avoid being bitten. You should probably make your horse a twinsie, too.', 'What’s Black and White and Travels 310 Miles?', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Uptown, Sackler Protests. Downtown, a Sackler Fashion Line.
['Uptown, Sackler Protests. Downtown, a Sackler Fashion Line.', 'Uptown, Sackler Protests. Downtown, a Sackler Fashion Line.', 'LBV Care of Joss Sackler, a new collection from a member of the family that owns Purdue Pharma, debuted during New York Fashion Week.', 'Looks from the LBV Care of Joss Sackler line.', 'Last week, at the tail end of New York Fashion Week, in a private suite at the Soho Grand Hotel, models with Day-Glo yellow eyelashes and matching parkas dotted the room. They held handbags with the initials LBV molded in gold, and a few carried yellow ice axes.', 'Some looked ready to climb — gilded carabiners sparkled here and there, and\xa0the models wore chunky Lowa climbing boots\xa0—\xa0though others wore see-through lace skirts over their bodysuits.', 'Mrs. Sackler, 34, is the proprietress of LBV, a private social club, from where this collection, LBV Care of Joss Sackler, grew. Mrs. Sackler is an avid climber, so she tailored the clothes to suit her lifestyle: hazard yellow for boulder safety, still a cute look for driving home from the Gunks and going straight to dinner; or a white shirt to throw on over bike shorts after the gym for the school run.', 'LBV grew out of a separate interest, in wine. Wanting to share the appreciation of wine with more women than were in the prestigious wine fraternities Mrs. Sackler belonged to, like the Confrérie des Chevaliers du Tastevin, the Commanderie des Costes du Rhône and the Commanderie de Bordeaux, she founded one of her own.', 'Membership fees begin at $500 annually and go up to $2,500, and Mrs. Sackler estimated that membership hovers at around 50 people.', 'If Mrs. Sackler’s name sounds familiar, it is probably not for the reasons she would like.', 'Mrs. Sackler is married to David Sackler, whose family owns Purdue Pharma, the makers of the prescription painkiller OxyContin. Purdue and the members of the Sackler family behind it have been accused of fomenting, and profiting from, the American opioid epidemic.', 'The Sackler family is one of the richest in America, and has given generously and philanthropically over the years to a large number of institutions, many of which have named schools, research centers, wings, libraries, courtyards, halls and even escalators for them.', 'Given the fury that surrounds the Sackler family, it may stand to reason that Mrs. Sackler’s name would be a liability. When the question was put to her, Mrs. Sackler fell silent and looked away.', 'Mrs. Sackler looked up.', 'Protests Uptown. A Fashion Line Downtown.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


